AP Privacy Policy
Last Updated: August 27, 2024
This Privacy Policy (“Privacy Policy”) applies to any and all information that The Associated Press and its affiliates (referred to together in this Privacy Policy as “AP,” “we,” “us,” “our,” and other similar pronouns) collect through those AP web sites and mobile applications that link to this Privacy Policy (together, the “Services”).
We may revise or update this Privacy Policy from time to time to reflect changes to our privacy practices. We will notify you of any changes to this Privacy Policy by posting the revised or updated Privacy Policy and its “Last Updated” date on the Services. If a revision or modification is material, we may also provide you notification via email (as applicable) or via the web site. Your continued use of the Services after the “Last Updated” date constitutes your acceptance of and agreement to the Privacy Policy, including its revisions and updates. You should periodically read this Privacy Policy to learn of any revisions or updates. Please note that this Privacy Policy does not apply to information that you may provide to us, or that we may obtain, where a separate privacy policy is provided.
Table of Contents
What Personal Information May We Collect?
User-Provided Information
Automatically Collected Information
Information Received from Third Parties
Information You Provide About Third Parties
Sensitive Personal Information
How May We Use Your Personal Information?
With Whom Do We Share Personal Information We Collect?
How Do We Secure Your Personal Information?
Cookies Policy
: How Do the Services Use Cookies and Other
Types Tracking Technologies?
Type of Tracking Technologies
How We May Use Tracking Technologies
How You Can Manage Tracking Technologies
Links and Connections to Third-Party Services and Sites
Social Networks
Third-Party Web Sites and Content
AP Buyline
Co-Sponsored Content
Third-Party Analytics Providers
Third-Party Ad Servers and Networks
Do Not Track Disclosures
Opt Out of E-mail Marketing
Your Personal Information Rights and Choices
Notice to California Residents
US Residents
Residents Outside the US
Ad Blocking Recovery
What Is Our Legal Basis for Use of Your Personal Information
Children’s Privacy
Data Retention
Contact Us
personal-information
1. What Personal Information May We Collect?
During your use of the Services (whether as a registered or unregistered user), you may provide us with information that relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, to you (together, “Personal Information”).
Personal Information may be collected directly from you, such as when you contact us via customer support, make advertisement inquiries, register for an account, or sign up for marketing emails. Personal Information may also be collected automatically, through your use of the Services or obtained from third parties.
Personal Information collected may include:
User-Provided Information
Contact Information,
including your name, e-mail address, phone number, and address.
Account Information,
including your name, email address, and password.
Donation Information
, including your name, country, postal code, and donation amount. You may be required to provide financial or bank information prior to making a donation. Please note, we do not store financial and bank information; such information is processed and stored by our payment processor, Stripe. For more information on Stripe’s privacy practices, please visit:
https://stripe.com/privacy
.
User-Generated Content and Feedback
, including any Information, content, or comments that you submit to us, such as comments, photos, videos, audio, and text, whether submitted through online forms or social media platforms, by email, by phone, by mail, in surveys, or otherwise.
Automatically Collected Information
Internet and Service Usage Information, Device Information and Identifiers,
including
your IP address (which we may associate with your domain name or that of your Internet access provider or wireless carrier, and your location); unique ID number associated with your device; other unique identifiers such as advertising identifiers; web browser and operating system information; language of your device; wireless connections you are using; referring page that linked you to us; your activities, including browsing and transaction history; Pages, content, and ads you view or click on during your use of the Services, and when and for how long you do so; the next web site you visit after leaving our web site; and search terms you enter on the Services or a referral site.
In addition, we may deploy tracking technologies through the Services to collect additional information about your use of the Services, as set out in the “Cookies and other tracking technologies” section of this Privacy Policy.
Location Data
, including geographic location of your mobile device (a “Mobile Service”) if you have consented to location services generally through your device’s settings or accepted our request for geolocation access. Your device location may be transmitted to us whenever a Mobile Service is running (even if you are not actively using the Mobile Service or it is running in the background on your device). Your device may continue to transmit its location to us until you change your device settings. If you set your device not to transmit location information to us, certain features of the Services may not be available or their functions may be limited. For example, you will have to manually enter a location when conducting a search.
Information Received from Third Parties
Information from Public and Commercial Sources.
In some instances, we may receive Personal Information and/or anonymous data about you from other parties, such as our affiliates, business partners, service providers, and other third parties. That information may be obtained online, offline, or through publicly available resources. We may combine this information with the information you provide and other data we already have about you.
Social Media Information.
We may receive information about you from social media platforms when you interact with us on those platforms or access our social media content. Please note that the information we may receive from those third parties (such as Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn, Pinterest, Instagram, TikTok, and Youtube) is governed by the privacy settings, policies and/or procedures of the applicable platform, and we strongly encourage you to review them before submitting any information using each social media platform.
Information You Provide About Third Parties
Some of the Services allow you to provide us with Personal Information relating to other parties. For example, our donation functionality may allow you to share a donation link with family and friends by providing us access to Personal Information such as names, email addresses, or phone numbers of your family and friends (together, “Third-Party Data”).
If you use any feature of the Services that allows you to submit Third-Party Data to the Services or otherwise permits the Services to automatically access Third-Party Data in your possession, you acknowledge, represent, and agree that: (a) you have the authority of the relevant third party for us to access and use the relevant Third-Party Data; and (b) you have notified these other parties and informed them how their information is collected and used by us to provide the Services. We reserve the right to identify you as the person who has made the referral in any messages that are sent to these third parties.
We use Third-Party Data to (a) contact such third party using the Third-Party Data provided, and/or (b) provide you with an editable template message designed to facilitate communication between you and such party through the Services. We may also send reminders or related messages to you and to third parties on your behalf from time to time, as and where permitted by applicable law.
Sensitive Personal Information
.
We generally do not collect or process Sensitive Personal Information. When you make a donation, you may be required to provide financial or bank information prior to making the donation. Please note, we do not store financial and bank information; such information is processed and stored by our payment processor, Stripe. For more information on Stripe’s privacy practices, please visit:
https://stripe.com/privacy
.
2. How May We Use Your Personal Information?
We and/or our service providers may use the Personal Information we collect from or about you to perform the following functions:
Providing the Services
. We may use your Personal Information to provide the Services and any other services you may request from us.
Monitoring the Services
. We collect your Personal Information for monitoring purposes to help us diagnose problems with our servers, administer and troubleshoot the Services, calculate usage levels, analyze industry standards, and analyze transactions, trends, and statistics regarding the use of the Services.
Facilitating Donations
. We collect your Personal Information to facilitate donations made to us via the Services.
Responding to Inquiries and Fulfilling Requests
. We may use your Personal Information to respond to your inquiries and to fulfill your requests for information.
Communicating with You
. We may use your Personal Information to send you marketing information about the Services, special promotions, and other items that may be of interest to you. We may also contact you on behalf of our third-party business partners about particular offerings of theirs that may be of interest to you.
Improving the Services
. We may use your Personal Information to make the Services more stable and user-friendly, to analyze service issues, improve the design and content of the Services, analyze how the Services are used, offer new services, and to develop new Services and programs relating to the Services.
Personalizing the Services
. We may use your Personal Information to personalize the Services based on your usage data, interests, and history with us. We may also localize the content and articles that are displayed to you based on your geographical location.
Advertising and Marketing to You
. We may use your Personal Information to tailor ads displayed to you in the Services and elsewhere.
Providing Customer Service
. We may use your Personal Information when contacting you regarding customer service or in response when you provide feedback. We may also use your information to send administrative emails regarding the Services or to inform you of any changes to this Privacy Policy, our Terms, or our third-party partner’s Terms.
Supporting Business Operations
. We may use your Personal Information (both on an individual basis and in aggregate) to support our internal and business operations, including internal and external audits, market research, analytics, security, assessment of your level of interest in and use of the Services, e-mails, and other messaging campaigns.
Enforcing Agreements
. We may use your Personal Information to enforce separate agreements between you and us, to enforce this Privacy Policy, our Terms, or our third-party partner’s Terms, or in connection with a transaction with a similar effect.
Safety and Security.
We may use your Personal Information to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud or security issues, and to protect against harm to our, your, or third parties’ rights, property, or safety.
Fulfilling Other Purposes
. We may use your Personal Information to fulfill: (a) any other purpose for which you provide it; (b) any legal or regulatory requirements and any of our internal policies; (c) other purposes disclosed at the time of collection; (d) any other purpose with your consent; and (e) any other purposes set forth in this Privacy Policy
with-whom-do-we-share-personal-information-we-collect
3. With Whom Do We Share Personal Information We Collect?
Except as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy, we do not sell, share, rent, or otherwise disclose your Personal Information that we collect from the Services to any third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, unless stated below or with your consent:
Subsidiaries and Affiliates.
We may disclose Personal Information about you to our subsidiaries and affiliates.
Service Providers and Contractors
. To help us provide the Services, we may share your Personal Information with our service providers, contractors, and other third parties we use to support our business and who will safeguard your Personal Information in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Such third parties may help us with providing customer service, maintaining and analyzing data, and sending customer communications on our behalf.
Marketing Partners
. We may share your Personal Information with entities that perform marketing and/or data aggregation services on our behalf, or with whom we have joint marketing arrangements.
Advertising Partners.
We may share your Personal Information with third-party advertising partners, including but not limited to Google Display Advertising and Remarketing services. These advertising partners may use first- and third-party cookies together to inform, optimize, and serve ads based on your past visits to the Services. These advertising partners may use this information (and similar information collected from other services) for purposes of delivering personalized advertisements to you when you visit digital properties within their networks, commonly referred to as “interest-based advertising.”
Analytics Partners
. We may use analytics-based technologies to assist with personalization, advertising, and marketing. These technologies may capture how you interact with the Services through behavioral metrics, heatmaps, and session replay to improve and market our products and services.
Payment Processors
. We may disclose certain Personal Information to financial institutions as necessary for the Services.
Authorized Representatives.
If another individual is managing your account with us or your email account that the Services connect to on your behalf (for example, a spouse managing the account of the other spouse), as authorized by you or as a personal representative under applicable law, that person may view all Personal Information about you on the Services.
In the Event of Merger, Sale, Divestitures, or Change of Control.
We reserve the right to transfer Personal Information to a buyer or other successor in interest that acquires rights to that information as a result of a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of us or substantially all of our assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation, or similar proceeding, in which Personal Information held by us about you is among the assets transferred.
With Your Consent.
We may share your information for other purposes pursuant to your consent or at your direction.
Other Disclosures.
We may disclose your Personal Information if we have a good faith belief that disclosure of such information is helpful or reasonably necessary to: (i) conform to legal requirements and comply with any court order, law, or legal process, including responding to any government, law enforcement, or regulatory request; (ii) enforce the Terms of Use, other agreements, including between you and us, and any other documents included or referenced in the Terms of Use (all of which are incorporated into and made a part of this Privacy Policy by reference); (iii) fulfill the purpose for which you provide the Personal Information; (iv) detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud or security issues; or (v) protect against harm to our, your, or third parties’ rights, property, or safety.
Non-Personally Identifiable Information
. We may analyze your information in aggregate form to operate, maintain, manage, and improve the Services. We may share non-personally identifiable information about usage of the Services (including aggregate data) with third parties, including our affiliates, agents, and business partners, for their own use, in a de-identified form.
Publicly Posted Information.
If you voluntarily post Personal Information to public areas of the Services, that information may be available to other Service users.
personal
4. How Do We Secure Your Personal Information?
We use commercially reasonable technical, administrative, and physical security measures designed to protect Personal Information collected via the Services.
We cannot guarantee that any information, during transmission through the Internet or while stored on our systems or otherwise in our care, will be absolutely safe from unauthorized access or use (e.g., by hackers). You use the Services, and send us information, at your own risk.
If you create an account on the Services, you are responsible for maintaining the strict confidentiality of your account password, and you shall be responsible for any activity, including disclosure of your Personal Information, that occurs using your account credentials, whether or not you authorized such activity. Please notify us of any unauthorized use of your password or account or any other breach of security.
5. Cookies Policy: How Do the Services Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies?
We, and/or our service providers or partners on our behalf, may use tracking technologies, which may run on your device and/or browser when you use the Services. These technologies enable us to assign a unique number to your computer or device and to relate information about your use of the Services and other information about you, including Personal Information. These technologies also enable us to recognize you when you access our Services using different web browsers or devices.
Types of Tracking Technologies:
These tracking technologies may include:
Cookies.
These are small pieces of text that are provided by most web sites and stored by your web browser on the computer, phone, or other device that you are using. Cookies serve many purposes, such as helping a web site remember your preferences, learning which areas of a web site are useful and which areas need improvement, and providing you with targeted advertisements or personalized content. Sometimes, cookies are enabled when pixels (see below) are placed on a web site. Cookies can be first-party or third-party. A first-party cookie is one that you receive directly from The Associated Press when visiting our Services. A third-party cookie is one that you receive from another party. Please note, we do not control what third parties do on other web sites. We may work with certain third-party providers to permit their cookies to function through our Services so we can learn more about your web experience on our Services and better personalize our Services for you.
Pixels.
Also called web beacons, clear GIFs, and tags, pixels are one-pixel transparent images that are located on web pages or messages. Pixels track whether you have opened web pages or messages. They enable web sites to read and place cookies.
Software Development Kits (SDKs).
SDKs are pieces of code provided by our digital vendors (such as third-party advertising companies, ad networks, and analytics providers) that may be in our mobile app to collect and analyze certain device and user data.
JavaScript.
This is a programming language that can be used to write trackers that, when embedded into a page, allow us to measure how you interact with our web site and other web sites.
Device Identifiers.
These are identifiers that are stored directly on a device and are unique to that specific device.
How We May Use Tracking Technologies:
Circumstances in which we may deploy tracking technologies include:
We may use cookies or local shared objects, such as “Flash cookies.” Cookies are small packets of data that a web site stores on your computer’s or mobile device’s hard drive (or other storage medium) so that your computer will “remember” information about your visit. We use both first- and third-party session cookies and persistent cookies. Session cookies make it easier for you to navigate our Services; a session ID cookie expires when you close your browser. A persistent cookie remains on your hard drive for an extended period of time or until you delete them. You can remove persistent cookies by following directions provided in your web browser’s “help” file. To the extent we provide a log-in portal or related feature on our Services, persistent cookies can be used to store your passwords so that you don’t have to enter it more than once. Persistent cookies also enable us to track and target the interests of our visitors to personalize the experience on our Services. Similar to many other web sites, if you have enabled cookies in your browser, we, independently and through enabled third-party tools and programs, may collect certain technical information using cookies, such as originating IP address, browser type, browser language, how a user got to the Service (i.e., the URL of the last web site you visited), the next web site the user visits, what pages are visited, the length of each site visit, and the date and time of the user’s visit. This information helps us track trends and improve user experiences when using the Services.
HTML5 may be used to store information on your computer or device about your Service usage activities. This information can be retrieved by us to determine how our Services are being used by our visitors, how our Services may be improved, and to customize our Services for our users.
We may send instructions to your computer or device using JavaScript or other computer languages to gather the sorts of information described above and other details about your interactions with the Service.
We use Meta Pixel and Google Pixel to understand how our web site, services, and products perform, how you use them, and to serve you with ads on third-party web sites and social networking sites. These pixels may collect certain limited information such as your IP address, browser/device type, and the pages you visit on our Services. This data is stored and processed by Meta and Google, as applicable. For information about how Meta may use this data, please visit Meta’s Privacy Policy at
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/
. For information about how Google may use this data, please visit
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/
.
How You Can Manage Tracking Technologies:
A cookie banner will be displayed to users of our Services who are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or the United Kingdom (“UK”), which will invite users to give their consent, where applicable, and will provide further options for the management of tracking technologies.
For residents of certain countries and states, in Your Privacy Choices, you may choose not to allow certain types of tracking technologies (which may impact your experience of the Services). You can access Your Privacy Choices by going to our web site’s navigation menu (the three-line menu in the upper left corner of our web site), then scrolling down to and clicking on “Your Privacy Choices.”
You can manage SDKs in your mobile app’s settings. If you choose to change your settings, you may find that certain functions and features will not work as intended on the Services.
You can manage web site cookies in your browser settings. If you choose to change your settings, you may find that certain functions and features will not work as intended on the Services. All browser settings are
slightly
different
, so to manage cookies, you should refer to the relevant settings within your browser. Please click below for detailed information on how to disable and delete cookies in some commonly used browsers:
Mozilla Firefox:
https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/clear-cookies-and-site-data-firefox
Microsoft Internet Explorer:
https://support.microsoft.com/en-us/help/17442/windows-internet-explorer-delete-manage-cookies#ie=ie-11
Microsoft Edge:
https://support.microsoft.com/en-us/search?query=edge%20clear%20cookies%20and%20cache
Google Chrome:
https://support.google.com/accounts/answer/61416?hl=en
Safari Mac:
https://support.apple.com/guide/safari/manage-cookies-sfri11471/mac
Safari iPhone, iPad, or iPod Touch:
https://support.apple.com/en-us/HT201265
third-party
6. Links and Connections to Third-Party Services ad Sites
Social Networks.
We maintain a presence on social media and other external platforms, such as Facebook and Twitter. We may occasionally incorporate third-party social networking features into the Services. This Privacy Policy applies to our use of Personal Information you submit to us through those platforms, but please note that it does not apply to what those third-party platforms do with your Personal information.
The Services may allow you to share Personal Information with us that you have already provided to a third-party social networking platform. For example, you may be able to create an account on the Services or log in to the Services using your Facebook account or other third-party credentials. If you do so, Personal Information or other data that you have provided to the third party may be made available to us by that third party subject to its own privacy policy, terms, and conditions. Privacy policies of social networks and other external platforms explain how those third parties use, protect, and share your information, including any information you share on those platforms from the Services, and we encourage you to read these privacy policies. The information we receive from these platforms may depend on your privacy settings.
We may also include tools in the Services that allow you to share or publicly post content from the Services to your profile on a third-party social network. You may choose to share information about your activities on the Services with such third-party platforms and their users, including publishing your information about what content you may have viewed on the Services. If you visit the Services while logged into certain social media platforms, the social media platform may be able to identify your browser and associate the technical information provided by your web browser with other information that they have already collected about you, which may result in their ability to identify you. In addition, when you choose to share information about your activities on the Services with certain social media platforms, AP may send technical information about you to that platform as well as information about what content you are viewing.
Third-Party Web Sites and Content.
The Services may allow access to third-party content and services, such as via links, banners, widgets, or advertisements that lead to third-party web sites (“Third-Party Web Sites”). We are not responsible for these other web sites or services. You acknowledge and agree that the privacy policies and terms of use posted by such Third-Party Web Sites (and not AP’s Privacy Policy and Terms of Use) will govern the collection and use of your information through them.
For example:
The Services utilize YouTube’s API Services. When you engage YouTube’s content and services through our Services,
YouTube’s Terms of Service
and
Google’s privacy policy
controls shall apply.
We use JW Player to serve video across the Services. Information about the data collected via the JW Player can be found in
JWP’s Privacy Policy
.
The Services may use Hearken’s services to learn more about users of our Services. Information about Hearken’s privacy practices can be found in
Hearken’s Privacy Policy
.
The Services may provide content from another content affiliate, Data Skrive. If you engage with that content, you will be subject to Data Skrive’s privacy policy found
here
.
We encourage you to read the privacy statements of services visited through the Services or web sites visited after leaving the Services to learn about how your information is treated by others.
AP Buyline.
AP Buyline (
Personal Finance
,
Shopping
) is an initiative designed to simplify complex consumer-made decisions by providing its audience with reliable evaluations and straightforward insights. The AP Buyline web site is hosted by Taboola.com Ltd., and
Taboola’s Privacy Policy
(available
here
) applies to your use of AP Buyline.
Co-Sponsored Content.
The Services may contain certain co-sponsored content, and you may be requested to provide additional Personal Information to the co-sponsor of such content. The information practices of any third-party co-sponsors are governed by their own privacy policies and are not covered by this Privacy Policy.
Third-Party Analytics Providers.
We use one or more third-party analytics services to evaluate your use of the Services by compiling reports on activity (based on their collection of information such as IP addresses, Internet service provider, browser type, operating system and language, referring and exit pages and URLs, data and time, amount of time spent on particular pages, what sections of the Services you visit, number of links clicked, search terms, and other similar usage data) and analyzing performance metrics. These third parties use cookies and other tracking technologies to help collect, analyze, and provide us with reports or other data. These third-party analytics services include:
Google Analytics
. We use Google Analytics on the Services to help us analyze the traffic on the Services. For more information on Google Analytics’ processing of Personal Information, please see
here
. You may opt out of the use of Google Analytics
here
.
Scorecard.
We use Scorecard to measure digital consumption behavior data, which may include information about online activities, and video streaming activities, among other activities, as part of its broad market research efforts. For more information regarding Scorecard’s privacy practices please visit
here
.
Parse.ly.
We use Parse.ly to assess content performance. For more information regarding Parse.ly’s privacy practices, please visit
here
.
ComScore.
We use Comscore to assess the performance of our Servies. For information about ComScore’s privacy practices, please visit
here
.
For US Residents: By accessing and using the Services, you consent to the processing of data about you by these analytics providers in the manner and for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy.
For Residents Outside the US: A cookie banner will be displayed to users of our Services located outside the US, which will invite users to give their consent, where applicable, and will provide further options about the management of cookies.
For more information on these third-party analytics providers, including how to opt out from certain data collection, please visit the web sites and opt out via each providers’ privacy policies. You may also take steps to opt out via the methods listed in this Privacy Policy. Please be advised that if you opt out of any third-party data collection, you may not be able to use the full functionality of the Services.
Third-Party Ad Servers and Networks.
We use third-party advertising companies to serve ads when you visit the Services.
When you view an advertisement, whether or not you click on it, the advertiser, advertising technology companies, web analytics companies, and service providers that perform advertising-related services for us and our business partners may collect some information from or about you. These companies may use information about your visits to the Services, the geographic location where your IP address indicates you are located, and other information about you to provide advertisements about goods and services of interest to you. These advertisements may appear in our Services and on other online properties or mobile applications. These companies may employ tracking technologies to cause relevant ads to be displayed to you. We do not control any such tracking technologies employed by these third parties that may appear in our Services or other online properties or mobile applications. The information practices of these third parties are governed by their own privacy policies and are not covered by this Privacy Policy.
For US Residents: By accessing and using the Services, you consent to the processing of data about you by these advertising providers in the manner and for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy.
For Residents Outside the US: A cookie banner will be displayed to users of the Services who are located outside the US, which will invite users to give their consent, where applicable, and will provide further options in respect of the management of cookies.
For more information about third-party advertisers:
For more information about third-party advertisers and how to prevent them from using your information, please visit the
Network Advertising Initiative’s Consumer Opt-Out Page available here.
To opt out of interest-based advertising by participating Digital Advertising Alliance members:
For US residents, please go to:
https://optout.aboutads.info/
For Canadian residents, please go to:
https://youradchoices.ca/choices
For residents of the EU, Switzerland and the UK, please go to:
https://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
You may also visit the web sites of the third parties set forth below. Please note that this list may be subject to change based on the campaigns that we run.
Connatix:
https://www.connatix.com/privacy-policy
Taboola:
https://www.taboola.com/policies/privacy-policy
or Taboola’s Trust Center at:
https://help.taboola.com/hc/en-us/articles/360004904154-Taboola-s-Trust-Center
Nativo:
https://www.nativo.com/about/adchoices
Google Publisher Tags:
https://support.google.com/admanager/answer/7678538?hl=en
Google Ad Settings:
https://adssettings.google.com/anonymous?ref=mac-hub&hl=en
Verve:
https://verve.com/privacy-policy/
Smaato:
https://www.smaato.com/privacy/
Wunderkind:
https://www.wunderkind.co/privacy/
Pubmatic:
https://pubmatic.com/legal/opt-out/
OpenX:
https://www.openx.com/privacy-center/privacy-policy/
Sovrn:
https://www.sovrn.com/privacy-policy/privacy-policy/
Comscore:
http://www.scorecardresearch.com/preferences.aspx
(to opt out of data collected by Comscore globally) or
https://optout.aboutads.info/?c=2&lang=EN
(to opt out of Comscore’s sharing for Internet-Based Advertising purposes)
LiveIntent:
https://www.liveintent.com/services-privacy-policy/
InMobi:
https://www.inmobi.com/privacy-policy
In some instances, we collect data and work with third parties to show you personalized ads of behalf of our advertisers. For example:
LiveRamp. To opt out of LiveRamp, please visit
here
.
Meta Pixel and Google Pixel. As detailed above (see Section 5 of this Privacy Policy), we use Meta Pixel and Google Pixel to better measure, optimize, and retarget our marketing campaigns. For information on Meta’s use of personalized ads, please visit
here
. For information on Google’s use of personalized ads, please visit
here
.
Cross-App Advertising on Mobile Apps. You can opt out of having your mobile device IDs used for certain types of interest-based mobile advertising (also called “cross-app advertising”), including by accessing the settings on your Apple or Android mobile device. For more detailed instructions on opting out of mobile device tracking, please visit
here
.
Please note that if you opt out of any third-party data collection described in this section, we may still suggest offerings (including content sponsored by third parties) to you on our Services based on your history or your account preferences.
7. Do Not Track Disclosures
Some web browsers may transmit “do-not-track” (“DNT”) signals to mobile applications with which the user communicates. We currently do not change our tracking practices (which are explained in more detail under “Service Usage Information” above) in response to DNT settings in your web browser.
8. Opt Out of E-mail Marketing
You can opt out of our promotional e-mails by clicking the opt-out/unsubscribe link within the e-mail you receive. Please understand that it may take us a few days to process any opt-out request, and that even if you opt out of receiving promotional correspondence from us, we may still contact you in connection with your relationship, activities, transactions, and communications with us.
9. Your Personal Information Rights and Choices
A. Notice to California Residents
The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”), as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (“CPRA”), provides California residents with certain rights regarding their personal information and requires businesses to provide residents with information about the collection and use of their personal information:
For information about opting out of the sale and sharing of personal information for targeted ads, please go to “Your Privacy Choices” in the web site menu in the upper left corner of the web site or footer of the web site.
For information about accessing, correcting, or deleting personal information, go
here
For information about categories of personal information we may disclose, go to Section 3 “With Whom Do We Share Personal Information We Collect?”
For information about our retention of your personal information, go to Section 12 “Data Retention.”
To opt out of the sale or sharing of your personal information, go
here
For information about the categories of personal information we collect and the purposes for which we use it, please see the table below:
Categories of Personal Information*
Examples of Personal Information*
Source(s)
Purpose(s)**
Contact Information, Account Information
Name, email address, phone number, address, password
User Provided
Providing the Services
Monitoring the Services
Responding to Inquiries and Fulfilling Requests
Communicating with You
Improving the Services
Personalizing the Services.
Advertising and Marketing to You
Providing Customer Service
Supporting Business Operations
Enforcing Agreements
Safety and Security
Fulfilling Other Purposes
Donation Information***
Name, country, postal code, donation amount, and financial or bank information (processed and stored by our payment processor, Stripe,
https://stripe.com/privacy
)
User Provided
Facilitating Donations
Personalizing the Services
Advertising and Marketing to You
Safety and Security
User-Generated Content, Feedback
Information, content, or comments that you submit to us, such as comments, photos, videos, audio, and text, whether submitted through online forms or social media platforms, by email, by phone, by mail, in surveys, or otherwise.
User Provided
Providing the Services
Responding to Inquiries and Fulfilling Requests
Communicating with You
Improving the Services
Personalizing the Services
Advertising and Marketing to You Providing Customer Service
Supporting Business Operations
Enforcing Agreements
Safety and Security
Fulfilling Other Purposes
Internet and Service Usage Information, Device Information and Identifiers
IP address (which we may associate with your domain name or that of your Internet access provider or wireless carrier, and your location); unique ID number associated with your device; other unique identifiers such as advertising identifiers; web browser and operating system information; language of your device; wireless connections you are using; referring page that linked you to us; your activities, including browsing and transaction history; Pages, content, and ads you view or click on during your use of the Services, and when and for how long you do so; the next web site you visit after leaving our web site; and search terms you enter on the Services or a referral site.
Automatically Collected
Providing the Services
Monitoring the Services
Improving the Services
Personalizing the Services
Advertising and Marketing to You Supporting Business Operations
Enforcing Agreements
Safety and Security
Fulfilling Other Purposes
Location Data
Geographic location of your mobile device (a “Mobile Service”) if you have consented to location services generally through your device’s settings or accepted our request for geolocation access.
Automatically Collected
Providing the Services
Monitoring the Services
Improving the Services
Personalizing the Services
Advertising and Marketing to You Supporting Business Operations
Enforcing Agreements
Safety and security
Fulfilling Other Purposes
Information from Public and Commercial Sources
This information may be obtained online, offline, or through publicly available resources. We may combine this information with information you provide and other data we already have about you.
Provided by Third Parties (such as our affiliates, business partners, service providers, and other third parties)
Providing the Services
Monitoring the Services
Improving the Services
Personalizing the Services
Advertising and Marketing to You Supporting Business Operations
Enforcing Agreements
Safety and security
Fulfilling Other Purposes
Social Media Information
The information we may receive from these third parties is governed by the privacy settings, policies and/or procedures of the applicable platforms.
Provided by Third Parties (social media platforms when you interact with us on those platforms or access our social media content)
Providing the Services
Monitoring the Services
Improving the Services
Personalizing the Services
Advertising and Marketing to You Supporting Business Operations
Enforcing Agreements
Safety and security
Fulfilling Other Purposes
* For additional information about the categories of personal information we collect, go to Section 1 “What Personal Information May We Collect?”
** For additional information about the purposes for which we collect personal information, go to Section 2 “How May We Use Your Personal Information?”
*** Financial and bank information required when making donations may be considered “sensitive” under certain laws, and we process this information in accordance with applicable laws.
California’s
Shine the Light Law: Pursuant to Section 1798.83 of the California Civil Code, residents of California have the right to obtain certain information about the types of Personal Information that companies with whom they have an established business relationship (and that are not otherwise exempt) have shared with third parties for direct marketing purposes during the preceding calendar year, including the names and addresses of those third parties, and examples of the types of services or products marketed by those third parties. If you wish to submit a request pursuant to Section 1798.83, go
here
.
B. US Residents
Residents of certain US States have state-law rights regarding use of their Personal Information. While some of these laws may not apply to not-for-profit organizations, we permit residents of these states to exercise similar control over their Personal Information. If you are a resident of a US state that does not currently have applicable laws in effect, you may not be able to make these privacy choices at this time, but your ability to do so may change as data privacy laws change.
Opt Out of Sale of Personal Information and Sharing/Processing for Targeted Ads.
For California, Colorado, Connecticut, Oregon, Utah, and Virginia Residents Only.
Tracking Technologies.
To opt out of the sale or sharing/processing of your Personal Information for targeted ads for the site/app on your browser/device via tracking technologies, go to “Your Privacy Choices” on our web site, which you can access by going to the navigation menu (upper left corner of our web site), then scrolling down to and clicking on “Your Privacy Choices.” When opt-out preference signals are detected, they will be honored. As you make your privacy choices, please keep in mind the following:
If you decide not to allow the sale of Personal Information or sharing/processing of Personal Information for targeted ads, you will continue to see ads, but they may be less relevant or based only on information that we collect directly from your use of the Services.
Choices related to tracking technologies (including cookies and device identifiers) are specific to the site/app on the browser/device where you are making the selection, meaning that you must make Your Privacy Choices
selections on each site/app on each browser/device you use to access our web site.
You must renew your selections for Your Privacy Choices each time you clear your cookies.
Name, Email, and Associated Personal Information (“Do Not Sell or Share/Process My Personal Information for Targeted Ads”).
We do not sell your Personal Information in exchange for monetary consideration. Our use of certain technologies described in this Privacy Policy may be interpreted as sharing your Personal Information for targeted advertising. You can opt out of the use of your name, email, and other associated Personal Information for targeted advertising activities by completing and submitting our
Do Not Sell or Share/Process My Personal Info Form
.
Access, Correct, or Delete Personal Information.
For California, Colorado, Connecticut, Oregon, Utah, and Virginia Residents Only.
Residents of states with relevant laws may make the following requests regarding use of Personal Information:
Request to Access Information.
You may request that we confirm whether we are collecting or processing your Personal Information. Depending on relevant law, you may ask us to provide access to certain information we hold about you, in some cases in a portable format, if technically feasible
Request to Delete Information
. You may request that we delete your Personal Information that we have collected from you. We will honor your request to the extent we are able to, but please not that we may have reason to deny or limit your request, such as a legal obligation to retain information or to provide goods or services that you have requested.
Request to Correct Personal Information
. You may request that we maintain accurate Personal Information about you and correct any inaccuracies in your Personal Information that we have collected from you, subject to exceptions within the law.
Request to Limit Use and Disclosure of Sensitive Personal Information
. California law permits residents to limit the use or disclosure of their “Sensitive Personal Information” as defined under relevant law. We generally do not collect or process Sensitive Personal Information. In the event we do process Sensitive Personal Information, we will not use or disclose it other than for disclosed and permitted business purposes as allowed under relevant law.
To make a request to access, correct, or delete your Personal Information, you may make this request
here
.
Authorized Agent
.
Depending on relevant law, you may authorize another person (your “agent”) to submit a request on your behalf.
Processing Requests.
Once you submit your request, we will contact you with instructions for how to verify the request. We strive to complete verified requests as soon as reasonably practicable and consistent with relevant law. Please note that it may take additional time to verify and fulfill agent-submitted requests. Also note that many of the above requests are subject to exceptions and limitations.
Nondiscrimination.
We will not discriminate against (as defined in relevant laws) you because you exercise any of your privacy rights or choices contained in this Privacy Policy.
C. Residents Outside the US
Residents of some countries outside the US, such as the EEA and the UK, have the rights, in certain circumstances, to: (i) require us to delete your Personal Information, (ii) require us to restrict processing of your Personal Information (also referred to as Personal Data) (for example, if you contest the accuracy of that information), (iii) receive a copy of the Personal Information you provided to us in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and/or instruct us to transmit that data to a third party, and (iv) object to our continued processing of your Personal Information, for direct marketing (including profiling) or other purposes. If you reside in one of these countries, you can exercise these rights
here
.
You may object to Personal Information processed pursuant to our legitimate interest (see Section 10 for information about our legitimate interest as a legal basis). In such case, we will no longer process your Personal Information unless we can demonstrate appropriate, overriding legitimate grounds for the processing or if needed for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims. You may also object at any time to processing of your Personal Information for direct marketing purposes. You may make these objections
here
.
You may also object at any time to processing of your Personal Information for direct marketing purposes by clicking “Opt Out” or “Unsubscribe” within an automated marketing email. In such case, your Personal Information will no longer be used for that purpose.
D. Ad Blocking Recovery
We use data to support digital advertising activities on our Services that help us bring AP’s fast, accurate and unbiased news to you at no cost. We respect our users’ desire to limit the ads they receive. For instance, you may be able to limit your receipt of targeted ads (see above in Section 9). We also want you to be aware that, if you use an adblocker, the adblocker’s default settings could include your provision of consent to ads that meet certain standards, which may include some of the ads we serve through our Services. To change that setting, please go to your adblocker's settings.
10. What Is Our Legal Basis for Use of Your Personal Information?
The laws of some jurisdictions, such as the EEA and the UK, require us to tell you about the legal basis for using, sharing, or disclosing your Personal Information. To the extent those laws apply, we may rely on the following legal bases:
Consent
- The consent you provide to us at the point of collection of your Personal Information. Where we rely on this basis, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time (see Your Personal Information Rights and Choices in Section 9).
Contract
- The performance of a contract we have with you.
Legal Obligation
- The compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject.
Legitimate Interest
– Where use of your Personal Information is necessary for our or third parties’ legitimate interests and where the use is not outweighed by your rights and interests. Legitimate interests include: providing the Services; improving the Services and developing new ones; recognizing and better understanding our users; conducting security and fraud-prevention activities; marketing and promoting our content and Services; conducting compliance and risk-management activities; ensuring the network and information security of our systems.
11. Children’s Privacy
We care about protecting the privacy of children. You must be at least eighteen (18) years of age to submit any User Content or personal information on or through the Services, register for an account, or purchase any goods or services. If you are between the ages of thirteen (13) and 18, you may view the Services with the consent of your parent or legal guardian, provided that you do not engage in any of the activities prohibited in the prior sentence. We do not knowingly collect personal information of individuals under the age of 18. If we learn that we have collected personal information from a child under 18, we will delete it in accordance with applicable law. If you have reason to believe that a child under the age of 18 has provided personal information to us, please contact us at
privacy@ap.org
, and we will endeavor to delete that information from our databases.
12. Data Retention
We will retain your personal information while you have an account with us. If you do not have an account with us, or if your account terminates for any reason, we will retain your personal information for as long as we have a legitimate need to retain it. Thereafter, we will either delete your personal information or de-identify it so that it is anonymous and not attributed to your identity.
13. Contact Us
To submit requests to Opt Out of Sale and Sharing/Processing of Personal Information for Targeted Ads and Requests to Access, Correct, or Delete Personal Information, whether for yourself or as an authorized agent, please follow the instructions provided in the “Your Personal Information Rights and Choices” section of this Privacy Policy. Alternatively, you may contact us by phone at 212.621.1599.
If you have any questions or comments regarding our privacy practices, you may contact us as follows:
By email:
Privacy@ap.org
New York Office: The Associated Press, 200 Liberty Street, New York, NY 10281, 212.621.1500
London Office: The Associated Press Television News Limited, The Interchange, Oval Road, Camden Lock, London, NW1 7DZ, (44-20) 7482-7400
We aim to resolve any query or concern you may raise about our use of your information. Please note that individuals located in the EEA or the UK have the right to lodge a complaint with an applicable supervisory authority.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://stripe.com/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connected Account Agreement
Stripe Payments Company Terms
Acquirer Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Cross River Bank
Deutsche Bank
Goldman Sachs Bank USA
PNC Bank
Issuing Bank Terms
Payment Method Terms
User Bank Debit Authorizations
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Other Products and Programs
Stripe Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Terminal Purchase Terms
Stripe Terminal Reseller Terms
Stripe Atlas Agreement
Stripe Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Privacy Shield Policy
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
E-SIGN Disclosure
Licenses
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services,
Learn More
, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 1
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/:
Facebook
Email or phone
Password
Forgot account?
Create new account
It looks like you were misusing this feature by going too fast. You’ve been temporarily blocked from using it.
Back
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 2
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/:

Sub-policy 3
https://jwplayer.com/legal/privacy/:
Terms of Service
Terms of Service
Beta Program Agreement
SIMS Terms of Service
SIMS User Terms
Policies & Guidelines
DMCA Copyright Policy
Content Guidelines
Data & Privacy
Data Processing Agreement
Subprocessors
Privacy Policy
Privacy Policy
Effective: October 11, 2024
Our Privacy Policy describes the information collection practices of JW Player’s corporate website, our other owned websites, and the proprietary technology that we use to perform services for our customers.
Table of Contents
Introduction
A. Corporate Website at www.jwplayer.com
Information Collected by the Corporate Website
About Personal Data
About Usage Data and Tracking Data
Your Choices on the Corporate Website
Service Providers
Transfer of Information
B. JW Player Technology
Information Collected by JW Player Technology About Users
About Usage Data and Tracking Data
User Choices for the JW Player Technology
Transfer of Information
C. Showcase Website
Showcase Websites are Powered by the JW Player Technology
Service Providers
D. Other Information
About Data Security
Links to Other Sites
Children’s Privacy
E. How to Contact JW Player
Introduction
JW Player (legally known as JWP, Inc.) is a leading video player software and video management platform (collectively, the “
JW Player Technology
”). Our customers are businesses that use the JW Player Technology to host, embed and stream, and deliver advertising to, digital video over the web (collectively, the “
JW Player Services
”).
JW Player has prepared this Privacy Policy to describe our practices regarding the information we collect from:
Visitors to our website located at
www.jwplayer.com
(the “
Corporate Website
”), including all subdomains,
Users who watch our customers’ videos on websites, apps, mobile apps, and other software powered by the JW Player Technology (each, a “
Customer Property
”) using a desktop or laptop PC, mobile phone, tablet, connected TV, set-top box, kiosk, virtual reality hardware, or other device, and
Visitors to our other owned-and-operated websites (each, a “
JW Player Website
”), including
www.jwshowcase.com
and
tv.jwplayer.com
.
This Privacy Policy does
not
describe the information collection practices of our customers that use the JW Player Technology on their Customer Properties. We are a third-party service provider to our customers. We recommend that you refer to our customers’ privacy policies to learn about their information collection practices.
Changes to this Privacy Policy.
JW Player will update this Privacy Policy to reflect changes to our practices. We will post all Privacy Policy changes on this page and, if the changes are significant, we will provide a more prominent notice. The Privacy Policy posted on this page will say when that version went into effect. If you visit the Corporate Website or view a video on a Customer Property after a change, then you will have accepted JW Player’s new Privacy Policy. You are advised to review our Privacy Policy periodically for any changes.
A. Corporate Website at
www.jwplayer.com
1. Information Collected By The Corporate Website
Our Corporate Website provides information about our company, business, and the services we provide. It is also the portal used by our customers to sign into the customer dashboard for the JW Player Services.
The Corporate Website collects Personal Data, Usage Data, and Tracking Data when you visit the site at
www.jwplayer.com
.
As used in our discussion about the Corporate Website in this Section A:
“
Personal Data
” is the information about an individual that can be used to identify that individual. If you access the Corporate Website from the EEA, Switzerland or the UK, we use a
different definition of Personal Data
to comply with the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).
“
Tracking Data
” is the information collected by cookies and similar tracking technologies (e.g., pixel tags, web beacons, or scripts) that we use to keep track of visitor activity on the Corporate Website. (Note that the Tracking Data collected by the JW Player Technology is different, and is discussed in Section B.)
Cookies
are small files that contain a small amount of data, typically including a unique identifier. They are generally placed on your browser by a website or other browser-based service. Our Corporate Website uses cookies.
Other tracking technologies
, in the context of the Corporate Website, include pixel tags, web beacons, and scripts, and are used to track usage and performance. (See Section B below for the tracking technologies used by the JW Player Technology.)
“
Usage Data
”, in the context of the Corporate Website, is the information that your browser sends to JW Player’s servers when you visit the Corporate Website.
As with other Internet services, our web servers gather information automatically each time your browser or device interacts with the Corporate Website, and store that information in “log files.” The information stored in our web servers’ log files includes information that we call Personal Data, Usage Data and Tracking Data, and that we describe more fully in the following sections.
Note for visitors who access the Corporate Website from the EEA, Switzerland or the UK:
a. Personal Data.
In the EEA, Switzerland and the UK, Personal Data is defined differently than in the U.S., and means a variety of data that identifies or can identify a particular unique user or device (e.g., names, addresses, cookie identifiers, mobile device identifiers, precise location data and biometric data). For visitors who access the Corporate Website from the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, elements of Usage Data and Tracking Data – such as a visitor’s full Internet Protocol (IP) address, and the information that we associate with a unique identifier (like a cookie or other tracking technology) – are Personal Data under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).
b. Legal grounds for processing your Personal Data when accessing the Corporate Website.
For visitors who access the Corporate Website from the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, we process your Personal Data for the purposes set out in Section A.2. on one or more of the following legal grounds:
You provided your consent;
It is necessary for our contractual relationship;
The processing is necessary for us to comply with our legal or regulatory obligations; and/or
The processing is in our or a relevant data controllers’ legitimate interest, for instance, where we use data to protect the security and integrity of our systems and to provide services or other benefits.
Note for California Residents who visit our Corporate Website(s):
If you have provided us with your personal information (for instance, if we met you at a trade show or you sign up to receive product emails), you have certain rights as to which you may contact us directly. Please contact us at privacy@jwplayer.com if you would to exercise any of the following rights under the CCPA:
If you would like to know the personal information we have collected or disclosed about you in the last twelve months; the categories of sources of such information; the business or commercial purpose for collecting your personal information (we do not sell this information); or the categories of third parties with whom we shared personal information, please contact us at privacy@jwplayer.com;
If you would like us to delete information we have about you, please likewise contact us at privacy@jwplayer.com;
If you would like to “opt out” of receiving marketing from us, e.g., emails about our service or product enhancements, please likewise contact us at privacy@jwplayer.com;
If you would like to “opt out” of any ad targeting that occurs from our website(s) – for instance, if we “retarget” consumers who visit our website with an ad about a webinar or event we are holding or products we offer – please go to either the NAI opt-out portal or the DAA opt-out portal, two industry website that offer consumer choices regarding personalized advertising. This type of advertising is offered by third party service providers we may work with, most (or all) of whom are listed on the above “opt out” websites.
If you would like more information about the Tracking Data we may share with our advertising partner, NextRoll, Inc., please see the
California Residents section of NextRoll’s Privacy Notice.
2. About Personal Data
a. Personal Data Collected by the Corporate Website.
Personal Data includes your name, email address, postal address, and telephone number. It also includes any information that we have associated with your Personal Data.
The Corporate Website collects Personal Data from you when you engage in any of the following:
Request information about a product or service on the Corporate Website.
Register on the Corporate Website for emails, newsletters or other communications.
As an employee or authorized agent of a JW Player Service, use a login account on the Corporate Website to access the customer dashboard for the JW Player Technology.
We may combine Personal Data that you submit on or through the Corporate Website with information that we collect from and about you from other sources, offline and online.
b. How We May Use Personal Data.
We use the Personal Data that you provide on the Corporate Website for the following activities:
Provide the services that you request.
Send you administrative information, including information regarding changes to the Corporate Website’s terms, conditions and policies.
Personalize your experience on the Corporate Website (including through the use of cookies and similar technologies).
Send you messages that you request.
Target you to receive ads and other marketing messages from us about the JW Player Services.
For our business purposes, such as data analysis, audits, developing new products, enhancing the Corporate Website, improving our services, and identifying usage trends and determining the effectiveness of our marketing.
As we believe appropriate (a) to comply with applicable law and legal process, including to respond to valid requests by public authorities (e.g., a court, government agency, or law enforcement), (b) to enforce our terms and conditions, (c) to prevent or investigate possible wrongdoing in connection with the Corporate Website, JW Player Technology, JW Player Services or the like, (d) to protect our operations or those of our affiliates, (e) to protect our rights, property, privacy, safety, or that of our affiliates, you or others, or (f) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain (these purposes, collectively, the “
Compliance Purposes
”).
c. When We May Disclose Personal Data.
The Personal Data that you provide to the Corporate Website may be disclosed:
Service Providers.
To our third-party service providers who provide services such as hosting, data analysis, IT infrastructure, IT services, customer service, email delivery, payment processing, billing and collections, data enhancement, order fulfillment, auditing, security, fraud, and other services to enable them to provide such services. These third parties have access to your Personal Data only to perform these tasks on our behalf.
Transfer of Business.
To a third party to which we have transferred our business, assets or stock if JW Player is involved in a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of some or all of our business, assets or stock, including during due diligence related to any such transaction (and also including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceeding).
As we believe appropriate for
Compliance Purposes
.
d. How Long We Retain Personal Data.
We retain your Personal Data for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy, unless a longer retention period is required for the security or integrity of the Corporate Website, or to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, or enforce our legal agreements or policies.
e. No Sensitive Information.
Please do not disclose through the Corporate Website any sensitive Personal Data (e.g., social security numbers, detailed financial information, health information, information related to racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religion or other beliefs, criminal background or trade union membership).
3. About Usage Data and Tracking Data
a. Usage Data and Tracking Data Collected by the Corporate Website.
The Usage Data and Tracking Data collected by the Corporate Website include:
Information collected through cookies, pixel tags and other tracking technologies.
Browser type and version.
Your Internet Protocol (IP) address.
If you are accessing the Corporate Website through a mobile phone, tablet, connected TV, set-top box, kiosk, virtual reality hardware, or other device: the type of device, unique device ID, device IP address, device operating system, and diagnostic data.
Information about how you interact with the Corporate Website, such as the date and time of your visit, the pages that you visit, and the time spent on those pages.
Other aggregated information.
b. How We May Collect Usage Data and Tracking Data.
Usage Data and Tracking Data are collected by the Corporate Website:
When your browser or device sends it.
Standard information is sent by most browsers. This information includes your device type, screen resolution, operating system version, and Internet browser type and version.
Through web technologies.
We and our service providers may use cookies, pixel tags, web beacons, and other similar technologies to, among other things, facilitate your ongoing access to and use of the Corporate Website, present you with more tailored information about our products and services, and collect and store information about your use of the Corporate Website.
When you volunteer it.
You may volunteer demographic information, as well as other information, such as your preferred means of communication.
Through activity reports.
Information about how you interact with the Corporate Website is collected with every visit, and is used to determine usage levels, diagnose server problems, and operate and maintain the Corporate Website.
By aggregating information.
We may aggregate or de-identify information collected by the Corporate Website.
c. How We May Use and Disclose Usage Data and Tracking Data.
We may use and disclose Usage Data and Tracking Data collected on the Corporate Website for any purpose permitted by applicable law.
Our advertising partner, NextRoll, Inc., may use Tracking Data to serve targeted advertising to other devices connected to you (via cross-device tracking). For more information, please see NextRoll’s
Privacy Notice
.
Note: If we are required by law to treat any element of Usage Data or Tracking Data as Personal Data, then we will handle those elements as Personal Data. If we combine any Usage Data or Tracking Data with Personal Data, we will treat the combined information as Personal Data as long as it is combined.
4. Your Choices On The Corporate Website Regarding Your Personal Data
a. Your Choices Regarding Cookies.
If you do not want cookies on the Corporate Website to collect information about you, there is a simple procedure on most devices that allows you to decline the use of cookies. To learn more about cookies, please visit
www.allaboutcookies.org/
. However, if you choose to decline cookies, then some or all of the features, functionality and promotions available through the Corporate Website may not be available to you.
b. How You Can Access, Change or Delete the Personal Data About You Collected by The Corporate Website.
If you have a login to the Corporate Website (
i.e.
, you are a JW Player customer), you can log into your account to access, delete, or make changes to the Personal Data we have on file for your account.
If you do not have a login to the Corporate Website (
e.g.
, a prospective customer or a website visitor) and would like to access, change, or delete the Personal Data that you have previously provided to the Corporate Website, you can contact us by emailing us at
privacy@jwplayer.com
to make the requested changes. We will comply with your request as soon as reasonably practicable. If you have requested that some Personal Data be deleted, note that we may need to retain some of the information for backup or Compliance Purposes. In addition, there could remain residual traces of the deleted Personal Data in our databases and other records. We are not responsible for changing or deleting information from the databases of third parties that have previously accessed your information.
c. Your Choices Regarding Messaging.
You may opt out from receiving marketing-related messages from us either by using the unsubscribe mechanism provided in the message or by emailing us at
privacy@jwplayer.com
. If you opt out from receiving marketing-related messages from us, we may still send administrative messages to you. You cannot opt out from receiving administrative messages.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority as to our processing of data. However, we hope that you will first consult with us, by emailing us at privacy@jwplayer.com or writing us at JWP, Inc., 530 7th Avenue, Suite 1906, New York, NY 10018 so that we may work with you to resolve any complaint or concern you might have.
The Corporate Website does not support the Do Not Track browser setting.
5. Service Providers
We use third party companies and individuals to provide services and functionality for the Corporate Website. These service providers may have access to your Personal Data in order to perform tasks on our behalf (
e.g.
, to send you information that you request or that we believe is of interest to you).
JW Player uses third-party advertising companies to advertise JW Player and the JW Player Services. We allow these service providers to use their tracking technologies on the Corporate Website so that we can target ads about JW Player to you when you are elsewhere on the Internet. This process is sometimes referred to as interest-based advertising or online behavioral advertising. If you want more information about these third-party advertising companies, or if you wish to opt out of this type of advertising, please visit the ad industry choice mechanism at
www.aboutads.info/choices/
.
6. Transfer Of Information.
As JW Player works with global companies and technologies, we may need to transfer your Personal Data outside of the country from which it was originally provided. This may be intra-group or to third parties that we work with who are likely located outside of your state, province, country or other governmental jurisdiction where the data protection laws may differ from those in your jurisdiction. If you are located outside the United States and choose to provide information to us, please note that we transfer the data, including Personal Data, to the United States and process it there.
Note for visitors who access the Corporate Website from the EEA, Switzerland or the UK:
If we transfer Personal Data outside of the EEA, Switzerland or the UK, we will take steps to make sure that appropriate safeguards are in place to protect your Personal Data.
B. JW Player Technology
1. Information Collected By JW Player Technology About Users
Our customers are primarily web publishers (each, a “
Customer
”) that deploy JW Player Technology on their
Customer Properties
to provide their visitors (each, a “
User
”) with a high-quality video viewing experience. In Section B, we describe the information that is collected from Users who view videos and ads on a Customer Property. The JW Player Technology collects
Usage Data
and
Tracking Data
from Users.
Note that the Tracking Technologies used in the JW Player Technology are different from the Tracking Technologies used on the Corporate Website.
2. About Usage Data And Tracking Data
a. Usage Data and Tracking Data Collected by the JW Player Technology.
The JW Player Technology collects Usage Data and Tracking Data from a User when he or she views video on a Customer Property. As used in our discussion about the JW Player Technology in this Section B:
“
Usage Data
” is the information that a User’s browser automatically sends to JW Player’s servers when a User accesses video or sees an ad on a Customer Property. This information includes a User’s device type, screen resolution, operating system version, and Internet browser type and version.
“
Tracking Data
” is the information collected by the JW Player Technology from Users who access videos on a Customer Property, and consists primarily of the following:
1. Proprietary tracking technologies
used by the JW Player Technology for video delivery and performance reporting. These tracking technologies include the following:
Local ID, which is stored on a User’s computer to identify a User’s player on a given Customer Property.
Global ID, which is stored on a User’s browser and JW Player’s servers and identifies a User across different players and Customer Properties.
The JW Player Technology does not assign a Global ID to Users whose Internet Protocol (IP) addresses are based in the EEA, Switzerland and the UK.
Viewer ID, which is stored on JW Player’s servers to identify a User. Other tracking technologies include pixel tags, web beacons, and scripts, and are used for ad delivery and reporting.
As with other Internet services, our web servers gather information automatically each time a User’s browser or device interacts with the JW Player Technology, and store that information in “
log files.
” The information stored in our web servers’ log files includes Usage Data and Tracking Data. The Usage Data and Tracking Data collected by the JW Player Technology include:
Information collected through tracking technologies.
Browser type and version.
User’s Internet Protocol (IP) address.
Unique identifiers set by our tracking technologies to identify video players, Users, and video sessions.
If a User is accessing the JW Player Technology through a mobile phone, tablet, connected TV, set-top box, kiosk, virtual reality hardware, or other device: the type of device, unique device ID, device IP address, device operating system, and diagnostic data.
Information about how a User interacts with the JW Player Technology, such as the date and time of a User’s visit, the videos watched, and the time spent watching those videos.
Other aggregated information.
Note for visitors who access the JW Player Technology from the EEA, Switzerland or the UK:
Personal Data.
As previously noted, some elements of Usage Data and Tracking Data – for example, a visitor’s full Internet Protocol (IP) address, and the information that we associate with a unique identifier (like a cookie or other tracking technology) – are Personal Data under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), and we treat those elements as Personal Data when collected by the JW Player Technology from Users whose IP addresses are based in the EEA, Switzerland or the UK. Note that the JW Player Technology does not assign a Global ID to a User accessing the JW Player Technology from an EEA, Swiss or UK IP address. We will retain those elements of Usage Data and Tracking Data that are Personal Data under the GDPR for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy, unless a longer retention period is required for the security or integrity of the JW Player Services or JW Player Technology, or to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, or enforce our legal agreements or policies.
Legal grounds for processing Personal Data on Customer Properties.
For Users who access the JW Player Technology from IP addresses in the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, we process the elements of Usage Data and Tracking Data that are considered Personal Data under the GDPR. The GDPR makes a distinction between organizations that process Personal Data for their own purposes (known as “
data controllers
”) and organizations that process Personal Data on behalf of other organizations (known as “
data processors
”). When we handle Personal Data strictly on behalf of our customers in order to provide our services to them, as is the case with the JW Player Technology, we are a data processor and our customers, as the data controllers, have primary responsibility for your Personal Data and are responsible for obtaining a legal basis to collect such data. If you have questions about Personal Data that is used primarily by a Customer Property on which the JW Player Technology is embedded or utilized, you should contact those companies with your questions about how they handle your Personal Data.
With that in mind, if you have concerns about JW Player, you may contact our privacy officer, at
privacy@jwplayer.com
.
**Note for California Residents who visit our Customer Properties** Similar to the above, when our technology is employed on a website (or a mobile property or other service), we generally act as a “service provider” to the website provider for purposes of the California Consumer Privacy Act – i.e., providing them services to help them display, curate and/or integrate content shown through our player technology. Thus, if you If you have questions about personal information collected or used by a Customer Property on which the JW Player Technology is embedded or utilized, you should contact the particular website or content provider that you are engaging with. (If you have questions about information that we collect when you visit our Corporate Website(s), please go to SectionA(1).
b. How We May Use Usage Data and Tracking Data.
We use Usage Data and Tracking Data collected by the JW Player Technology for the following purposes:
Deliver video to Customer Properties, and ads on behalf of advertisers.
Recommend videos that a User may enjoy.
Prepare reports and analytics for our customers.
For our other business purposes, such as data analysis, identifying usage trends, diagnosing technical problems, operating, maintaining, enhancing and improving the JW Player Technology and JW Player Service, and developing new products and services.
As we believe appropriate for
Compliance Purposes
.
c. When We May Disclose Usage and Tracking Data.
We may disclose Usage Data and Tracking Data collected by the JW Player Technology for the following purposes:
Service Providers.
To third-party service providers who provide services such as hosting, data analysis, IT infrastructure, IT services, customer service, auditing, security, fraud, and other similar functions to us or our Customers. These third parties have access to User Usage and Tracking Data to perform these tasks on our behalf.
Transfer of Business.
To a third party to which we have transferred our business, assets or stock in the event that JW Player is involved in a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of some or all of our business, assets or stock, including during due diligence related to any such transaction (and also including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceeding).
As we believe appropriate for
Compliance Purposes
.
3. User Choices For The JW Player Technology
a. For Users who access the JW Player Technology from the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK: The Do Not Track Browser Setting.
Certain versions of the JW Player Technology support Do Not Track for Users in the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK. Do Not Track is a preference Users can set in their web browser to inform websites that they do not want to be tracked. Users can enable or disable Do Not Track by visiting the Preferences or Settings page of their web browser. We make reasonable efforts to maintain compatibility between our technology and Do Not Track functionality across different web browsers. However, you should be aware that, despite our reasonable efforts, there may be circumstances in which a particular Do Not Track setting is not recognized and honored.
Note that even if a User enables and JW Player recognizes Do Not Track, the JW Player Technology will continue to collect Usage Data about each visit to a Customer Property, because Usage Data are automatically sent by the User’s web browser. However, the Usage Data will not be associated with a unique identifier, and the JW Player Technology will not be able to associate such User Data collected with User.
b. Check Our Customers’ Privacy Policy.
Users interact with the JW Player Technology, because our Customers have implemented the JW Player Technology in their Customer Properties. We recommend that Users check the privacy policy of the Customer Properties that they visit for information about the user choices available from our Customers. Many Customer Properties use third-party advertising companies for interest-based advertising or online behavioral advertising. If you want more information about these third-party advertising companies, please visit the ad industry choice mechanism at
www.aboutads.info/choices/
.
4. For Users Who Access The JW Player Technology From The EEA, Switzerland, And The UK: Transfer Of Information.
See Section A.6 for information regarding those elements of Usage Data and Tracking Data that are Personal Information under the GDPR.
5. SERVICE PROVIDERS.
We work with third parties that provide services and functionality for the JW Player Technology. These service providers may have access to Usage Data and Tracking Data of the JW Player Technology in order to perform tasks on our behalf. Occasionally, we may give our service providers explicit permission to use the Usage Data or Tracking Data to enhance the fraud-detection, security, or other features of their services.At our Customers’ instruction, we work with the service providers of our Customers. We may provide Usage Data and Tracking Data collected on a Customer Property to that Customer’s service providers.
C. Showcase Websites
1. Showcase Websites Are Powered By The JW Player Technology
JW Player owns and operates the JW Showcase websites at
www.jwshowcase.com
and
tv.jwplayer.com
, and from time to time creates and runs other owned-and-operated websites. These owned-and-operated websites (each, a “
Showcase Website
”) provide Users with video content prepared by JW Player and our Customers.
The Showcase Website is powered by the JW Player Technology. The JW Player Technology collects Usage Data and Tracking Data when a User visits a Showcase Website. Please refer to Section B for information about the Usage Data and Tracking Data collected by the JW Player Technology.
2. Service Providers
In addition to the service providers described in Section B.5., we use third-party advertising companies to facilitate advertising on the Showcase Websites. We allow these service providers to use their tracking technologies on the Showcase Websites so that ads appear on a ShowcaseWebsite. If you want more information about these third-party advertising companies, please visit the ad industry choice mechanism at
www.aboutads.info/choices/
.
D. Other Information
1. About Data Security
JW Player employs security measures to prevent the loss, misuse or alteration of information collected by the Corporate Website, JW Player Websites, and JW Player Technology. However, no data transmission over the Internet or data security system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
2. Links To Other Sites
Our Corporate Website, JW Player Websites, and JW Player Technology may contain links to other sites that are not operated by us. If you click on a third party link, you will be directed to that third party’s site. We strongly advise you to review the Privacy Policy of every site you visit. We have no control over and assume no responsibility for the content, privacy policies or practices of any third party sites or services.
3. Children’s Privacy
The Corporate Website, JW Player Websites, and JW Player Technology are not targeted to anyone under the age of 13 (“Child”). Wedo not knowingly collect Personal Data from anyone under the age of 13, unless agreed in writing with a particular Customer. If we know that the Personal Data we have collected is from or about a Child, we place that Personal Data in a separate category for restrictive handling. If you are a parent or guardian and you are aware that your Child has provided us with Personal Data, please contact us. If we become aware that we have collected Personal Data from a Child without verification of parental consent, we will take steps to remove that information from our servers.
E. How to Contact JW Player
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
JWP, Inc.
530 7th Avenue, Suite 1906 New York, NY 10018
privacy@jwplayer.com
STATEMENT OF TCF COMPLIANCE
JWP, Inc., adheres to the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and is compliant with the Policies and Specifications therein. Our IAB Europe ID is 1046.
We use cookies to offer you a better browsing experience, analyze site traffic, and personalize our communications with you. Read about how we use cookies and how you can control them by clicking "Cookie Settings." By clicking “Accept and Continue,”, you consent to our use of cookies.
Privacy policy page.
Reject All
Accept and Continue
Cookies Settings
Your Privacy
Functional Cookies
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Targeting Cookies
Performance Cookies
Your Privacy
JW Player websites may request cookies to be set on your device. We use cookies to let us know when you visit our websites, how you interact with us, to enrich your user experience, and to customize your relationship with JW Player. Click on the different category headings to find out more. You can also change your cookie preferences. Note that blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience on our websites and the services we are able to offer.
More information.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 4
https://wearehearken.com/privacy-policies/:
US
/
Europe
Privacy Policy
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
5
EU partners, please read Hearken Northern Europe’s privacy policy
here
.
Version 2020.5 | Last updated on August 10, 2020 |
Archived versions
We at Hearken, Inc. (“Hearken”, “We”, “us”, “our”) take the responsibility of protecting your data and privacy very seriously.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) explains what data we collect, why we collect them, how we use them and how you can request to view, delete or amend your Personal Data.
This Policy applies to information that Hearken may collect about you in connection with your access and use of the following:
The “Websites” located at any of the following domains or their subdomains:
wearehearken.com
switchboardhq.com
engagementinnovator.com
thecitizensagenda.com
electionsos.com
democracysos.com
Other domains operated by us and from which you are accessing this Policy
U.S. subsidiaries of Hearken adhering to the Privacy Shield Principles including Civic SOS, Curious Nation Inc,
Democracy
SOS, Election SOS, Hearken Inc, Switchboard, and The Citizens Agenda
Our “Platforms” including the Hearken Engagement Management System Platform and Switchboard Community Management System
Our social media pages, mobile apps, and any other products and Services offered by Hearken collectively referred to as “Services”
Email messages that we send to you that link to this Privacy Policy
Other communications including customer support requests, surveys, and SMS texts in which you may provide your information to Hearken.
In this Policy, the Websites, Platform, mobile apps, social media pages, emails, and other electronic locations through which you may interact with Hearken to provide your information are collectively referred to as the “Sites.”
If you do not agree with this Privacy Policy, please do not access or use the Sites or Services.
Our Privacy Policy At a Glance
We collect only the minimum amount of personal information that is necessary to fulfill the purpose of your interaction with us.
We don’t sell you data to third-parties or advertise to you on our platforms or Sites.
We use cookies with your consent.
We share your data with others under certain circumstances including aiding law enforcement, using third-party Services, etc. See more
here
.
You may request to view, delete or change your personal data by sending a request to
privacy@wearehearken.com
We may be processing your data on behalf of one of our clients in which case we may direct your request to our client who controls the data.
Our privacy policy adheres to the principles and guidelines set by all major online privacy laws and frameworks that apply to us and our users including GDPR, CCPA, EU-US and Swiss-US Privacy Shield and PIPEDA
See our full Policy below for more information
1. About “Us”
As used in this Privacy Policy, “Hearken” refers to Hearken, Inc., together with its subsidiaries and affiliates, including Curious Nation, Inc. and Weathergram, Inc in the US and Hearken Northern Europe ApS providing consumer Services in the EU, Switzerland, and United Kingdom.
2. About “You”
“You” refers to individuals who access and use the Sites and/or Services.
For example, you may be a client of Hearken who accesses and uses the Sites and Services as the host or organizer of an event (“Client”), and with whom Hearken has entered into a Service Agreement or other agreement containing separate terms and conditions that govern delivery, access and use of the Sites and Services (a “Client Agreement”).
You may be the employee or agent of a Client, who is authorized to access the Platform as an administrator or an authenticated user.
You may be a visitor to our Website who is interested in browsing and learning more about Hearken or a visitor submitting information through our Platform or Services;
If you are invited to register for, check into, or receive information regarding a Client event or service through a Hearken Site or Service, you will be considered an “Event Attendee”
When we collect information from you, we may be doing so on our own behalf (in which case we will be considered a “Controller” of your data), or on behalf of a Hearken Client who is using the Services to solicit comments and feedback, from their stakeholders, manage communities, organize an event and manage other event-related activities (in which case, the Client will be the “Controller” and Hearken will be considered a “Processor” of your data).
3. Definitions
Homepage
: The site hosted at wearehearken.com which is used to provide information about the company, market our offerings, products and Services.
Services
: Includes all work done by Hearken including consultation Services, as well as online Services provided via our Engagement technology products and Sites.
Products
: Refers to our Engagement and Community technology Services.
User or End-user
: A person using our Services as an individual.
Customer
: Refers to an individual affiliated with an organization or organization that contracts with Hearken to use our Services.
Authorized User, Administrator, or Admin
: A user who is signed in to Hearken systems and is expressly permitted to access all or a subset of information and data stored on Hearken’s systems.
Personal Information, Personal Data, or Personally Identifiable Information (PII
):  Refers to the following types of information which may be identifiable to you when you register to use our Services, access various content or features, or directly contact the Site: (i) contact information, such as your email address and name; (ii) your age; and (iii) information for the purpose of authenticating yourself or your account if we have reason to believe, in our sole discretion, that you may be violating site policies or for any other reason we deem necessary.
Data Processor
: A natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which processes personal data on behalf of the Controller.
Data Controller
: The natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of personal data.
Third-party service
: A service that Hearken may use to process personal data.
Data Protection Legislation or Laws
: Means laws and regulations applicable to the processing of Personal Data under the Policy, the GDPR, the
EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles
, the Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield, the CCPA, PIPEDA, and the Nevada Act Relating to Internet Privacy (Senate Bill 220 or “SB 220”), to the extent applicable to such processing.
“GDPR
” means the General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/679 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 27 April 2016); and until 25 May 2018, the Directive 95/46/EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of 24 October 1995; and any applicable legislation adopted by any Member State of the European Union, or by the United Kingdom post its ceasing to be a Member State of the European Union.
The
EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles
and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shields
refer to the frameworks that were designed by the U.S. Department of Commerce, and the European Commission and Swiss Administration, respectively, to provide companies with a mechanism to comply with data protection requirements when transferring personal data from the European Union and Switzerland to the United States in support of transatlantic commerce. Hearken complies with the
EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles
and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Union and Switzerland to the United States. Hearken has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the
EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles
.
“CCPA”
means the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, which is referred to as Assembly Bill No. 375.  The CCPA became effective as of January 1, 2020.
“PIPEDA”
means the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (S.C. 2000, c. 5), a data privacy law enacted by the Parliament of Canada.
4. What data and information do we collect?
4.1 Information Given to Us by You
When you use Hearken’s products or Services directly or through one of our client organization’s websites, you share some personal information with us such as name, email address, password, demographic information and other information that may be considered personal information by various privacy laws.
When you register to attend or attend an event hosted or managed by Hearken, you provide us name and contact information.
You share your name and contact information when you subscribe to our email newsletters or other marketing or corporate communications.
4.2 Information We Collect from You
When you use our Services and products, we may collect your IP address, device and browser information.
4.3 Information We Infer from Your Data
To provide better service to you and to safeguard our systems and clients from abuse and fraud, we may make some inferences from the data you give us and the data we collect about you.
The various categories of data we collect and why we collect them are listed below.
Category
Use
Name or Username
We use it to identify your interactions.
Email address
We use it to contact you with our newsletters, offers, and updates you consented to receive. We may also use it to verify your identity and to send you notifications about anything that needs your attention on our Services.
IP address
We may collect your IP address when you use our systems. We use it to safeguard our systems and clients from abuse and fraud.
Other contact information such as phone numbers
Our clients may use our Services and products to collect your contact information other than email so that they can reach you regarding your submission.
Location information including country, city, postcode, and geocode stored as latitude and longitude.
We use the location information you provide to generate anonymized aggregate statistics of usage. We may convert it to geolocation information such as latitude, longitude precise only up to a neighborhood or zip code to prevent personal identification.
Your residency information
We may ask for your residency information in order to comply with privacy regulations that you may be subject to depending on your residency. This information will not be used for any other purpose.
Device and browser information
We use device and browser information collected when you reach out to us via our support channels to diagnose issues and resolve them. We may also use device and browser information to provide you better service by checking for compatibility with our code. We use anonymized aggregate device information to prioritize features and device support. For instance, we may prioritize fixing bugs affecting a particular browser based on aggregate usage statistics of the browser used by our users to access our Services or Products .
Content you submit including posts, votes, images and queries
All text, votes and files submitted by you are used to provide support and service. We share information collected via our Platforms, forms and embeds created by our client organizations on our service with that client organization. We do not share your activity with one of our clients with other clients. We may share anonymized aggregate data to detect trends and to market our Services.
Cookies
We use cookies to prevent abuse and fraud. We also use cookies via our third-party service providers to collect analytics on how you use the system. This information is used to diagnose issues and to help us serve you better. Please see our
cookie policy
for more info
Usage audit and analytics
When you use our systems as an Authorized User or User with access to our administrative interface, we store an audit of your activities in our database. This is used to prevent any unauthorized access, provide accountability and to prevent misuse of the system. We collect usage information when you use our websites or platforms to help us prioritize features and troubleshoot issues.
Payment information
We may collect payment information from you when applicable. Such data is only used for purposes that you explicitly consent when giving us or our designated service provider the information.
Transcript and recordings of calls
When you engage our Services, your calls may be recorded and transcribed for record keeping. This data is used to tailor our Services to best fit our needs and for quality assurance purposes.
5. How we handle your data
Any data that can be attributed to a single user or a household is treated as Personal Information or Personally Identifiable Information as designated by various privacy laws and we take all standard security precautions while handling your data.
Access to such data is restricted to authorized personnel or Services only. (See section on our third-party Services for more information).
We take industry-standard precautions to secure the data. The data is stored encrypted. This ensures that even in the event of a data breach, we protect your private information to the best of our abilities.  See our information security policy for more information
The data infrastructure is located in North America. We store your data in the following systems:
Relational databases and document stores
: We store your data on a persistent storage that is encrypted at multiple levels.
Log files
: We may record events that occur when you use our products or Services in one or more files collectively known as log files.
Other files
: We may store your data in other forms of transient or persistent storage on our infrastructure.
Caches
: To effectively scale our Services, we store your information in multiple caching Services.
Third-party Services
: When applicable, we use third-party Services to store and process your information. (See third-party Services section for more information)
Backups and code repositories
: We store information backup for business continuity.
We do not intentionally collect protected or sensitive personal information, such as social security numbers, genetic data, health information, etc.
We realize that you might share this information on our Platform, such as in posts, messages or comments. If you store any sensitive personal information on our servers, you are consenting to our storage of that information on our servers, which are in North America.
Information in your posts, comments, messages, and stories belongs to you, and you are responsible for it, as well as for making sure that your content complies with our Terms of Service.
We do not access your private messages exchanged with other users unless required for security or maintenance, or for support reasons. In such cases, we will do so only with your consent.
6. Who We Share Data With
Hearken is not in the business of selling your information.
We consider the information you shared with us to be a vital part of our relationship with you. There are, however, certain circumstances in which we may share your data with certain third parties without further notice to you, as set forth below:
6.1. Third-Party Services
Hearken, like many businesses, sometimes hires other companies, short-term contractors or consultants to perform certain business-related functions. We only engage with individual or business who have agreed to our privacy restrictions and terms or have published privacy policy and terms providing similar levels of protection.
We may share your information with these Services, only to the extent required to perform the function we use them for. These Services are permitted to use your personal data only to the extent required to perform their Services for us.
Third-party Services we currently use, as of the last update of this Privacy Policy, are listed below. Please visit the individual data use and privacy policy to learn more about them.
Hosting and technical infrastructure
We do not share any PII explicitly with these Services. However due to the nature of their use, these Services may have access to some PII such as your IP
Name
Use
Amazon Web Services
Hosts and processes our data and Services for our Platforms Sends transactional emails for Switchboard Community Management Service(“CMS”)
Heroku
Hosts and processes our data and Services for Engagement Management Service(“EMS”)
Google Cloud Platform
Hosts some Services and code for related Services
Square Space
Hosts some Hearken operated websites Provides a platform for ticket sales for events.
Kinsta
Hosts wearehearken.com website
Github
Hosts code and repositories. We do not store any user data in Github
Hosts public code samples and developer wiki.
New Relic
Stores and process events and error reports for
EMS
Sentry
Stores and process event and error reports for CMS
Analytics and usage
We share information with the analytics platforms only if you have consented to accepting cookies. For signed in users, we may share your name and contact information to be able to serve you when you reach out to us for support.
Name
Use
Google Analytics
Collects usage data about how you use our Sites and Services
reCaptcha
Protect system against bots and spam
Churnzero
Collects usage data about how Authorized Users and Admins use the EMS Admin platform
HubSpot
Provides support, for marketing and for scheduling calls with prospective or current partners. When you sign up for a discovery call or request any gated content on Hearken’s Site, your information will be passed to Hubspot.
Support, Marketing and event management
These services have access to your contact information when you use Hearken features that process data through these services.
Name
Use
EventBrite
Manages sign-ups for our events and webinars so that we may keep in touch with attendees before and after an event
HubSpot
Provides support, for marketing and for scheduling calls with prospective or current partners. When you sign up for a discovery call or request any gated content on Hearken’s Site, your information will be passed to Hubspot.
Intercom
Provides support via email, chat interface and documentation. We share Authorized Users’  name and email so we can identify you when you reach out to us
Communication
These are services we use to communicate within Hearken team as well as with Users or clients. We do not explicitly share information with these services. But they may have access to the information we store on these services. For instance: Slack platform will have access to your email address if you are added as a Slack user or if our integration posts user information into our internal Slack
Name
Use
Slack
We use Slack to communicate within our team as well as with some clients. We also add some third-party service integrations.
Zoom
Zoom provides our video conferencing platform for video meetings and webinars. We use the Zoom sign up function to allow participants in meetings and webinars to keep in touch before and after an event.
Gmail
Our main emailing platform
Google Hangouts
We use Google Hangouts as our video conferencing platform for some video meetings and webinars.
Google Calendar
Used to schedule our meetings, calls and webinars with clients.
MailChimp and Mandrill,
Send emails and newsletters to our users
Amazon Web Services
Send emails and newsletters to our CMS users
Whimsical
Used for strategic planning and consultation documentation
Notion
Used for internal documentation
Trello,
Used to track our work items and support tickets from our Users and Customers.
Google Drive
Used to store and collaborate on documents.
AirTable,
Used to store internal documentation including some information about our client contracts and invoices.
Other data processing Services
These services are used for specific data processing tasks. Only data required to complete the task is shared with them. No PII is shared unless absolutely necessary
Name
Use
Delve
Transcribes our discovery and service calls.
Harvest
Track time consultants spend on client calls.
OtterAi
Transcribe our discovery, service and sales calls.
PandaDoc
Manage contracts with our clients and third parties.
DocuSign
Manage contracts with our clients and third parties.
Zapier
Used to connect our Services with other third party Services
Mapbox,
Used to geocode and display maps
Google Maps
Used to geocode and display maps
Bonsai
Hosts elastic search data indices to enable search functionality for EMS
Elastic
Hosts elastic search data indices to enable search functionality for CMS
Typography.com
Provides custom fonts
Google Fonts
Provides custom fonts
Financial Information
These services have access to financial information of Hearken employees or our contracts with our clients. They are integrated sparingly with other systems to isolate sensitive and protected information
Name
Use
Quickbooks
Tracks our accounting information including invoices and payments from our clients.
Fathom
Used to supplement financial data in Quickbooks
Airtable
Used to store internal documentation including some information about our client contracts and invoices.
Paylocity
Payroll platform for employees and contractors or Hearken.
Stripe
Payment platform for events and memberships.
6.2. Business Transfers
As we develop our business, we might sell or buy businesses or assets. In the event of a corporate sale, merger, reorganization, dissolution or similar event, Personal Data may be part of the transferred assets.
6.3. Related Companies
We may also share your Personal Data with our Related Companies for purposes consistent with this Privacy Policy.
6.4. Legal Requirements
Hearken may disclose your Personal Data if required to do so by law or in the good faith belief that such action is necessary to
comply with a legal obligation,
protect and defend the rights or property of Hearken,
act in urgent circumstances to protect the personal safety of users of the Services or the public, or
protect against legal liability.
7. Hearken’s Role as Data Controller or Processor
As set forth in privacy laws, a company that has access to your data may be considered a Data Controller or Processor.
As a company, Hearken is sometimes the Data Controller and sometimes the Processor. The following section details when we are considered a Controller and when we are a Processor.
As it relates to our marketing website, Hearken is a Data Controller.
When Hearken collects your information when you register for or attend an event, we are the Controller.
When we enter into an agreement with a client organization, Hearken assumes the role of  a Data Processor as it pertains to user submissions. We process data as stipulated by the organization and in accordance with applicable data protection laws. We retain the right to use some of the information entered by the end-users for business continuity purposes.
Hearken is the Controller of any activity by an end-user that affects more than one of our client organizations. We also own usage audit, analytics and similar information about how the users engaged with our platform and Services. Such data may include user’s contact information and anonymized statistics on the content submitted to our Services.
7.1. Responsibilities as A Controller
As a Data Controller, Hearken will store and retain your data as required by law and as needed for business purposes. We do not sell your data or use it in personally-identifiable formats other than for purposes they were collected for and established in this privacy policy.
We provide mechanisms for our users to access, amend or delete their personal data as long as the request is reasonable and in accordance with the laws. See section on data requests for more information.
7.2. Responsibilities as A Processor
As a Data Processor, Hearken will store and retain your data as required by law and as needed for business purposes. We do not sell your data or use it in personally-identifiable formats other than for purposes they were collected for and established in this privacy policy.
We will process the data as stipulated by the Data Processor in our agreement. We may share data through our APIs or webhooks with other Services as directed by the Data Controller. The responsibility for such transfers resides with the Controller.
We will respond to reasonable requests from the Controller to access, amend or delete data for an individual user or collective user set as required by the law. Any additional cost incurred to perform such requests will be borne solely by the client in such cases. Controllers may reach out to us via our support channels or by sending us an email at
privacy@wearehearken.com
When we are the Processor, we will provide any Personal Information you submit through our Sites or Services to the Controller
Hearken does not control the information that a Controller requests from the end-user through our platforms. We are not responsible for any decisions or actions taken by the Controller with respect to your information (or by any third party with whom the Controller may share your information). Please read the applicable privacy policies of the Controller before submitting Personal Information.
8. Data Retention
We will not hold your personal information for any longer than is necessary for the uses outlined above, unless we are required to keep your personal data longer to comply with the law and any regulatory requirements. Where Hearken is the Controller of personal data we will retain your data for up to 3 years after your last active interaction with our Site and Services.
Where Hearken is the Processor, we will hold your personal information until told otherwise by the Controller or for up to 3 years after the Controller ceases to be a client. For more information on how your information is used by Controllers, please refer to their respective Privacy Policies.
9. Data Breach Response
On becoming aware of a Data Incident, Hearken will:
notify any authorities as required by laws;
notify the Controller or the Customer of the Data Incident without undue delay;
make reasonable efforts to identify and mitigate the cause of such Data Incident; and,
where the Data Incident was not caused by Customer or any Authorized User, take necessary steps that Hearken deems reasonable in order to remediate the cause of the Data Incident.
10. Do Not Track Signal Handling
Most popular browsers provide mechanisms for the users to send a “Do Not Track” signal to websites they visit. There is no consensus on what such signals mean in user privacy context. Hearken does not respond to Do Not Track signals and/or other similar mechanisms that provide consumer choice about tracking.
11. Your Rights as A User
If you are a user to whom certain data protection laws apply, you may have the following rights regarding your personal information.
11.1. Right to Know, Rectify and Delete Personal Data
You have the right to know and delete information on you collected by us. You have the right to request the following:
The categories of personal information we have collected about you;
The categories of sources from which the personal information was collected;
The categories of personal information about you we disclosed for a business purpose or sold;
The categories of third parties to whom the personal information was disclosed for a business purpose or sold;
The business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling the personal information; and
The specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you.
Under some laws, you may also have rights to do the following:
The right to have your personal data rectified if it is inaccurate or incomplete;
The right to request to have your personal data deleted in certain specific circumstances as set out in the Data Protection Legislation;
The right to request to restrict the processing of your personal data in certain specific circumstances as set out in the Data Protection Legislation;
The right to ask us not to process your personal data for marketing purposes or for purposes based on our legitimate interests;
The right to ask us to not undergo automated decision making; and
Where you have provided consent, to request to withdraw such consent at any time.
Data collected on you over the last 12 months or other period of time specified by Data Protection Laws is subject to the above provisions and rights.
11.2. Right to Opt-Out
We do not sell your data. Our users do not have to request to opt-out of sale of their data.
If you have consented to receiving marketing communications regarding products and Services that we believe may be of interest to you and you later decide that you no longer want to receive this type of marketing or promotional information, you may opt-out at any time by clicking the “Unsubscribe” button at the bottom of the marketing communication, or contacting us at
privacy@wearehearken.com
You may also submit requests to access, update, correct or delete your Personal Information, to no longer receive communications, or to “opt-out” of certain Services, by contacting us at the above email address.
11.3. Right to Non-Discrimination
You have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment by us as a result of exercising any of your privacy rights.
Our ability to verify your identity is important to us being able to detect spam submissions and bots. If you chose to not verify your email address, we may be unable to provide the same level of service.
12. Responding to Data Access Requests
You can send us a request to
privacy@wearehearken.com
to view, rectify or delete information about you collected and held by us.
You may make such requests yourself or via an agent authorized to contact us on your behalf.
If you are an Authorized User on one of our Platforms or Services, you may have an option to view and modify your information on the platform.
12.1 Verifying identity
We have a duty as the holder of certain personal information to verify your identity when responding to requests to know or delete information to ensure that we do not disseminate information to another person.
To verify your identity, we will request and collect additional personal information from you to match it against our records. We may ask you to verify your email address or ask for additional information or documentation if we feel it is necessary to confirm your identity with the necessary degree of certainty. We may communicate with you through email, or other means of communication that is reasonable and appropriate.
We will respond to you within 30 days of verification of the request. If additional time is needed to fulfill your request or to determine our capability of fulfilling your request, we will notify you if such additional time is needed (but not more than an additional 60 days).
We will attempt to respond to and comply with all reasonable requests. However, we may charge a reasonable fee when a request is manifestly unfounded or excessive.
We retain the right to deny requests under certain circumstances. In such cases, we will notify you of the reasons for denial. We will not provide you with specific pieces of personal information if the disclosure creates a substantial, articulable, and unreasonable risk to the security of that personal information, your account with us, or the security of our systems or networks. We will not disclose, if we are in possession of, your Social Security number, driver’s license number or other government-issued identification number, financial account number, any health insurance or medical identification number, an account password, or security questions and answers.
If we are the Processor of the information you requested us to modify or delete. We may redirect your request to the Controller of the information.
12.2. Propagation and Persistence of Requests
We will make reasonable attempts to notify any third-party Services we may have shared your data with if your request requires making changes to or deleting the shared data. We are not responsible for making sure that such requests are completed.
Because of the nature of the infrastructure and redundancy built in, some data may persist for longer than intended.
13. Children’s Privacy
Hearken does not knowingly collect Personal Data from children under the age of 13.
The Services are intended for a general audience and are not intended for and should not be used by children under the age of 13. We do not knowingly collect information from children under the age of 16.
If a Controller chooses to collect information from users who have not verified their age, we will consider this information as one-time transactional information. We will limit who has access to the PII information from users whose age is not verified.
Entering age information in fields of the form that is not intended for such purposes do not construe to us being aware of the user’s age.
We encourage parents and legal guardians to monitor their children’s Internet usage and to help enforce our Privacy Policy by instructing their children never to provide Personal Data on the Site without their permission. If you have reason to believe that a child under the age of 13 has provided Personal Data to Hearken through the Site, please contact us at
privacy@wearehearken.com
. We will endeavor to delete that information from our databases and other stores as soon as reasonably practicable.
14. Links to Other Websites
This Privacy Policy applies only to the Site and our Services and Products. The Site may contain links to other web Sites not operated or controlled by Hearken (the “Third Party Sites”). The policies and procedures we described here do not apply to the Third-Party Sites. The links from the Site, Services or Products do not imply that Hearken endorses or has reviewed the Third-Party Sites. We suggest contacting those Sites directly for information on their privacy policies.
15. API, Webhook Usage or Data Downloads
As an Authorized User, when you use our APIs and webhooks or download data, you agree to treat personal data with reasonable precautions and security and to respect the data subject’s privacy elections and process data in accordance with this privacy policy.
We are not responsible for the data once it leaves Hearken systems. We do not hold responsibility for verifying the terms of Services of the third-party Services or systems that the Authorized Users of our systems send the data to. When delivering data via webhooks, we are acting as the Data Processor complying with the instructions given to us by our clients who act as the Data Controller.
16. Exclusions
16.1. Unsolicited Submissions
This Privacy Policy does not apply to any Personal Data collected by Hearken other than Personal Data collected through our Site, Services or Products. This Privacy Policy shall not apply to any unsolicited information you provide to Hearken through the Site or through any other means. This includes, but is not limited to, information posted to any public areas of the Site, such as forums, any ideas for new products or modifications to existing products, and other unsolicited submissions (collectively, “Unsolicited Information”). All Unsolicited Information shall be deemed to be non-confidential and Hearken shall be free to reproduce, use, disclose, and distribute such Unsolicited Information to others without limitation or attribution.
16.2. Business Critical Data
Any data that is reasonably and demonstrably required for our conduct of business or has a legitimate business purpose may be excluded from being deleted.
16.3. Anonymized Data
Any data that is not directly connected to a single user or household is excluded from the terms of this privacy policy.
16.4. Published or Publicly Available Data
Any data submitted to us directly or to our clients (Data Controllers) that has already been published on a public forum including news website is excluded from the terms of this privacy policy.
16.5. Data that Is No Longer on Hearken Controlled Systems
Any data that has already been sent out of our systems including notifications sent to Slack, API responses, webhook responses, emails and newsletters are not subject to the terms of this Privacy Policy.
16.6. Data stored in backups
Any data that has been moved out of our primary and active systems into inactive backups or storage are exempt from requests to know, modify or delete.
However, if the data were to be restored from these backups for any reason, we will take reasonable steps to ensure that all privacy elections are applied to the restored data.
17. Cross-Border Transfer; Privacy Shield Notice
We are part of a global network and interact with users and use third parties located in other countries to help us run our business. As a result, personal information may be transferred outside the countries where we and our clients are located. This includes transfers to countries outside the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and to countries that may not have laws that provide the same degree of protection for personal information as your home country. We have taken steps designed to facilitate adequate protection for any information so transferred.
Hearken, Inc., and its affiliated US entity, Curious Nation, Inc., adhere to the
EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles
and the Swiss – U.S. Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use and retention of personal information that is transferred from the EEA, its Member States, the United Kingdom, and/or Switzerland to the United States. Hearken has certified that it adheres to the
EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles
within the scope of Hearken’s Privacy Shield certification. To learn more, see our
Privacy Shield Policy.
When we transfer personal information outside of the EEA to a country or framework not determined by the European Commission as providing an adequate level of protection for personal information, the transfers will be under an agreement which covers European Union requirements for such transfers, such as standard contractual clauses. The European Commission approved standard contractual clauses are available
here
.
Hearken is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the FTC, the Department of Transportation or any other U.S. authorized statutory body. Hearken acknowledges the possibility, under certain conditions, for the individual to invoke binding arbitration.
18. Your California Privacy Rights
California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018(“CCPA”) is a data privacy law that establishes various rights for Californians. To learn more about your rights as a California resident, see our
CCPA policy
which supplements our main Privacy Policy detailed on this page.
19. Changes to the policy
We update this Policy from time to time at our discretion. We will not reduce your rights under this policy without your explicit consent. We will not, without your consent, use your Personal Data in a manner materially different than what was stated at the time your Personal Data was collected.
When changes in the policy are significant, we will notify our authenticated users of any material changes to the way in which we treat Personal Data by posting a notice on relevant areas of the Services.
We will also provide notice to you in other ways at our discretion, such as through contact information you have provided. Any updated version of this Privacy Notice will be effective immediately upon the posting of the revised Privacy Notice unless otherwise specified. Your continued use of the Services after the effective date of the revised Privacy Notice (or such other act specified at that time) will constitute your consent to those changes.
We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review.
20. Contact Us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Notice, please feel free to contact us by email at:
privacy@wearehearken.com
We use cookies to ensure that we give you the best experience on our website. If you continue to use this site we will assume that you are happy with it.
Accept
Sub-policy 5
https://www.taboola.com/policies/privacy-policy:
Popup heading
Close
Customers
Information We Collect from Customers (“Customer Information”)
Why We Use Customer Information
To Whom We Disclose Customer Information
Customer Choices
Users
Information We Collect from Users (“User Information”)
Why We Use User Information
To Whom We Disclose User Information
User Choices
Interest-Based Advertising
Opt Out
Data Retention
Children
Site Visitors
Information We Collect from Site Visitors
Why We Use Site Visitor Information
To Whom We Disclose Site Visitor Information
Third-Party Online Advertising
Site Visitor Choices
General Provisions Applicable to Customers, Users, and Site Visitors
Why We Use Your Information
Disclosing Your Information
Cookies and Other Tracking Mechanisms
Third-Party Links
Security
International Data Transfers
Regional Privacy Rights
Notice to Individuals within the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or United Kingdom ("UK")
Notice to Individuals in the State of California
Notice to Individuals in Applicable U.S. States
Notice to Individuals in Thailand
Notice to Individuals in Brazil
Notice to Individuals within the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”)
Data Broker Requirements
Contact Us
Changes to This Privacy Policy
Taboola’s Opt-Out Options
Personal Data in Europe and UK
TABOOLA PRIVACY POLICY
Last Update:
November 6th, 2024
For Taboola’s opt-out status options, please
click here
.
For Taboola’s region-specific notices, please visit the applicable notice for individuals in
Brazil
,
California
and
additional U.S. states
,
Europe
(including the United Kingdom),
China
, or
Thailand
.
Privacy Self-Regulation:
Taboola is dedicated to providing Internet users the highest level of transparency and control over the use of their data in online advertising. In support of this, we adhere to the:
Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA), the Digital Advertising Alliance Canada (DAAC), and the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA);
Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (OBA) and the IAB Europe OBA Framework. Taboola participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies as vendor number 42; and the
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) Code of Conduct
for Web and Mobile. Taboola is a proud member of the NAI, an association dedicated to responsible data collection use in digital advertising.
Taboola also maintains an externally-facing
Trust Center
, which is available for your reference. To update your AdChoices Opt Out settings, select your region here:
US
,
Canada
, or
Europe
(including the United Kingdom); and to manage all NAI member sites’ settings, click
here
.
Privacy Policy:
Taboola, Inc., together with its
Affiliates
, (“
Taboola
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, or “
our
”), recognize the importance of your privacy. In this privacy policy (“Privacy Policy”) we describe how we collect, process, use, and disclose information that we obtain in the following contexts:
our website,
www.taboola.com
and any Taboola website, digital property, communication, or form displaying this Privacy Policy (collectively, the “
Sites
”);
our content-discovery platforms, feeds, widgets, analytics tools, pixels, integrations, push notifications, and other technical applications that we provide on third-party websites (collectively, the “
Content Discovery Platform
”); and
the Taboola News suite of content-discovery tools available on mobile devices and operating systems (including the Start line of products, collectively “
Taboola News
”) (together with the Content Discovery Platform, the “
Services
”).
When you visit the Sites, or use or interact with any of our Services, we will collect information from or about you or your device, which may include personal information or personal data as defined by applicable privacy laws (“
Personal
Information
” or “
Personal Data
“) (collectively, the “
Information
”), and this Information will be handled as described in this Privacy Policy.
We may use Information collected through the Sites and Services in various ways, depending on whether you are:
(i) a publisher, advertiser, or other content provider that has a contractual relationship, with Taboola (a “
Customer
“);
(ii) a visitor to our Customers’ websites and digital properties who interacts with our Services (a “
User
“); or
(iii) a visitor to the Taboola Sites (a “
Site Visitor
“), which may include Customers and prospective customers.
Therefore, this Privacy Policy outlines specific provisions for each of these categories in Sections 1 – 3, and outlines provisions that apply to all three categories in Section 4 below.
For more information about how we use cookies on the Sites and when providing our Services, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
Please note that our
Connexity
and
Skimlinks
business lines have separate privacy policies that apply to their services. Please visit their respective websites for information on their privacy practices.
1. Customers
1.1 Information We Collect from Customers (“Customer Information”)
We collect Customer Information directly from our Customers in the following ways:
Sites:
We will collect a Customer’s contact details when a Customer enters a contractual relationship with Taboola and we will collect a username and password when a Customer creates an account on any of our Sites.
When a Customer sends us an email asking a question, or signs up to receive our email newsletters, we will collect the Information that the Customer submits to us.
We will also collect other Information that Customers choose to provide to us, such as the contents of a message or form that a Customer submits through our Sites or via email.
We may also collect Information from prospective customers through publicly-available sources.
Services:
When a Customer signs up to use our Services or uses Taboola’s analytics dashboard “Taboola Ads,” we collect Information such as the Customer’s name, email address, telephone number, payment card information, billing information, and any other Information the Customer may choose to provide to us on the platform.
We may also work with third party vendors to process payments to or from our Customers on our behalf. These vendors currently include
Stripe
and
Payoneer
, but are subject to change at any time. We do not have access to the Information that you provide to these third parties, and we encourage you to visit their privacy policies to understand their practices.
1.2 Why We Use Customer Information
We use Customer Information for the following purposes:
Providing our Services
. We use Customer Information to provide our Sites and Services and for other customer service purposes in relation to Customer accounts.
Communicating with you about your Taboola Partnership
. We use Customer Information to communicate, via email or otherwise, about Customers’ accounts; to contact Customers about Taboola’s products or services that we think may interest you; to respond to Customer inquiries, requests, or complaints; and to provide Customers with product updates, news, best practices, and other helpful or interesting information that can enhance your use of Taboola’s Services, in accordance with their communications preferences. When we communicate in this way, our emails may deploy a cookie that tracks when the emails are opened to measure Customer engagement. For more information about cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Marketing and advertising
. We use Customer Information to provide Customers with newsletters, special offers, and promotions, including via email; and for other marketing, advertising, and promotional purposes, including general updates about Taboola. These communications will be sent in accordance with our Customers’ communications preferences.
1.3 To Whom We Disclose Customer Information
We may disclose Customer Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose Customer Information to any of Taboola’s current or future affiliates (affiliates are companies controlling, controlled by, or under common control with us, including, for example, Taboola.com Ltd., Taboola Europe Limited, Taboola (Thailand) Limited, and Taboola Brasil Internet Ltda., referred to herein as “
Affiliates
”), parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose Customer Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, fraud detection) on our behalf.
Customers
. We may disclose Customer Information to other Customers where relevant to the Service we provide. For example, we may provide publishers with information about what advertisers may appear on their network or advertisers with information about which publisher websites their campaigns have appeared on.
1.4 Customer Choices
Customers may access, correct, delete, or update the Information that they have provided to us by either updating the Information in their account, by emailing their dedicated account manager, or by emailing us at
support@taboola.com
.
We may send periodic promotional or informational emails to Customers in accordance with their communications preferences. At any time, Customers may opt out of such communications by following the opt-out instructions contained in the email. Please note that it may take up to ten (10) business days for us to process opt-out requests. If you opt out of receiving marketing and advertising emails from Taboola, we will still send you emails about your account and any Services that you have requested or received from us.
2. Users
2.1 Information We Collect from Users (“User Information”)
We automatically collect User Information when Users interact with our Services that appear on our Customers’ websites and digital properties. Like most other web-based services, we collect this User Information through cookies and other technologies. Taboola collects only pseudonymized data, which means we do not know who you are because we do not know or process your name, email address, or other identifiable data. Instead, we only process digital identifiers such as cookie IDs, IP addresses, mobile advertising IDs on your device, Taboola network browsing history and associated preferences, and in some limited circumstances, your hashed email address.
User Information that we collect includes, but is not limited to the following:
Content Discovery Platform
: We collect Information about a User’s device and operating system, IP address, the web pages accessed by Users within our Customers’ websites, the link that led a User to a Customer’s website, the dates and times a User accesses a Customers’ website, event information (e.g., system crashes), Information about the interactions with advertisements and Customers’ Services (e.g., availability, visibility, and clicks), general location information (e.g., city and state), hashed email addresses (when made available by the User), and gender (when made available by the User). We ask our Customers to obtain consent on our behalf, where required by applicable data protection laws, for us to collect this User Information. We may also obtain Information about you from our
data partners
.
Taboola News
: We collect in-app User behaviors (e.g. online status, browsing activity, and clicks) and implicit non-precise device location inferred from search queries (when enabled by the User) and SIM cards or IP addresses. For more information about how we use cookies and other technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
Taboola Push Notification
: We collect Information about Users’ time zone, location (country, region, city), language, mobile operating system (e.g. iOS or Android), browser, connection and internet service provider.
2.2 Why We Use User Information
We use User Information for the following purposes:
Providing and Improving our Service
. We may use User Information to provide and improve our Services to Users and our Customers.
Tailoring content
. We may use User Information to tailor the content and information that we may send or display to Users; to retarget content to Users through our Services and elsewhere; and to otherwise personalize your experiences while using our Services. For more information about how we tailor our content see information below about our
Interest Based Advertising
.
Tailoring content across multiple devices
. We may use User Information to improve a unique User’s experience across multiple browsers and devices (such as smartphones, tablets, or other viewing devices) by providing better targeted ad campaigns to that User. For instance, should we recognize a User on a web browser, we may want to provide that User similar or personalized content on mobile apps, as well. To do this, we identify unique Users across devices, or we may sync cookies and identifiers with our service providers or Customers that do this, to help our Customers enhance their own data and data segments, or to help them target the right audience.
Offering our Customers data segments that help target content and advertisements for topics, products, and services that may interest you.
A data segment is a grouping of users who share one or more attributes (e.g., travel enthusiasts). We offer a number of data segments, both proprietary and from our
data partners
, to our Customers so that they may better target Users who are more likely to be interested in their content and advertisements. Taboola does not knowingly create segments that are based upon what we consider to be sensitive information (for example, Personal Data revealing your racial or ethnic origin or your religious affiliations, or Personal Data concerning your sensitive health information, sex life or sexual orientation, or genetic or biometric data). In connection with our Services, our Customers may use these
standard health-related segments
about non-sensitive conditions such as an inferred interest in health and wellness or over the counter medications. In addition, Taboola offers our Customers
standard political-related segments
that may indicate general political sentiment, interest in specific political issues, and political party affiliation.
2.3 To Whom We Disclose User Information
We may disclose User Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose User Information to any current or future Affiliates, parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose User Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, or fraud detection) on our behalf.
Unaffiliated third parties
. We may disclose User Information to other unaffiliated third parties, specifically with (i) our
data partners
, so that we can connect you with relevant content by allowing our advertisers to target specific audience segments, and (ii) our
programmatic demand and supply partners
, so that we can serve you with tailored advertisements.
Customers
. We may disclose User Information to Customers where relevant to the Service we provide those Customers. For example, we may provide publishers with information about the viewing and click-through patterns of the content they publish and may provide advertisers with information about conversion rates for analytics purposes.
2.4 User Choices
You have the right to request that Taboola provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, correct your Personal Data, delete your Personal Data, and cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data, and opt-out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Data. Please visit our Global Taboola Data Subject Access Request Portal available
here
. To opt out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Data, please click the U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal available
here
.
2.5 Interest-Based Advertising
Through our Services, including our Services on Customer websites, we may provide advertisements to you based on your recent browsing behavior across different Customer websites, browsers, or devices. For example, if on a first online visit, you browse on website A, then on a subsequent visit to website B, you may see content personalized based on your browsing history on website A. For example, if a user visits a clothing retail site, she might see clothing-related ads on another site she visits.
In order to target advertisements to you for products and services that may interest you, we may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), HTML5 local storage, and other technologies. For more information about how we use these technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
We may also work with third parties such as ad networks, which are third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to websites that you have visited in the past. These advertisers will deliver you targeted advertisements for products and services that may interest you. Third-party ad networks, our advertiser Customers (and their content providers and agents), and/or traffic measurement services may also use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs, and other technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalize advertising content to you. These
third-party cookies and other technologies
are governed by each third party’s specific privacy policy, not this one.
If you have questions about our collection and use of data for interest-based advertising purposes, please contact us at:
support@taboola.com
.
2.6 Opt Out
Taboola supports initiatives to offer our Users greater transparency and control over the uses of their Information. Therefore, we offer the following options for controlling the interest-based content and ads you receive.
If
you do not want to receive interest-based ads from Taboola, you can disable the display of such ads by clicking on the opt-out link below
. Please note that an opt out will not prevent you from seeing Taboola’s content recommendations. Rather, the opt out will prevent Taboola from using your Information to tailor these recommendations to your interests. You will continue to receive recommendations that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
You are currently:
Opted Out
Opt In
Not Opted Out
Opt Out
Not Opted Out
: Taboola will serve you personalized recommendations based on your history.
Opted Out
: You have opted out of tracking, Taboola will no longer serve you with personalized content recommendations based on your Internet use history.
Because our tracking mechanisms operate at the device and browser level, to fully opt-out across devices,
you will need to do so on each device and browser individually
. If your browsers are configured to reject cookies, your opt-out may not be effective, since we identify your choice to opt-out based on an opt-out cookie we deliver to you. In this case, you will need to confirm that your browser is configured properly in order for the opt-out to be effective. If you are using a Safari browser on iOS11 or macOS High Sierra, you must first adjust your Privacy and Security Settings to turn off both “Prevent Cross-Site Tracking” and “Block All Cookies”, and then return to this privacy policy or your preferred opt out platform to reset your opt out preferences.
Taboola may use non-cookie technologies in limited cases. Like cookies, these technologies allow Taboola to recommend ads that are tailored to your interests and to remember whether you have chosen to opt-out from our Services. Please note that some web browsers may not permit you to block the use of non-cookie technologies, but you can do so by simply clicking on the Opt Out feature above in this Section 2.6.
You can also opt-out of receiving targeted ads served by Taboola and other advertising companies
.
You may use the
NAI opt out tool
, which will allow you to opt out of receiving targeted ads from Taboola and from other NAI-approved member companies. The NAI also provides instructions to engage system-level mobile device opt outs in Android, iOS, and Windows Phone environments.
You may also visit one of the Digital Advertising Alliance affiliate websites to learn more about User choices and opting out of interest-based advertising displayed by the many member companies.
Users in the United States may visit the DAA consumer choice page at
www.aboutads.info/choices
Users in Canada may visit the DAAC consumer choice page at
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
Users in Europe (including the United Kingdom) may visit the EDAA consumer choice page at
www.youronlinechoices.eu
You can also opt out of the use of your email address for targeted ads through
Audience Matched Advertising
or AMA by Taboola and other advertising companies through the
NAI Audience Matched Advertising Opt Out (Beta)
.
Please note that an opt out from one or more companies listed on the DAA, DAAC, or EDAA consumer choice pages will not prevent you from seeing those companies’ advertisements. Rather, the opt out will prevent these companies from using your Information to display targeted content or ads to you. You may continue to receive advertisements that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective because your browser will refuse opt-out cookies (that alert companies that you have exercised your opt-out preference).
2.7 Data Retention
We retain User Information, which is directly collected for purposes of serving ads, for at most thirteen (13) months from the User’s last interaction with our Services (often for a shorter period of time), after which time we de-identify the data by removing unique identifiers or aggregating the data.
We retain deidentified or aggregated data, which cannot identify an individual or device and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, for as long as commercially necessary. We keep opt-out information for longer than this period so that we can continue to honor your opt-out requests.
2.8 Children
We do not knowingly collect any data or target any advertisements on websites directed to children under the age of eighteen (18). If you are the parent or guardian of a child under the age of eighteen (18) and have a concern regarding the Information we collect, please contact us at
dpo@taboola.com
.
3. Site Visitors
3.1 Information We Collect from Site Visitors
Taboola collects Site Visitor Information either directly from you or from third parties that collect this Information during your use of our Sites. We may combine all the Information that we collect from various sources.
Information we collect directly from you
. We may collect Site Visitor Information directly from you. For example, when you send us an email asking a question, or submit a form on our Sites to receive marketing materials or email newsletters, we will collect the Information that you submit to us. We may also collect any other Information that you choose to provide to us, such as the contents of a message that you submit through our Sites.
Information we collect from third parties
. We may collect Site Visitor Information about you from third parties that collect information on our behalf through your use of the Site, such as web analytics companies. Such information may include, without limitation, information about your operating system, IP address, settings and system configurations, device model, device ID and other unique device identifiers, mobile related information, the web pages you access within our Sites, the website that led you to our Sites, the website to which you go after leaving our Sites, the dates and times that you access our Sites, event information (e.g., system crashes) and web log data.
For more information about how we use cookies and other technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
3.2 Why We Use Site Visitor Information
We use your Site Visitor Information for the following purposes:
Providing our Service
. We use Site Visitor Information to provide and manage our Sites and Services.
Tailoring content
. We use Site Visitor Information to tailor the content and information that we send or display to you on our Sites, and to otherwise personalize your experiences while using our Sites.
Communicating with you
. We use Site Visitor Information to communicate with you, including via email, about our Services; to respond to your inquiries via our website request forms; and to answer any questions or complaints you submit; to provide you with news, best practices or other information that we think may interest you.
Marketing and advertising
. We use Site Visitor Information to provide you with newsletters, special offers, and promotions, including via email; to contact you about products or services we think may interest you; and for other marketing, advertising, and promotional purposes. These communications will be sent in accordance with your communications preferences.
Analyzing use of our Sites
. We use Site Visitor Information to better understand how individuals access and use our Sites, both on an aggregated and individualized basis; to honor their requests and preferences; and for other research, analytical or statistical purposes.
3.3 To Whom We Disclose Site Visitor Information
We may disclose Site Visitor Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose Site Visitor Information to any current or future Affiliates, parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose Site Visitor Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, fraud detection) on our behalf.
3.4 Third-Party Online Advertising
To understand your interests and deliver advertisements that are tailored to your interests, we may work with service providers or third parties that use their own
cookies, web beacons, and other technologies
to collect Information about Site Visitors’ online activities, either on our Sites and/or other websites across the Internet  (“
Taboola Ad Partners
”). These Taboola Ad Partners include advertisers and ad networks that may collect Information about when you view or interact with one of their advertisements and may collect information regarding your activities on our Sites and your online activities over time and across different websites. Like most advertisers, Taboola works to place our advertisements where we think they will be most interesting and relevant to the recipient. One way we do this is by allowing ad networks to place their own cookies when an individual visits our Sites. This enables the ad network to recognize individuals who have previously visited the Taboola Sites. Then, if the ad network has purchased ad space on a third-party website, and recognizes that same individual visiting that third-party website, the ad network can deliver a Taboola advertisement, knowing that this individual has already expressed interest in Taboola by visiting the Taboola Sites. To learn more about third parties who collect Site Visitor Information, please review our
Cookie Policy
.
3.5 Site Visitor Choices
Site Visitors may opt out of the Taboola Ad Partners that collect information on the Sites to serve ads about Taboola. (Some U.S. Site Visitors may exercise their options directly with Taboola, as outlined below in Section 5.2.1 and Section 5.3.1). By visiting one of the Digital Advertising Alliance affiliate websites, you can learn more about User choices and opting out of interest-based advertising displayed by the many member companies.
Users in the United States may visit the DAA consumer choice page at
www.aboutads.info/choices
Users in Canada may visit the DAAC consumer choice page at
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
Users in Europe (including the United Kingdom) may visit the EDAA consumer choice page at
www.youronlinechoices.eu
Please note that an opt out from one or more companies listed on the DAA, DAAC, or EDAA consumer choice pages will not prevent you from seeing those companies’ advertisements. Rather, the opt out will prevent these companies from using your Information to display targeted content or ads to you. You may continue to receive advertisements that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective because your browser will refuse opt-out cookies (that alert companies that you have exercised your opt-out preference).
For Site Visitors who have subscribed to receive emails from us, you can manage your subscription by clicking your unique link that appears at the bottom of each of these emails.
4. General Provisions Applicable to Customers, Users, and Site Visitors
4.1 Why We Use Your Information
We use the Information that we collect from Customers, Users, and Site Visitors for the purposes respectively set forth in Sections 1-3 above, as well as for the following purposes:
Analyzing use of our Services
. We use the Information that we collect to better understand how Customers, Users, and Site Visitors access and use our Site and Services, both on an aggregated and individualized basis; to respond to Customers’, Users’, and Site Visitors’ requests and preferences; and for other research, analytical, and statistical purposes.
Legal compliance
. We use the Information that we collect to comply with applicable legal obligations, including requests from law enforcement or other governmental entities.
Protecting our rights and interests
. We use the Information that we collect to protect our rights and interests and the rights and interests of our Customers, Users, Site Visitors, and the general public, as well as to enforce this Privacy Policy and our
Terms of Use
.
4.2 Disclosing Your Information
When we share your Information with third parties as specified above, we require such recipients to agree to only use the Information we share with them in accordance with this Privacy Policy and our contractual specifications and for no other purpose than those determined by us in line with this Privacy Policy.
In addition to the disclosures detailed above, we may also disclose Information for the following purposes:
Business transfers
.
We reserve the right to disclose and/or transfer Information to another entity if we are acquired by or merged with another company, if we sell or transfer a business unit or assets to another company, if we undergo a bankruptcy proceeding, or if we engage in any other similar business transfer.
Legal compliance
.
We may disclose Information in order to comply with the law, regulation, a judicial proceeding, subpoena, court order, or other legal process.
Protecting rights and interests
.
We may disclose Information where we believe it is necessary to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person, violations of our
Terms of Use
or this Privacy Policy, or as evidence in litigation in which we are involved.
Aggregate and de-identified Information
.
We may disclose to our Customers and other third parties aggregated or de-identified information about users for marketing, advertising, research, or other purposes.
4.3 Cookies and Other Tracking Mechanisms
For more information about how we use cookies and other tracking mechanisms on the Sites and when providing our Services, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
. You may disable certain tracking as discussed in our
Cookie Policy
(e.g., by disabling cookies).
4.4 Third-Party Links
Our Sites and Services may contain links to our
third-party partners’
websites. Any access to and use of such linked websites is not governed by this Privacy Policy but instead is governed by the privacy policies of those third-party websites. We are not responsible for the information security nor privacy practices of such third-party websites.
For example, our Sites include features from third-party social networking platforms, such as the Facebook “Like” button. These features may collect certain information, such as your IP address or the page you are visiting on our Sites, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Social media features and widgets are either hosted by a third party or directly on our Sites. Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing such features. As another example, our Services link to Customer websites, which are also not governed by this Privacy Policy but by the applicable Customers’ privacy policy.
4.5 Security
We value the security of your Information, including, but not limited to, the Information collected via the Sites or Services. Taboola is ISO 27001 and ISO 27701 certified and we have taken appropriate technical and organisational measures to protect the Information we collect about you from loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, destruction, and any other form of unauthorized processing. Please be aware, however, that no data security measures can guarantee 100% security.
4.6 International Data Transfers
We may transfer your Information outside the country in which it is collected, including to a country that may not offer the same level of protection for Information as the country in which you reside. Rest assured, however, that Taboola has arranged all contractual safeguards to ensure your Information is processed in a way that offers an adequate level of protection when it is shared between or among Taboola Affiliates, subsidiaries, and/or parent companies.
If you would like to learn more about EEA/UK Data Transfers, specifically, see Section 5.1.4 below. If you would like to learn more about Thailand Data Transfers, specifically, see Section 5.3.4 below.
5. Regional Privacy Rights
5.1 Notice to Individuals within the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or United Kingdom ("UK")
5.1.1 Data Controller and Representative
If you reside in the EEA or UK, Taboola.com Ltd. will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services. Taboola.com Ltd. can be contacted at
support@taboola.com
.
Our representative in the European Union is Lionheart Squared (Europe) Ltd., 2 Pembroke House, Upper Pembroke Street 28-32, Dublin, D02 EK84 Ireland.
Our representative in the UK is Taboola Europe Limited, Aldgate House, 2nd Floor, 33 Aldgate High Street, London EC3N 1DL, United Kingdom.
5.1.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from the EEA or UK, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.1 as “
EEA/UK Data
”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), we will make clear to you at the relevant time what those legitimate interests are.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Data, including if you would like to better understand how our legitimate interests to process your data are balanced against your data protection rights and freedoms, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.1.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (ii) correct your Personal Data, (iii) export your Personal Data, (iv) delete your Personal Data, and (v) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. Where we have obtained your consent, or our Customers have obtained it on our behalf, you have the right to withdraw it at any time. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioral information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
privacy@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
You have the right to lodge a complaint to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your Personal Data. To learn more, please contact your local data protection authority, via the contact methods available
here
. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
privacy@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.1.4 EEA/UK Data Transfers
As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among the EEA, the UK, Israel, the United States, Singapore and Hong Kong, and Taboola stores Customer, User, and Visitor information in our data centers located in Israel and the United States.
When Taboola transfers EEA/UK Data to Taboola.com Ltd. in Israel, it relies (as applicable) on (i) the European Commission’s decision, and (ii) UK adequacy regulations that Israel provides a level of data protection that is adequate for EEA/UK Data. These allow the free transfer of EEA/UK Data to Israel without the need for additional data transfer mechanisms.
Similarly, when Taboola transfers any personal data from the EEA to Taboola Europe Limited in the United Kingdom, it relies on the European Commission’s decision that the UK provides a level of data protection that is adequate for personal data from the EEA.
Beyond that, when Taboola transfers EEA/UK Data to other countries then, if those countries do not have a European Commission adequacy finding and are not the subject of UK adequacy regulations (as applicable), Taboola implements
Standard Contractual Clauses
approved by the European Commission and/or competent UK authorities (as applicable) to protect the transferred data. The Standard Contractual Clauses are contractual privacy and security commitments that are entered between companies that transfer personal data outside of the EEA.
In particular, non-EEA/UK Taboola Affiliates, like Taboola, Inc. in the United States, have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
5.2 Notice to Individuals in the State of California
5.2.1 Your Rights to Your Personal Information
California residents have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with what Personal Information Taboola has collected about you, including the categories of Personal Information, the categories of sources from which the Personal Information is collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing Personal Information, the categories of third parties to whom Taboola discloses Personal Information, and the specific pieces of Personal Information Taboola has collected about you, (ii) correct your Personal Information, (iii) delete your Personal Information, and (iv) opt you out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Information. You also have a right against discrimination for exercising any of these rights, which Taboola is committed to upholding and honoring at all times.
If you would like to opt out of Taboola’s disclosures, sharing, and sales of your Personal Information and cross-context behavioral advertising, you may do so as outlined in
Taboola’s U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal
. Please note that this feature is currently only available for U.S. state residents with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect. If you would like to effectuate additional consumer rights, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
.
5.2.2 Summary of Consumer Requests
This is a
summary of the requests
that Taboola received and honored from California residents in the last calendar year.
5.2.3 Categories of Data that Taboola May Hold about You
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this notice, Taboola may have used or obtained your Personal Information with respect to our Services and Sites in accordance with the chart below.
Consumer/Data Subject Type
Statutory Category of Personal Information (PI)
Sources of PI
Purpose of Collection
Disclosure of PI
Customers
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Additional data subject to Cal. Civ. Code section 1798.80 (e.g., name, address, work phone, employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information
through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms
)
Please visit section 1.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Users
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 2.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Site Visitors
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Additional data subject to Cal. Civ. Code section 1798.80 (e.g., name, address, work phone, employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information
through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms
)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 3.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
5.2.4 How Taboola Shares Your Personal Information
We may disclose your Personal Information by allowing certain third parties (such as online advertising services, advertising networks, and social networks) to collect Personal Information via automated technologies on our websites for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes. Under California law, such disclosures may be considered a “sale” when the personal information is exchanged for non-monetary consideration, or “sharing” when the personal information is disclosed for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes. You have the right to opt out of these types of disclosures of your Personal Information in accordance with the opt out methods we have provided throughout this notice.
We may sell or share for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes (and may have sold or shared during the 12-month period prior to the Effective Date of this Statement) the following categories of personal information about you to online advertising services, advertising networks and social networks:
Commercial Information
Geolocation Data
Identifiers
Internet/Online Activity
Inferences
We do not have actual knowledge that we sell or share Personal Information of minors under 18 years old.
5.3 Notice to Individuals in Applicable U.S. States
5.3.1 Your Rights to Your Personal Information
Residents of U.S. states with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with information on/access to the Personal Information that we may hold about you, (ii) correct your Personal Information, (iii) delete your Personal Information, (iv) provide you a copy of your Personal Information, and (v) opt-out of targeted advertising or the sale of your Personal Information. Taboola does not profile in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects. You also have a right against discrimination for exercising any of these rights, which Taboola is committed to upholding and honoring at all times.
If you would like to opt out of Taboola’s disclosures, sharing, and sales of your Personal Information and targeted advertising, you may do so as outlined in
Taboola’s U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal
. Please note that this feature is currently only available for U.S. state residents with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect. If you would like to effectuate additional consumer rights requests, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
.
5.3.2 Categories of Data that Taboola May Hold about You
Taboola may have used or obtained your Personal Information with respect to our Services and Sites in accordance with the chart below.
Consumer/Data Subject Type
Category of Personal Information (PI)
Sources of PI
Purpose of Collection
Sources
Customers
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Please visit section 1.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Users
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 2.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Site Visitors
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 3.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
We may disclose your Personal Information by allowing certain third parties (such as online advertising services, advertising networks, and social networks) to collect Personal Information via automated technologies on our websites for targeted advertising purposes. You have the right to opt out of these types of disclosures of your Personal Information.
We may sell or share for targeted advertising purposes, the following categories of personal information about you to online advertising services, advertising networks and social networks:
Commercial Information
Geolocation Data
Identifiers
Internet/Online Activity
Inferences
5.4 Notice to Individuals in Thailand
5.6.1 Data Controller
If you reside in Thailand, Taboola (Thailand) Limited will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services.
5.6.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from Thailand, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.3 as “Thailand Data”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), we will make clear to you at the relevant time what those legitimate interests are.
5.6.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (ii) export your Personal Data, (iii) delete your Personal Data, and (iv) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioural information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
If you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.6.4 Thailand Data Transfers
Taboola transfers data outside of Thailand. Taboola has in place an Inter Group Data Transfer Agreement across its international entities, which is based on the EEA’s standard model clauses.
As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among Thailand, the EEA, the United States, Israel, and Hong Kong. To ensure that Thailand Data is adequately protected when transferred outside of Thailand, the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 mandates that such transfers take place using certain legal mechanisms.
When transferring Thailand data elsewhere, Taboola relies on Standard Contractual Clauses, set forth by the European Commission, that outline contractual privacy and security commitments between companies that transfer personal data (for example, from Taboola (Thailand) Limited to Taboola, Inc.). Taboola, Inc. and its Affiliates have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
Note: Taboola currently stores Customer, User, and Visitor Information in our data centers located in the United States and Israel.
5.5 Notice to Individuals in Brazil
5.7.1 Data Controller
If you reside in the Federative Republic of Brazil (“Brazil”), Taboola Brasil Internet Ltda. will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services.
5.7.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from Brazil, under the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados federal law 13,709/2018 (the “LGPD”), our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.4 as “Brazil Data”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), a notice will be provided to you in our disclosure statement.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Data, including if you would like to better understand how our legitimate interests to process your data are balanced against your data protection rights and freedoms, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.7.3 Your Rights to Your Personal Data
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) confirm whether we are processing your Personal Data, (ii) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (iii) disclose the public and private entities with which we have shared use of your Personal Data, (iv) correct your Personal Data, (v) export your Personal Data, for your own use or use by another controller (vi) anonymize, block, or delete any unnecessary or excessive data, (vii) delete all your Personal Data, and (vii) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioral information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit Taboola’s
Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
Brazilian data subjects can file a complaint in relation to the LGPD with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (the “ANPD”). In the meantime, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer, Leonie Power, FieldFisher, at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.7.4. Brazil Data Transfers
Taboola transfers data outside Brazil. As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among Brazil, the EEA, the United States, Israel, and Hong Kong. To ensure that Brazil Data is adequately protected when transferred outside Brazil, the LGPD mandates that such transfers take place using
certain legal mechanisms
. Taboola has in place an Inter Group Data Transfer Agreement across its international entities, which is based on the EEA’s standard model clauses, and which may be updated upon further guidance from the future ANPD.
Note: Taboola currently stores Customer, User, and Visitor Information in our data centers located in the United States and Israel.
5.6 Notice to Individuals within the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”)
5.8.1 Processing Entity and Designated Office
If you reside in the PRC, Taboola Information Technology Shanghai Co. Ltd. will be the processing entity of your Personal Information provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services. Our designated office is located at Room 501i, Unit 501, 5F, No. 61 on East 3rd Middle Road, Chaoyang District, Beijing, China, and Taboola Information Technology Shanghai Co. Ltd. can be contacted at
support@taboola.com
.
5.8.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Information
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from the PRC, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Information described above (also referred to in this Section 5.5 as “PRC Data”) will depend on the Personal Information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Information from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Information to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is reasonable to support news reporting or the public interest. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Information from you or may otherwise need the Personal Information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. If we ask you to provide Personal Information to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Information is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Information).
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Information, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.8.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to know about and make decisions about the processing of your Personal Information — this includes the right to restrict or refuse the processing of your Personal Information. You also have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to consult or copy the Personal Information we hold about you, (ii) correct or supplement your Personal Information, (iii) transfer or export your Personal Information, (iv) delete your Personal Information, and (v) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Information. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Information and behavioural information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Information, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
You have the right to complain to the relevant department performing duties of Personal Information protection. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Information, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.8.4 PRC Data Transfers
To provide Taboola’s Services, Personal Information about individuals in the PRC is collected by a server in Hong Kong, and our data then flows between Hong Kong, Israel, the EEA, the UK, the United States, and Singapore. Taboola does not store any Personal Information in the PRC, and instead stores Customer, User, and Visitor information in our data centers located in Israel and the United States.
When Taboola transfers Personal Information about individuals in the PRC to Taboola.com Ltd. in Israel, it relies (as applicable) on standard contractual clauses as set forth by the European Commission. In particular, non-PRC Taboola Affiliates, like Taboola, Inc. in the United States, have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
6. Data Broker Requirements
THE ENTITY MAINTAINING THIS WEBSITE IS A DATA BROKER UNDER TEXAS LAW. TO CONDUCT BUSINESS IN TEXAS, A DATA BROKER MUST REGISTER WITH THE TEXAS SECRETARY OF STATE (TEXAS SOS). INFORMATION ABOUT DATA BROKER REGISTRANTS IS AVAILABLE ON THE TEXAS SOS WEBSITE.
The entity maintaining this website is a data broker under Texas law. To conduct business in Texas, a data broker must register with the Texas Secretary of State (Texas SOS). Information about data broker registrants is available on the Texas SOS website.
7. Contact Us
If you have questions about the privacy aspects of our Sites or Services, please contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you wish to receive this policy in an alternative format, please contact privacy@taboola.com.
The names and contact details of our Affiliates which may process your Personal Information in their capacity as data controllers, can be found here:
www.taboola.com/contact
.
Residents in Brazil, China, the European Economic Area (including the United Kingdom) and Thailand, if you wish to escalate your inquiry after contacting the support team, you are welcome to contact our Data Protection Officer, Leonie Power, FieldFisher at
dpo@taboola.com
.
8. Changes to This Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy is current as of the Effective Date set forth above.
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time, so please be sure to check back periodically. We will post any changes to this Privacy Policy on our Sites.
If we make any changes to this Privacy Policy that materially affect our practices with regard to the Information we have previously collected from you, we will endeavor to provide you with notice in advance of such change by highlighting the change on our Sites. We will seek your prior consent to any material changes, if and where this is required by applicable data protection laws.
Sub-policy 6
https://www.connatix.com/privacy-policy:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
This website uses cookies to give you a better user experience.
LEARN MORE
Got It
JW Player and Connatix Merge to Transform the Digital Video Economy
Read the Press Release
Video Delivery
Video Monetization
Video Analytics
Video Creation
Advertisers
Deep Contextual
Blog
Press
Leadership
Careers
General Privacy
Job Applicant Privacy
Copyright
Contact us
Login
REQUEST A DEMO
Connatix
|
Website Privacy Notice
You can find quick links to the separate Privacy Policies here:
1.
General Privacy Policy
2.
Video Platform Privacy Policy
a
Introduction
We, at Connatix Native Exchange, Inc. (the “
Company
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
”), respect the privacy and data protection rights of our website visitors, portal users and business contacts.
This Privacy Notice (the "
Notice
") describes the personal information we have and the policies and procedures we use regarding personal information, in each of the following contexts –
The data practices on our website
https://connatix.com/
(the
“Website”
)
Our relationship with representatives of existing and prospective customers, partners, and vendors (the “
Representatives”
), and the Representatives that login to use our Portal (“
Portal Users
”).
This Notice may be amended from time to time. We will post any change to this Notice on our Website a reasonable time in advance of the effective date of the change, and we will also make efforts to proactively notify you by email of the changes to the Notice if we have your email address.
Contact Us
If you have any questions, comments or concerns regarding this Notice or our processing of your personal information, please contact us at
privacy@connatix.com
.
...
WHAT WE COLLECT AND WHY
Scenario
Purposes
Categories of information processed
Contacting us with an inquiry through the Website
Our business development
Name, email address, company affiliation, position, and content of inquiry
Managing the contracts and business relationship with customers and partners
Administering the business and professional services relationship with customers and partners 
Facilitating the provision of support to customers and partners
Name, email address, company affiliation, position, phone number, country, past communications, products, and services used or expressed interest in
Managing the sale contracts and business relationship with vendors and service providers
Administering the business relationship with vendors and service providers
Facilitating Connatix’s use of vendors and service provider’s products and services
Name, email address, company affiliation, position, phone number, country, past communications
Portal Users accessing and using the Portal
Administering the relationship and service agreement we have with the Portal User’s business.
Facilitating the provision of the Portal and support for the Portal
Name, username, email address, password, company; position; phone number; country; past communications; activities performed on the Portal.
If a person abused their rights to use the Website, the Portal, or violated any applicable law while doing business with us
Responding to, handling, and mitigating suspected violations of law in connection with our business
Any of the information mentioned above
...
METHODS AND SOURCES FOR COLLECTING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We collect the personal information from several sources:
Directly from you as when you provide it to us through email communications, a registration form, or when you give us your business card. You are not legally obligated to provide us your personal information, but if you do not, we will not be able to handle or respond to your inquiry, maintain our business contact with you, or fulfill your request to register as a Portal User.
If another representative of your organization provides us with your information
You do not have a legal duty to provide information to us. However, you will not be able to submit a request, access the Portal or be in contact with us, without providing the above information.
...
SHARING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We will not share your information with third parties, except in the events listed below or when you provide us your explicit and informed consent. We do not sell your personal information to third parties.
Scenario
Purposes
Examples of Third parties involved
We will share your personal information with our service providers who assist us with the internal operations of our business and the Website. These companies are authorised to use your personal information in this context only as necessary to provide these services to us and not for their own promotional purposes.
Operating the Website and our business
Amazon Web Services
If you abused your rights to use the Website or violated any applicable law in the course of doing business with us.
Responding to, handling, and mitigating suspected violations of law in connection with our business.
Competent authorities, legal counsels, and advisors.
If a judicial, governmental, or regulatory authority requires us to disclose your information.
Complying with a binding request from a competent authority.
Competent authorities.
If the operation of the Website or our business is organized within a different framework, or through another legal structure or entity (such as due to a merger or acquisition).
Enabling a structural change in the operation of the Website and our business.
The target entity of the merger or acquisition, legal counsels, and advisors.
...
DATA RETENTION AND SECURITY
We retain your information for the duration we need it to operate the Website, the Portal and our business, and interact with customers, partners, and suppliers, and thereafter as needed for record-keeping matters.
We will retain your information for the duration needed to support our ordinary business activities operating the Website, the Portal and interacting with existing and potential customers, suppliers, and partners. Thereafter, we will still retain your personal information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, establish, and defend legal claims and enforce our agreements. The overall period of retention is approximately 7 years.
We implement measures to secure your information
We implement measures to reduce the risks of damage, loss of information and unauthorized access or use of information. However, these measures do not provide absolute information security. Therefore, although efforts are made to secure your personal information, there is no guarantee that it will be immune from information security risks.
...
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR INDIVIDUALS IN THE EU OR UK
Controller and GDPR representative
Name
Address
EU GDPR Representative
Connatix Native Exchange Inc.
666 Broadway, 10th Floor, New York, NY 10012, United States of America
Connatix Native Exchange Romania S.R.L (Ltd.)
36 Ploiesti Street, 2nd Floor, Cluj-Napoca, Romania
RO-Office@connatix.com
International data transfers
To facilitate processing your information within the companies in our corporate group and by our service providers, we will transfer your information to countries such as the United States. We do so under the terms of a data transfer agreement which contain standard data protection contract clauses with adequate safeguards determined by the EU Commission.
Legal basis for processing your personal data
Purpose or Scenario
Legal Basis
Responding to your inquiry
Legitimate interests in developing potential leads and responding to business inquiries
Administering the business and services relationship with customers and partners.
Facilitating the provision of support to the customer or partner.
Legitimate interests in administering and performing the contractual obligations with customers and partners
Administering the business relationship with vendors and service providers
Facilitating Connatix’s use of vendors and service provider’s products and services
Legitimate interests in administering contractual obligations with service provider and vendors
Responding to, handling, and mitigating suspected violations of law in connection with our business
Legitimate interests in defending and enforcing against violations and breaches that are harmful to our business
Complying with a binding request from a competent authority
Legitimate interests in complying with mandatory legal requirements imposed on us
Enabling a structural change in the operation of the Website and our business
Legitimate interests in our business continuity
Data subject rights
If you are in the EU or the UK, you have the following rights under the GDPR:
Right to Access
and receive a copy of your personal information that we process.
Right to Rectify
inaccurate personal information we have concerning you and to have incomplete personal information completed.
Right to Data Portability
, that is, to receive the personal information that you provided to us, in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format. You have the right to transmit this data to another person or entity. Where technically feasible, you have the right to have your personal information transmitted directly from us to the person or entity you designate.
Right to Object to our processing of your personal information based on our legitimate interest. However, we may override the objection if we demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds, or if we need to process such personal information for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims.
Right to Restrict
us from processing your personal information (except for storing it): (a) if you contest the accuracy of the personal information (in which case the restriction applies only for a period enabling us to determine the accuracy of the personal information); (b) if the processing is unlawful and you prefer to restrict the processing of the personal information rather than requiring the deletion of such data by us; (c) if we no longer need the personal information for the purposes outlined in this Notice, but you require the personal information to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or (d) if you object to our processing based on our legitimate interest (in which case the restriction applies only for the period enabling us to determine whether our legitimate grounds for processing override yours).
Right to be Forgotten
. Under certain circumstances, such as when you object to our processing of your personal information based on our legitimate interest and there are no overriding legitimate grounds for the processing, you have the right to ask us to erase your personal information. However, notwithstanding such request, we may still process your personal information if it is necessary to comply with our legal obligations, or for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims. If you wish to exercise any of these rights, please contact us through the channels listed in this Notice.
If another representative of your organization provides us with your information
When you contact us, we reserve the right to ask for reasonable evidence to verify your identity before we provide you with information. Where we are not able to provide you with information that you have asked for, we will explain the reason.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority. If you are in the EU, then according to Article 77 of the GDPR, you can lodge a complaint to the supervisory authority, in the Member State of your residence, place of work or place of alleged infringement of the GDPR. For a list of supervisory authorities in the EU, click
here
.
If you are in the UK, you can lodge a complaint to the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) pursuant to the instructions provided
here
.
...
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR INDIVIDUALS IN CALIFORNIA
If you are an individual residing in California, we provide you with the following information pursuant to the California Privacy Rights Act (CPRA). This is also the information we have collected in the past 12 months.
We do not sell your personal information and have not done so in the past 12 months.
We also do not share your personal information for online behavioral-targeted ads and have not done so in the past 12 months.
We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information.
Categories of personal information (under the CPRA)
Specific types of personal information collected
Specific business or commercial purpose for collecting personal information from consumers
Identifiers
Name, email address.
•	Business development
•	Administering the business and professional services relationship with customers and partners and facilitating the provision of support to customers and partners
•	Facilitating the provision of the Portal and support for the Portal
•	Administering the business relationship with vendors and service providers and facilitating Connatix’s use of vendors and service provider’s products and services
•	Administering the relationship and service agreement we have with the Portal User’s business.
•	Responding to, handling, and mitigating suspected violations of law in connection with our business
Other information that identifies, relates to, describes, or is capable of being associated with, the individual
Company affiliation, position, phone number, past communications with you and content of your inquiry.
Commercial information, including records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Products and services used or expressed interest in.
Disclosing your information to third parties
The chart below explains about the personal information we disclosed for a business purpose to third parties in the preceding 12 months.
Categories of personal information (under the CPRA)
Categories of third parties to whom we disclose your information and the specific business or commercial purpose for the disclosure
Identifiers
With outside legal counsels and authorities, for the purpose of responding to, handling, and mitigating suspected violations of law in connection with our business.
With third parties to which a law or binding order requires us to disclose your information to. Our purpose in doing so complying with our obligations under the law or the binding order.
With the target entity of our merger, acquisition or reorganization, and legal counsels, and advisors, for the purpose of facilitating the structural change in the operation of our business within a different framework, or through another legal structure or entity (such as due to a merger or acquisition).
Other information that identifies, relates to, describes, or is capable of being associated with, the individual
Commercial information, including records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Your rights under the CCPA if you are a resident of California
Knowing the personal information we collect about you
You have the right to know:
The categories of personal information we have collected about you.
The categories of sources from which the personal information is collected.
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting personal information.
The categories of third parties with whom we share personal information, if any.
The specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you.
Right to deletion
Subject to certain exceptions set out below, on receipt of a verifiable request from you, we will:
Delete your personal information from our records; and
Direct any service providers to delete your personal information from their records.
Please note that we may not delete your personal information if it is necessary to:
Complete the transaction for which the personal information was collected, fulfill the terms of a written warranty or product recall conducted in accordance with federal law, provide a good or service requested by you, or reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, or otherwise perform a contract between you and us.
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity; or prosecute those responsible for that activity.
Debug to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality.
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise his or her right of free speech, or exercise another right provided for by law.
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act.
Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research that conforms or adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when our deletion of the information is likely to render impossible or seriously impair the ability to complete such research, provided we have obtained your informed consent.
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with your expectations based on your relationship with us and compatible with the context in which you provided the information.
or
Comply with an existing legal obligation.
We also will deny your request to delete if it proves impossible or involves disproportionate effort, or if another exception to the CPRA applies. We will provide you a detailed explanation that includes enough facts to give you a meaningful understanding as to why we cannot comply with the request to delete your information.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
If we receive a verifiable request from you to correct your information and we determined the accuracy of the corrected information you provide, we will correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
In determining the accuracy of the personal information that is the subject of your request to correct, we will consider the totality of the circumstances relating to the contested personal information.
We also may require that you provide documentation if we believe it is necessary to rebut our own documentation that the personal information is accurate.
We may deny your request to correct in the following cases:
We have a good-faith, reasonable, and documented belief that your request to correct is fraudulent or abusive.
We determine that the contested personal information is more likely than not accurate based on the totality of the circumstances.
Conflict with federal or state law.
Other exception to the CPRA.
Inadequacy in the required documentation
Compliance proves impossible or involves disproportionate effort.
We will provide you a detailed explanation that includes enough facts to give you a meaningful understanding as to why we cannot comply with the request to correct your information.
Protection against discrimination
You have the right to not be discriminated against by us because you exercised any of your rights under the CCPA.
Exercising your CCPA rights
If you would like to exercise any of your CPRA rights as described in this Notice, please contact us by e-mail at
privacy@connatix.com
.
We will ask you for additional information to confirm your identity and for security purposes, before disclosing the personal data requested to you, by using a two or three points of data verification process, depending on the type of information you require and the nature of your request.
You may also designate an authorized agent to make a request under the CPRA on your behalf. To do so, you need to provide the authorized agent written permission to do so and the agent will need to submit to us proof that they have been authorized by you. We will also require that you verify your own identity, as explained below.
Disclosures to third parties
California Civil Code Section 1798.83 (and other, similar state statutes) permits our customers who are California residents (or residents of states with similar legislation) to request certain information regarding our disclosure of Personal Data to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To make such a request, please send an email to
privacy@connatix.com
. Please note that we are only required to respond to one request per customer each year
...
Introduction
We, at Connatix Native Exchange, Inc. (the “
Company
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
”), develop and operate a video advertising solution (the “
Solution
”). The Solution is used in websites, apps, and other online media (“
Online Properties
”), by the operators of those Online Properties (“
Publishers
”).
If we are permitted to in accordance with privacy laws (such as with your consent or after giving you a right to opt-out), we will collect and share your personal data in order to display ads that aim to be tailored to your interests.
This Privacy Notice (the "
Notice
") describes the personal information we have and the policies and procedures we use regarding your personal data we process through our Solution.
This Notice may be amended from time to time. We will post any change to this Notice on our Website a reasonable time in advance of the effective date of the change.
Contact Us
If you have any questions, comments or concerns regarding this Notice or our processing of your personal information, please contact us at
privacy@connatix.com
.
a
WHAT WE COLLECT AND HOW
When you access an Online Property that uses the Solution, we will collect and process the following information:
A unique user ID that Connatix generates and is fetched when you access various publisher sites where the Solution is used.
The IDFA (Identifier for Advertisers), if the Online Property is an iOS native app.
The AAID (Android Advertising identifier), if the Online Property is a native android app.
The IP address of the device you use to access the Internet.
Your approximate (city-granular) location derived from IP address. This is not a precise geolocation.
Contextual information: the content on the Online Property you are accessing, the URL, and keywords and tags of content on the Online Property.
Analytics information: the browser type, language, and operating system you use.
The source of this information is the device you use to access the Internet and the Online Property you are accessing.
Some of this information is stored and accessed through a cookie saved on the device you use to access the Internet.
...
WHAT WE USE THIS INFORMATION FOR
We use the information explained above for a number of purposes:
To distinguish the device you use to access the Internet from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as IP address or browser type.
To show you ads based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your approximate location, and your device type.
To show you personalized ads and other content based on a profile about your visits to Online Properties and your approximate location.
To measure the performance and effectiveness of ads and other content that you see or interact with.
To conduct market research to learn more about the audiences who visit the Online Properties and view ads.
To improve existing systems and software, and to develop new products.
To monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity, and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely.
To receive and send technical information that enables your device to present and interact with ads and content.
...
SHARING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We share your information with third parties in the events listed below.
Scenario
Purposes
Examples of Third parties involved
We will share your personal information with our service providers who assist us with the internal operations of our business and the Solution. These companies are authorized to use your personal information in this context only as necessary to provide these services to us and not for their own promotional purposes.
Operating the Solution
Amazon Web Services
The ongoing operation of the Solution
Serve you with personalized ads and content.
Ad networks we are engaged with, as detailed here.
...
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR INDIVIDUALS IN THE EU OR UK
Controller and GDPR representative
Name
Address
EU GDPR Representative
Connatix Native Exchange Inc.
666 Broadway, 10th Floor, New York, NY 10012, United States of America
Connatix Native Exchange Romania S.R.L (Ltd.)
36 Ploiesti Street, 2nd Floor, Cluj-Napoca, Romania
RO-Office@connatix.com
International data transfers
To facilitate processing your information within the companies in our corporate group and by our service providers, we will transfer your information to countries such as the United States. We do so under the terms of a data transfer agreement which contain standard data protection contract clauses with adequate safeguards determined by the EU Commission.
Legal basis for processing your personal data
Purpose or Scenario
Legal Basis
To distinguish the device you use to access the Internet from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as IP address or browser type.
Consent
To show you ads based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your approximate location, and your device type.
Consent
To show you personalized ads and other content based on a profile about your visits to Online Properties and your approximate location.
Consent
To measure the performance and effectiveness of ads and other content that you see or interact with.
Consent
To conduct market research to learn more about the audiences who visit the Online Properties and view ads.
Consent
To improve existing systems and software, and to develop new products.
Consent
To monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity, and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely.
Legitimate interests in preventing fraudulent activity
To receive and send technical information that enables your device to present and interact with ads and content
Legitimate interests in providing the content or ad requested
Data subject rights
If you are in the EU or the UK, you have the following rights under the GDPR:
Right to Access
and receive a copy of your personal information that we process.
Right to Rectify
inaccurate personal information we have concerning you and to have incomplete personal information completed.
Right to withdraw
consent that you’ve previously given to our processing of your personal data, at any time. The withdrawal of consent shall not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
Right to Data Portability
, that is, to receive the personal information that you provided to us, in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format. You have the right to transmit this data to another person or entity. Where technically feasible, you have the right to have your personal information transmitted directly from us to the person or entity you designate.
Right to Object
to our processing of your personal information based on our legitimate interest. However, we may override the objection if we demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds, or if we need to process such personal information for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims.
Right to Restrict
us from processing your personal information (except for storing it): (a) if you contest the accuracy of the personal information (in which case the restriction applies only for a period enabling us to determine the accuracy of the personal information); (b) if the processing is unlawful and you prefer to restrict the processing of the personal information rather than requiring the deletion of such data by us; (c) if we no longer need the personal information for the purposes outlined in this Notice, but you require the personal information to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or (d) if you object to our processing based on our legitimate interest (in which case the restriction applies only for the period enabling us to determine whether our legitimate grounds for processing override yours).
Right to be Forgotten
. Under certain circumstances, such as when you object to our processing of your personal information based on our legitimate interest and there are no overriding legitimate grounds for the processing, you have the right to ask us to erase your personal information. However, notwithstanding such request, we may still process your personal information if it is necessary to comply with our legal obligations, or for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims. If you wish to exercise any of these rights, please contact us through the channels listed in this Notice.
When you contact us, we reserve the right to ask for reasonable evidence to verify your identity before we provide you with information. Where we are not able to provide you with information that you have asked for, we will explain the reason.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority. If you are in the EU, then according to Article 77 of the GDPR, you can lodge a complaint to the supervisory authority, in the Member State of your residence, place of work or place of alleged infringement of the GDPR. For a list of supervisory authorities in the EU, click
here
.
If you are in the UK, you can lodge a complaint to the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) pursuant to the instructions provided
here
.
...
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR INDIVIDUALS IN CALIFORNIA
If you are an individual residing in California, we provide you with the following information pursuant to the California Privacy Rights Act (CPRA). This is also the information we have collected in the past 12 months.
We share all of the categories of personal information detailed below for online behaviorally targeted ads, but we do not sell your personal information and have not done so in the past 12 months.
We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information.
Categories of personal information (under the CPRA)
Specific types of personal information collected
Specific business or commercial purpose for collecting personal information from consumers
Identifiers
A unique user ID that Connatix generates and is fetched when you access various publisher sites where the Solution is used.
The IDFA (Identifier for Advertisers), if the Online Property is an iOS native app.
The AAID (Android Advertising identifier), if the Online Property is a native android app.
The IP address of the device you use to access the Internet.
To distinguish the device you use to access the Internet from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as IP address or browser type.
To show you ads based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your approximate location, and your device type.
To measure the performance and effectiveness of ads and other content that you see or interact with.
To conduct market research to learn more about the audiences who visit the Online Properties and view ads.
To improve existing systems and software, and to develop new products.
To monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity, and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely.
To receive and send technical information that enables your device to present and interact with ads and content.
Internet or other electronic network activity information
Your approximate (city-granular) location derived from IP address. This is not a precise geolocation.
Contextual information: the content on the Online Property you are accessing, the URL, and keywords and tags of content on the Online Property.
Analytics information: the browser type, language, and operating system you use.
Inferences
Creating a profile about your preferences
To show you personalized ads and other content based on a profile about your visits to Online Properties and your approximate location.
Sharing and disclosing your information to third parties
The chart below explains about the personal information we share for online behaviorally targeted ads in the preceding 12 months. Other than this sharing, we have not disclosed your personal information for a business purpose in the preceding 12 months.
We do not have actual knowledge that we share the personal information of consumers under 16 years of age for online behaviorally targeted ads
Categories of personal information (under the CPRA)
Categories of third parties to whom we share your information for online behavioral-targeted ads
The specific business or commercial purpose for sharing your information for online behavioral-targeted ads
Identifiers
Advertising networks
To distinguish the device you use to access the Internet from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as IP address or browser type.
To show you ads based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your approximate location, and your device type.
To measure the performance and effectiveness of ads and other content that you see or interact with.
To conduct market research to learn more about the audiences who visit the Online Properties and view ads.
To improve existing systems and software, and to develop new products.
To monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity, and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely.
To receive and send technical information that enables your device to present and interact with ads and content.
Internet or other electronic network activity information
Inferences
To show you personalized ads and other content based on a profile about your visits to Online Properties and your approximate location.
Your rights under the CPRA if you are a resident of California
Knowing the personal information we collect about you
You have the right to know:
The categories of personal information we have collected about you.
The categories of sources from which the personal information is collected.
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting personal information.
The categories of third parties with whom we share personal information, if any.
The specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you.
Right to deletion
Subject to certain exceptions set out below, on receipt of a verifiable request from you, we will:
Delete your personal information from our records; and
Direct any service providers to delete your personal information from their records.
Please note that we may not delete your personal information if it is necessary to:
Complete the transaction for which the personal information was collected, fulfill the terms of a written warranty or product recall conducted in accordance with federal law, provide a good or service requested by you, or reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, or otherwise perform a contract between you and us.
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity; or prosecute those responsible for that activity.
Debug to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality.
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise his or her right of free speech, or exercise another right provided for by law.
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act.
Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research that conforms or adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when our deletion of the information is likely to render impossible or seriously impair the ability to complete such research, provided we have obtained your informed consent.
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with your expectations based on your relationship with us and compatible with the context in which you provided the information.
or
Comply with an existing legal obligation.
We also will deny your request to delete if it proves impossible or involves disproportionate effort, or if another exception to the CPRA applies. We will provide you a detailed explanation that includes enough facts to give you a meaningful understanding as to why we cannot comply with the request to delete your information.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
If we receive a verifiable request from you to correct your information and we determined the accuracy of the corrected information you provide, we will correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
In determining the accuracy of the personal information that is the subject of your request to correct, we will consider the totality of the circumstances relating to the contested personal information.
We also may require that you provide documentation if we believe it is necessary to rebut our own documentation that the personal information is accurate.
We may deny your request to correct in the following cases:
We have a good-faith, reasonable, and documented belief that your request to correct is fraudulent or abusive.
We determine that the contested personal information is more likely than not accurate based on the totality of the circumstances.
Conflict with federal or state law.
Other exception to the CPRA.
Inadequacy in the required documentation.
Compliance proves impossible or involves disproportionate effort.
We will provide you a detailed explanation that includes enough facts to give you a meaningful understanding as to why we cannot comply with the request to correct your information.
Protection against discrimination
You have the right to not be discriminated against by us because you exercised any of your rights under the CPRA.
Exercising your CPRA rights and methods for submitting requests
If you would like to exercise any of your CPRA rights as described in this Notice, please contact us by e-mail at
privacy@connatix.com
.
We will ask you for additional information to confirm your identity and for security purposes, before disclosing the personal data requested to you, by using a two or three points of data verification process, depending on the type of information you require and the nature of your request.
You may also designate an authorized agent to make a request under the CPRA on your behalf. To do so, you need to provide the authorized agent written permission to do so and the agent will need to submit to us proof that they have been authorized by you. We will also require that you verify your own identity, as explained below.
Disclosures to third parties
California Civil Code Section 1798.83 (and other, similar state statutes) permits our customers who are California residents (or residents of states with similar legislation) to request certain information regarding our disclosure of Personal Data to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To make such a request, please send an email to
privacy@connatix.com
. Please note that we are only required to respond to one request per customer each year.
EXTERNAL API USAGE
Connatix allows users to upload their videos to YouTube via YouTube's external API. Any user utilizing this feature is bound by the YouTube Terms of Service, found
here
.
STATEMENT OF TCF COMPLIANCE
Connatix adheres to the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and is compliant with the Policies and Specifications therein. Our IAB Europe ID is 143.
Sub-policy 7
https://verve.com/privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
Legal
Product Privacy Policies
Product Privacy Policy — Verve Group, Inc. and VGI CTV, Inc.
Product Privacy Policy — Verve Group Europe GmbH
Product Privacy Policy — Platform161 B.V.
Date modified:
March 10, 2025
Advertising and Data Services Privacy Policy
Verve Group, Inc. and VGI CTV, Inc. (together “Verve”) are committed to protecting consumer privacy and to clearly informing users about the collection and use of information.
This Advertising and Data Services Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes how Verve processes personal information when providing advertising, measurement, and related services to our clients (“Services”). This Policy also describes your choices over such processing. This Policy does not describe how we process personal information relating to our website. For information on how we process personal information relating to our website please read our
Website Privacy Policy
.
“Personal Information” is information that identifies you or your household or can be reasonably linked directly or indirectly with you or your household. This Policy does not apply to anonymous, de-identified, or aggregate personal information as defined under applicable law.
Collecting Personal Information
We collect Personal Information when you knowingly and voluntarily provide it to us, such as when you provide us feedback or request information from us. This Personal Information will only be processed in connection with your feedback or request.
Verve may identify your device and collect Personal Information using an operating system-supplied ID such as Apple’s Advertising Identifier, Google’s Advertising Identifier, or a randomly assigned unique identifier (“Device Identifier”). The advertisements delivered by Verve may include forms or other prompts that allow you to opt-in to share data.
We do not knowingly collect Personal Information from any child under 13 years of age. If we are informed or become aware that our Services are being used on a site or app directed at children, we will restrict the use of ad-serving information to uses permitted under the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998.
a) Location Data
In order to make advertising messages as relevant as possible, location data associated with Device Identifiers may be used for targeting ads and as input into location-targeting segments based on the characteristics of locations. Location data is also used to count impressions, clicks, and other metrics to model household locations for the purposes of demonstrating the marketing impact of advertiser campaigns. Location data that you provide to an app or website may be provided to Verve for ad-serving or reporting purposes. In addition, supplemental information may also be used such as a device’s speed of movement and positioning, proximity of nearby devices, or similar information available from an operating system.
You can opt-out of the use of data for location-based tracking by using the settings available on your mobile device. Ads will continue to be selected for you based on more general information, such as location that can be inferred from Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or other data.
b) Cookies
We collect information automatically when you use our Services through mobile websites or HTML by using log files and alpha-numeric identifiers known as “cookies” that are usually stored with the device’s web browser. This includes your IP address, browser type, browser language, device type and version, the date and time of your request, the amount of data transferred, the source of your request (page referrer), and the nature of the content delivered to you. We generally use cookies to help with customer tracking. We may use both session cookies (which expire once you close your web browser) and/or persistent cookies (which stay on your device until you delete them) to provide you with a more personal and interactive experience. Persistent cookies can be removed or blocked by following the directions in your internet browser. We also use log files and cookies to improve the quality of Services and pages you have visited.
In addition to the Device Identifiers described above, Verve will collect information about the type of app you are using and details such as IP address, device type, carrier, and operating system. Verve utilizes this information to uniquely identify mobile devices to deliver targeted marketing messages to consumers. We believe that the presentation of relevant marketing messages assists in providing a more meaningful mobile web experience. For example, this technology enables Verve to limit the number of times a specific message is presented to a consumer (frequency capping), to support product category preferential marketing, and to deliver advertising based on your location.
c) Web Beacons
We may permit publishers and advertisers to use a software technology called pixels (a.k.a., web beacons), which are tiny graphics with a unique identifier, similar in function to cookies, used to report non-personal individual or aggregate information and help us better manage content on our Services. In addition, we may use pixels in our advertisements to let us know which ads have been viewed or to help tailor advertising.
d) Information from Third Parties
Our business partners may also collect Personal Information from you using a variety of technologies, including cookies, software development kits, and other digital trackers deployed on websites, mobile applications, or other digital services. They may share this information about your devices with us. We may add this to the information we obtain from your use of Services. You may be able to modify or disable the collection or sharing of Personal Information in your device settings.
Using Personal Information — Your Choices
Verve uses Personal Information to provide Services to our business partners. They are used to help tailor which ads are displayed to you as you visit websites or apps using our Services. Information that Verve collects as you visit a website or app will be used to create an ad-serving profile used to determine the ads displayed and to report about the effectiveness of that advertising. Personal Information collected by Verve may be linked with other available data about you from our business partners, including linking the various devices you may use. Where permitted by law, we use the information we collect to improve our products and services.
Your Personal Information may be processed by Verve in the country where it was collected as well as other countries (including the United States) where laws regarding processing of Personal Information is less stringent than the laws in your country. To opt-out of the use of Personal Information to tailor the ads you are shown, you can use the “Limit Ad Tracking” settings on your device, more information
here
. You will continue to see ads, but they will not be selected based on your activity across unrelated websites or apps. Some of our Services that use cookies offer an opt-out cookie. These opt-out cookies allow you to decline ad targeting on the websites you visit. This option can be exercised
here
.
Sensitive Information
When we create profiles to serve ads based on your activity across different websites or apps, we restrict the use of advertising categories that we deem sensitive based on local law, applicable industry codes, and our own internal standards.
Retention
We retain Personal Information for as long as needed to support our business needs for ad-delivery, reporting, and auditing, but for no longer than two years, after which such data is deleted or minimized by having unique user-level identifiers removed.
Disclosure of Personal Information
Verve may disclose certain Personal Information:
To service providers who help us provide the Services, in which case we will take reasonable steps to ensure that these parties comply with confidentiality obligations and contractually require these parties only use the information as needed to provide services to us;
To third parties that you ask or to whom you have authorized us to send Personal Information;
To any subsidiary organizations, joint ventures, or other organizations under our control or who are under common control with us (collectively, “Affiliates”), in which case we will require our Affiliates to honor this Privacy Policy;
If we believe in good faith that such disclosure is necessary to (a) resolve disputes or investigate problems (b) comply with relevant laws or to respond to lawful requests from law enforcement or other public authorities; or (c) protect and defend our rights or property or the rights and property of you or third parties; or
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, financing, acquisition or dissolution, transaction, or proceeding involving sale, transfer, divestiture, or disclosure of all or a portion of our business or assets. In the event of an insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership, Personal Information may also be transferred as a business asset. If another company acquires our company, business, or assets, that company will possess the Personal Information collected by us and will assume the rights and obligations regarding your Personal Information as described in this Privacy Policy.
Verve may disclose Non-Personal Information to business partners, such as analytics companies, and to advertisers, ad networks, other partners, and third parties.
To opt-out of sharing Personal Information by Verve with additional parties, you can use the “Limit Ad Tracking” settings on your device.
Verve may disclose information that is anonymous, de-identified, or aggregated for any purpose.
Security
Verve takes reasonable and appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect Personal Information from loss, misuse, and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction, taking into account the risks involved in the processing and the nature of the personal data.
Changes to Privacy Policy
Verve is committed to continually examining and reviewing its privacy practices and may make changes to this Privacy Policy.
Your Rights & Contact Information
Subject to local law, you may have certain rights over your Personal Information. These rights may include, depending on the circumstances, the rights to access your Personal Information, delete Personal Information collected from you, receive additional information regarding the information of yours we hold, stop certain disclosure of your Personal Information, withdraw consent for processing you may have given to us, or opt-out of the selling or sharing of your personal information. If you would like to exercise your right under local law or if you have any questions or concerns about our privacy practices, you may contact us at:
moc.e
1741955663
vrev@
1741955663
ycavi
1741955663
rp
1741955663
or using the opt-out mechanisms
here
and
here
.
Verve Group, Inc. & VGI CTV Inc.
60 Madison Avenue, 8th floor
New York, NY 10010
United States
California residents should consult the “Additional Information for California Residents” and residents of the EEA and the United Kingdom should consult “Additional Information for European Residents,” below.
Additional Information for California Residents
Personal Data
In the course of providing the Services, Verve processes Personal Information as a “business” under the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”). As a business, we do not sell Personal Information that we process when providing the Services. We disclose the following categories of Personal Information to business partners for the purpose of providing our Services:
Categories we collect:
We provide advertising technology services that facilitate transactions among demand-side platforms, advertisers, app developers, publishers of mobile websites and/or apps, and ad exchanges (collectively, “Clients”). Through our Services, we may collect information about you (to the extent that Clients pass such information to us), which may include mobile advertising identifiers, session and persistent cookies, IP addresses, apps used or downloaded, websites visited, browser and operating system type, type of device used, information actively provided by users responding to a form in an ad, randomly assigned identifiers, and general location information and system information that our SDK may collect about your device or network provider. This information is retained for a period of 14-30 days.
Categories of Sensitive Information:
We do not collect sensitive information.
Sources:
All the information above is collected from your device when you are using an app to visit a website and is provided to us by the business partner you interact with by using their app or viewing an ad. We also acquire this information from advertising or data exchanges.
Each Category is collected for the following business purposes: delivering ads on publisher sites, reporting on ad delivery, securing, protecting, auditing, bug and fraud detection, debugging and repair of errors, the detection, protection, and prosecution of security incidents or illegal activity; enforcing our terms and policies; complying with law.
Each Category is also collected for uses that advance our commercial interests including creating profiles to target ads on behalf of advertisers, using data collected from publishers and from other third parties.
Sale/Sharing Information
Verve may disclose the categories of information described above to business partners, such as analytics companies and may share the information with advertisers, ad networks, other partners, and third parties.
Opt-Out signals
If a Verve publisher or advertiser partner has transmitted to Verve a “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” signal, an “Opt-Out of the Use of My Personal Information for Interest-Based Advertising” signal, or a “Limit Use of My Sensitive Personal Information” signal, we will limit our use of Personal Information from that partner and we will act only as a service provider as defined in the CCPA. You may also exercise your opt-out rights as described below.
Access, Deletion and Opt-Out Rights
Subject to certain exceptions and restrictions, the CCPA provides you as a California Resident the right to submit requests to Verve: (i) to provide you with access to the specific pieces and categories of Personal Information collected by Verve about you, the categories of sources for such Personal Information, the business or commercial purposes for collecting such Personal Information, and the categories of third parties with which such information was shared; and (ii) to delete such Personal Information.
Please email us at
moc.e
1741955663
vrev@
1741955663
ycavi
1741955663
rp
1741955663
for instructions on how you can exercise your California access, deletion and Opt-Out rights. You may also submit a request
here
. We will need to verify your identity and that the information you requested relates to you before completing your rights request. We generally do not associate Personal Information (such as device history) with identified individuals as we generally do not have information such as names or email addresses connected to device information. Therefore, we will need your Advertiser Identifier to process your request. If you do not provide us with the required information, we will be unable to process your request.
You may designate an authorized agent to make California Requests on your behalf.
We do not discriminate against you.
You also have the right to not be discriminated against (as provided for in applicable law) for exercising certain of your rights. Verve does not discriminate against California Residents for exercising their rights.
We do not sell or share the personal information of minors under 16 years of age without affirmative authorization.
Additional Information for European Residents
If you are situated in the European Union, the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or the United Kingdom, the following provisions will apply in addition to the Advertising and Data Services Privacy Policy to any Personal Information.
Data Controller
For purposes of the European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”), Verve is the data controller of the Personal Information.
Legal Basis for Processing
We will process your Personal Information (a) for the purpose of legitimate interests pursued by us in accordance with Art 6 para. 1 lit. (f) GDPR; or (b) because you have consented to the processing in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit (a) GDPR.
We will only process Personal Information based on our legitimate interests for storing and accessing Personal Information necessary to provide the Services; selecting, delivering and reporting on the effectiveness of advertisements; measuring the performance of advertisements and campaigns and investigating and preventing fraud.
Transferring your Information outside Europe
We transfer Personal Information from the European Union, the EEA and the United Kingdom, to other countries, some of which have not yet been determined by the European Commission to have an adequate level of data protection. For example, their laws may not guarantee you the same rights, or there may not be a privacy supervisory authority there that is capable of addressing your complaints. When we engage in such transfers, we use a variety of legal mechanisms, including contracts, to help ensure your rights and protection of the Personal Information.
If we transfer your personal information to a third-party service provider outside the European Union, the EEA or the United Kingdom we are responsible for such transfer and we will impose obligations on the recipients of that Personal Information to protect your data to the standard required in the GDPR.
Rights under the GDPR
You have the following rights: (a) you have the right to obtain information about the data processed about you (Art. 15 GDPR); (b) if inaccurate personal data is processed, you have a right to rectification (Art. 16 GDPR); (c) if the legal requirements are met, you may request the erasion or restriction of processing as well as object to processing (Art. 17, 18, 21 GDPR); (d) if you have consented to the data processing or a contract for data processing exists and the data processing is carried out with the help of automated procedures, you may have a right to data portability (Art. 20 GDPR).
We generally do not associate Personal Information (such as device history) with identified individuals as we generally do not have information such as names or email addresses connected to device information. Therefore, we will need your Advertiser Identifier to fulfill your rights. If you do not provide us with the required information, we will be unable to ensure your rights. To exercise your rights, for questions or further information please contact us at
moc.e
1741955663
vrev@
1741955663
ycavi
1741955663
rp
1741955663
.
Our Data Protection Officer:
Fieldfisher Tech Rechtsanwaltsgesellschaft mbH
Amerigo-Vespucci-Platz 1
20457 Hamburg, Germany
TCF Compliance
VGI CTV is participating in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with the Policies and Specifications of the Transparency & Consent Framework. The assigned vendor ID of VGI CTV is 237.
Related: Website Privacy Policy
Sub-policy 8
https://www.smaato.com/privacy/:
Platform
Monetize
SPX Monetization Solution
Integration Center
Mediation Options
Programmatic Deals
Header Bidding Solutions
Advertise
SDX Marketer Solution
Extend Your Reach
Customer Data Platform (CDP)
Consent Management Platform (CMP)
Smaato Intelligence (SI)
Prepackaged Deals
Omnichannel Advertising
Native Ads
OTT/CTV Ads
Video Ads
Display Ads
Market Quality
Overview
Ad Quality
Traffic Quality
Insights
Case Studies
Guides and Reports
Videos & Webinars
Whitepapers
View All
Company
About
Events
Careers
Our Values
In the News
Marketplace Overview
Blog
Docs
Contact
Log In
Publishers: SPX
Marketers: SDX
Get Started
Home
|
Privacy Policy
Privacy Policy
Smaato Privacy Policy governing information provided to us from your use of the Smaato Site
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
EU Applicant Privacy Policy
CCPA Applicant Privacy Notice
SG Applicant Privacy Policy
CCPA Privacy Notice
Publisher Policies
Demand Policies
Partner List
Cookie Policy
SDK License Agreement
Effective Date:
November 7, 2024
1. Introduction and Background
2. Privacy Practices for the Smaato Ad Services
3. Cookies, Pixel Tags, and SDKs
4. Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options
5. Privacy Practices for the Smaato Websites
6. Data Access and Retention
7. Data Security
8. Third-Party Websites and Apps
9. Users from Outside the United States
10. California Do-Not-Track Statement
11. The EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
12. Our Memberships and Affiliations
13. Changes to This Privacy Policy
14. Contacting Us
Smaato, Inc. (“Smaato,” “we,” “our,” or “us”) provides this privacy policy to explain how we collect, use, and share information. This privacy policy (“Policy”) covers Smaato’s handling of two types of information:
Information we receive from our Clients about end users (“End Users”) of third-party mobile applications (“apps”) that use our Software Development Kit (“SDK”), other collection interfaces (collectively, “APIs”), the Smaato Demand Platform (“SDX”), or the Smaato Publisher Platform (“SPX”) (collectively, the “Smaato Ad Services”), and
Information we receive through our corporate website at www.smaato.com or any other website on which this Policy is posted, as well as information we get through other corporate services and web portals we make available to clients and business partners (“Smaato Websites”). We describe the information received through the Smaato Websites in Section 5 below, titled “Privacy Practices for the Smaato Websites.”
We encourage consumers to learn about how information (including information we collect) can be used to market to them, and how to exercise their choices to permit or limit such marketing. We describe ways consumers can exercise that choice or opt-out of marketing in Section 4 below, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options.”
1. Introduction and Background
Smaato provides mobile advertising technology services that facilitate transactions among demand-side platforms, advertisers, app developers, publishers of mobile websites and/or apps, and ad exchanges (collectively, “Clients”), and service providers (collectively “Partners”). We do this by making available the Smaato Ad Services and other tools to Clients. Clients use the Smaato Ad Services and other tools to deliver advertising to End Users, and we in turn provide our services to help Clients (and their own customers) to deliver ads that are of interest to End Users. We explain what SDKs and APIs are in Section 3 below, titled “Cookies, Pixel Tags, and SDKs,” which also explains how cookies and similar technologies (which we also use to provide the Smaato Ad Services) work.
2. Privacy Practices for the Smaato Ad Services
a. Information Collected Through the Smaato Ad Services
Through the Smaato Ad Services, we may collect information about End Users (to the extent that Clients pass such information to Smaato), which includes:
IP addresses, from which geographic location may be inferred, as well as system configuration information such as information about End Users’ operating system;
Rough geolocation information;
Cookie IDs, Mobile advertising identifiers, such as iOS IDFAs and Google Advertising IDs (collectively, “Mobile IDs”);
Age;
Gender;
Device type and other device information (e.g., whether an End User is using a smartphone or tablet, and related information);
Network provider;
Mobile browser (e.g., Firefox, Safari, and Chrome); and
Other unique identifiers that may be associated with an End Users’ device, including identifiers provided by Clients or their service providers.
We refer to all of the above information as the “Service Information.”
b. How We Use the Information Collected Through the Smaato Ad Services
We use the Service Information to provide a variety of services to our Clients related to advertising and marketing, including services we may describe elsewhere on Smaato Websites. This includes use of the Service Information for purposes such as to:
Provide customer, technical, and operational support for the Smaato Ad Services, detect and protect against errors, fraud, or other criminal activity, and resolve disputes and enforce our terms and conditions and other rights we may have. This may also include analyzing, customizing, and improving the features of the Smaato Ad Services;
Provide information and analytics to Clients about the advertising inventory provided through the Smaato Ad Services;
We, or our Clients, may deploy online cookies to track End Users across mobile websites and/or apps, or to associate End Users and these cookies with Mobile IDs. You can learn more about cookies and similar technologies, such as web beacons and SDKs, in Section 3 below, titled “Cookies, Pixel Tags, and SDKs.”
c. How We Share Information We Collect Through the Smaato Ad Services
We share the Service Information with Clients and Partners in order to provide the Smaato Ad Services. For example, we share the Service Information with:
Clients and their marketing and service providers, so they may provide targeted advertising to End Users on mobile websites and/or apps;
Partners that facilitate the functioning of the Smaato Ad Services (e.g., traffic and ad quality verification vendors and data centers).
Even when a Client no longer accesses our SDK, we may continue to use and share Service Information as described in this Policy. The processes we described above often involve cookies or similar technologies, which may be associated with other information about End Users, such as End Users’ interests, demographics, or transactions. This is generally known as “interest-based advertising.” We encourage individuals who are interested in controlling or learning about this type of advertising to go to Section 4 below, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options,” or go to the Digital Advertising Alliance’s (DAA’s) website at www.aboutads.info. We may also share Service Information with third parties:
Pursuant to a request or authorization by an End User or Client;
If the disclosure is provided to: (a) comply in good faith with applicable laws, rules, regulations, governmental and quasi-governmental requests, court orders, or subpoenas, including for purposes of national security and law enforcement; (b) enforce our terms and conditions or other agreements; or (c) protect our, or any other person’s or entity’s, interests, rights, property, or safety, or in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual unlawful activity;
Where the information is aggregated or de-identified; and
As part of a business purchase, sale, merger, consolidation, investment, change in control, transfer of all or substantially all of our assets, reorganization or liquidation, bankruptcy, or in connection with steps taken in anticipation of such an event (e.g. due diligence).
3. Cookies, Pixel Tags, and SDKs
a. Cookies and Pixel Tags
Cookies are small data files containing a string of characters, such as unique browser identifiers. Cookies are stored on your computer or other device and act as unique tags that identify your browser. Our servers may deploy a cookie on your browser when you visit the Smaato Websites. Our Clients and Partners may do likewise on the Smaato Websites, our Clients’ and Partners’ websites, and elsewhere. Smaato may use both session cookies and persistent cookies. Persistent cookies, unlike session cookies, remain after you close your browser, and may be used by your browser on subsequent visits to any given website. Using persistent cookies, a site operator (or a third party they work with) can “remember” what you have previously done on a website and personalize the site, or ads you see, for you. This technology may also provide a site operator or third party (or us, when you visit the Smaato Websites) with information regarding your IP address, browser type, the web pages that you visit just before or after visiting a website, the web pages viewed, and the dates and times of your visits. A pixel tag (also commonly known as a web beacon or clear GIF) is an invisible 1 x 1 pixel that is placed on certain web pages. When you access a web page with a pixel tag, the pixel tag may generate a generic notice of the visit, and permit us, or our Clients or Partners, to set or read cookies. Pixel tags are used in combination with cookies to track the activity on a website by a particular browser on a particular device. If you disable cookies, pixel tags simply detect a given website visit. We, alone or with our Clients and Partners, may use cookies to, for example, “remember” you, track trends, and collect information about how you use our Clients’ or Partners’ websites or interact with advertising. We, and our Clients and Partners, use cookies to provide relevant content to you and replace non-relevant ads with ads that better match your interests. If you wish to opt-out of interest-based mobile advertising, please see Section 4 below, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options.” Please note that disabling cookies may prevent you from accessing some of the Smaato Websites’ functionalities and offerings, and those of other websites you visit.
b. Mobile Device Identifiers and SDKs
We, or our Clients or Partners, may use or work with mobile SDKs (including our own SDK(s), which are described in more detail in this Policy) to collect information, such as Mobile IDs, and information related to how mobile devices and their users interact with our Smaato Ad Services and those using our Smaato Ad Services. The SDK is computer code that app developers can include in their apps to enable ads to be shown, data to be collected, and related services to be implemented. Sometimes, we obtain data through other (generally, simpler) interfaces that deliver similar data to us, which are commonly referred to (and which we refer to) as APIs. We may use these technologies, for example, to analyze or measure certain advertising through apps and browsers based on information associated with your mobile device. If you would like to opt-out from having ads tailored to you in this way on your mobile device, please follow the instructions in Section 4 below, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options.”
4. Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options
In most cases, consumers have control over whether or not they would like to receive relevant ads and marketing emails from our Clients. To change the settings for the cookies Smaato sets on your devices through the Smaato Websites, please visit our Cookie Policy.
a. Opting Out of Online Interest-Based Advertising from Cookies
You can opt-out of many of the publishers, platforms and service providers we work with that support online interest-based advertising from cookies or similar technologies by visiting the Digital Advertising Alliance’s consumer education and opt-out page at http://www.aboutads.info (or the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance’s opt-out page at http://www.youronlinechoices.eu if you are located in the European Union). Some of our publisher Clients have their own opt-out mechanisms that are linked from their websites or their online-posted privacy policies. You should review the privacy policies of those companies for these opt-out links if you no longer wish to receive targeted advertising from a certain company, or multiple companies. You can also click below to opt-out of having the Smaato Ad services used to select ads for your browser based on your online web browsing behavior. When you opt-out, an opt-out cookie (from smaato.net) will be stored in your web browser. Our platform will know the choice you have made when it sees your opt-out cookie, and will apply your choice to all companies using Smaato Ad services for online interest-based advertising from cookies. Please note: This type of opt-out is cookie-based, which means that if you block cookies, upgrade your browser or delete your cookies, you will need to opt-out again. Also, in order for your opt-out choice to be effective, you must ensure that your browser is set to accept third-party cookies such as the Smaato opt-out cookie. Some browsers block third-party cookies by default, and you may need to change your browser settings to accept third-party cookies before opting out. If you use a different device or browser, or erase cookies from your browser, you will need to renew your opt-out choice. Even if you opt-out, Smaato may continue to collect data for other purposes and you still will receive advertising from the Smaato Ad Service when you visit websites of a publisher Client who uses our Platform – but such advertising will not be personalized to you.
b. Opting Out of Cross-App Advertising on Mobile Devices
You can opt-out of having your Mobile IDs used for certain types of interest-based mobile advertising (also called “cross-app advertising”), including those performed by Smaato, by accessing the settings on your Apple or Android mobile device, as follows:
Apple Devices: If you have an Apple device, you can opt-out of most cross-app advertising by updating to iOS 6.0 or higher and enabling “Limit Ad Tracking.”
iOS 7 and Higher: Go to Settings → Privacy → Advertising, and toggle “Limit Ad Tracking” to ‘ON.’
iOS 6: Go to Settings → General → About → Advertising, and toggle “Limit Ad Tracking” to ‘ON.’
Android Devices: If you have an Android device, you can opt-out of most cross-app advertising by going to Google Settings → Ads, and selecting the option to opt-out of interest-based ads.
Please note that these platforms control how these settings work, so the above instructions may change, and the precise language may be different on certain (particularly, on older) devices. Likewise, if your device uses other platforms not described above, please check the settings for those devices.
c. Additional Choices
Advertisers may also provide ways for you to opt-out from, or limit their collection of, certain information from and about you. Please refer to the privacy policies for retailers, apps, and mobile websites to learn more about their privacy practices. You may opt-out from receiving promotional emails from us, such as emails to inform you about events and new services, by following the “unsubscribe” instructions in any promotional email you receive, or by contacting us at
marketing@smaato.com
*protected email*
. Please note, however, that we may still send you non-promotional emails relating to your relationship with us.
5. Privacy Practices for the Smaato Websites
a. Information We Collect Through the Smaato Websites
The Smaato Websites provide information regarding Smaato and our products and services. Through the Smaato Websites, we collect the information you voluntarily disclose to us, and we may also obtain automatically-collected information.
i. Information You Disclose to Us
When registering for an account, expressing an interest in obtaining additional information about Smaato or our products and services, or otherwise contacting us through the Smaato Websites, we collect the information you voluntarily disclose to us, such as your name, mailing address, email address, telephone number, credit card number, and other billing information. You may also provide us with certain information about your business or other individuals.
ii. Automatically-Collected Information
When you visit the Smaato Websites, we may use cookies and pixel tags that we associate with unique identifiers to keep track of visitor interactions and personalize your experience on the Smaato Websites. For more information, please see Section 3 above, titled “Cookies, Pixel Tags, and SDKs.” We may also use third-party services, such as Google Analytics, that gather information such as your IP address, browser type, the web page from which you came to the Smaato Websites, and the times of your visit. In addition, as you browse the Smaato Websites, advertising cookies may be placed on your computer so that we can “remember” your interests. Our display advertising partners may then help us retarget ads to you on other sites based on your interactions with the Smaato Websites. To opt-out of such interest-based mobile advertising, please see Section 4 above, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options.” Opting out in this way will not prevent you from receiving ads; rather, the ads you see will be less customized to you.
b. How We Use Information We Collect Through the Smaato Websites
In addition to the uses described elsewhere in this Policy, we use the information we collect through the Smaato Websites (alone or in combination) to provide, market, improve, and operate the Smaato Websites, Smaato Ad Services, and any other products or services we have or may develop. This includes use of the information to:
Fulfill your requests;
Send information about our products and services, including marketing communications;
Respond to your questions, concerns, or customer service inquiries;
Create aggregated or de-identified information;
Comply with applicable laws, prevent fraud, mitigate risk, and perform similar purposes;
Understand usage trends and preferences;
Analyze, improve, and provide products and services;
Customize the content and advertising you see on the Smaato Websites, across the Internet, and elsewhere; and/or
Perform other purposes at your request.
c. How We Share Information We Collect Through the Smaato Websites
We may share the information we collect through the Smaato Websites in the following situations:
With your consent, including through this Policy;
With our affiliates;
With third parties that help us to operate our business and provide our services, such as entities that provide us with technical, customer, billing, administrative, event planning, marketing, or operational services;
As part of a business purchase, sale, merger, consolidation, investment, change in control, transfer of all or substantially all of our assets, reorganization or liquidation, bankruptcy, or in connection with steps taken in anticipation of such an event (e.g. due diligence);
When required by law or in response to lawful process, such as a subpoena, or to cooperate in good faith with a request from a government or law enforcement agency or official, including for purposes of national security and law enforcement;
If we believe sharing the information may prevent physical, financial or other harm, injury, or loss; or
If we believe sharing the information is necessary to protect our, or any other person’s or entity’s, interests, rights, property, or safety, or in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual unlawful activity.
With respect to aggregated or de-identified information, we may share such information without restriction.
d. Analytics Services
For the purpose of designing our website in line with your needs, evaluating it from a business management perspective, controlling it and continuously optimizing our pages, we use services described in more detail below on the basis of Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. a) and f) GDPR. All of the mentioned processing operations result in a transfer of data to the servers of the providers of tracking or targeting technologies commissioned by us. Some of these servers are located in the USA. The data transfer is based on so-called standard contractual clauses of the EU Commission or under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles and and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the/or Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles. If you do not agree with the storage and evaluation of your data, you can object to the storage and processing of your data in the consent banner on our website. In this case, a so-called opt-out cookie will be stored in your browser, which means that the services used will not process any session data. However, you may then no longer be able to use all the functions on our websites. You can also prevent the storage of cookies by adjusting your browser software accordingly; however, we would like to point out that in this case you may not be able to use all functions of our websites to their full extent.
Google reCAPTCHA
We use the reCaptcha service of Google LLC (“Google”), 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, to protect us from spam and misuse. We use this processing on the basis of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR. This service serves to distinguish whether an entry was made by a human being or abusively by automated, machine processing. To determine this, Google places a cookie in your browser when you use the reCaptcha service and collects and processes the following data:
Referrer URL (address of the page on which the captcha is used)
Browser, browser size and resolution, browser plug-ins, date, language setting
Mouse- or Touch-Events within the reCaptcha box
Assignment to a Google account (if you are currently logged in to Google when using the reCaptcha service, this will be recognized and assigned)
Your input behaviour (e.g. answering the reCAPTCHA question, input speed into the form fields, order of selection of input fields by the user) is processed to improve pattern recognition on Google. Google also reads the cookies from other Google services such as Gmail, Search and Analytics. All of the above data is sent to Google in encrypted form. Google’s subsequent evaluation decides in which form the captcha is displayed on the page – in the form of a checkbox or by text input. A readout or saving of personal data from the input fields of the respective form does not take place. Further information about Google’s privacy policy can be found at https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/ .
Google Analytics – Google Universal Analytics
Smaato uses Google Universal Analytics, a web analytics tool from Google and we have a privacy agreement with Google. Google uses Cookies. The information generated by the Cookies on the use of the Smaato website by the users are usually transmitted to a Google server in the USA and stored there. However, Smaato has activated the IP anonymization, so that your IP address will be shortened by Google within member states of the European Union or in other signatory states to the Agreement on the European Economic Area before this happens. Only in exceptional cases will the full IP address be transferred to a Google server in the USA and shortened there. On behalf of Smaato, Google will use this information to evaluate your use of the website, to compile reports on the website activities and to provide further services to us in connection with the use of the website and the Internet. The IP address transmitted by your browser within the framework of Google Analytics is not combined with other data from Google. We use this processing on the basis of Art. 6 Par. 1 lit. f) GDPR for range measurement and evaluation (so-called statistics). In this case there is no further processing of your data for marketing or retargeting purposes. This serves the business optimization of our processes. If you have given your consent (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR), we will also process your data for marketing purposes. You can find more information on terms of use and data protection at https://www.google.com/analytics/terms or https://marketingplatform.google.com/about/. We would like to point out that on this website Google Analytics has been extended by the code “gat._anonymizeIp();” in order to ensure the anonymous processing of IP addresses (so-called IP masking). If you do not agree with the processing of your data by Google Analytics, you can object here: https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
6. Data Access and Retention
Generally speaking, we retain the information collected from the Smaato Websites and Smaato Ad Services for as long as necessary to achieve our objectives as detailed in this Policy, and to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements. If you are a resident of the European Economic Area (EEA), Switzerland, the United Kingdom (UK), California, or Virginia, you may obtain a copy of the information we have about you, and correct or amend such information, by contacting us at
datarights@smaato.com
*protected email*
or by submitting a request to our online web form. You may read more about this and other rights in Section 11 below.
7. Data Security
We have administrative, technical, and physical safeguards in place in our physical facilities and in our computer systems, databases, and communications networks that are designed to protect the information from loss, misuse, or alteration. No method of electronic transmission or storage is 100% secure. Therefore, we cannot guarantee absolute security of your information. To assist with data security, you understand that YOU ARE RESPONSIBLE FOR MAINTAINING THE SECRECY OF ANY ACCOUNT CREDENTIALS THAT CAN BE USED TO ACCESS ANY ACCOUNT WITH SMAATO. ANY ACTIONS TAKEN USING YOUR ACCOUNT CREDENTIALS ARE YOUR SOLE RESPONSIBILITY.
8. Third-Party Websites and Apps
This Policy only applies to the Smaato Websites and the Smaato Ad Services. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or disclosures of websites, developers, or apps that access or use the Smaato Websites or Smaato Ad Services. Likewise, when you access the Smaato Websites, you may be directed to other websites that are also beyond our control. We encourage you to read the applicable privacy policies and terms and conditions of such third parties and websites, and the industry tools that we have referenced in this Policy.
9. Users from Outside the United States
The Smaato Websites and Smaato Ad Services are provided, supported, and hosted in the United States, and their operation is governed by United States law. If you are using the Smaato Websites or Smaato Ad Services from outside the United States, be aware that your Information may be transferred to, stored, and processed in the United States and other countries where our facilities are located. The data protection and other laws of the United States might not be as comprehensive as those in your country. By using the Smaato Websites or Smaato Ad Services, you consent to your information being transferred to our facilities and to the facilities of those third parties with whom we share your information as described in this Policy. Please see Section 11 below, titled “The EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)” for additional information we provide for the benefit of residents of the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK.
10. California Privacy Notice
Please see our California Privacy Notice for California Consumers
here
.
11. The EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
As of May 25, 2018, a new data privacy law known as the EU General Data Protection Regulation (the “GDPR”) will be in effect through the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK. The GDPR requires Smaato and those using our services to provide users with certain information about the processing of their “Personal Data.” “Personal Data” is a term used under the GDPR that means, generally, data that identifies or can identify a particular unique user or device – for instance, names, addresses, and Mobile IDs. To comply with the GDPR, we provide the below representations and information, which are specific to persons located in the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK and to the processing of personal data in the context of the activities of Smaato, Inc., Barcastraße 5, 22087 Hamburg, Germany.
a. Legal Grounds for Processing Personal Data
The GDPR requires us to tell you about the legal ground we are relying on to process any Personal Data about you. The legal grounds for us processing your Personal Data for the purposes set out in Sections 1 and 2 above (and Section 5 as to the Smaato Websites) will typically be because:
You provided your consent.
In order to store and gain access to information stored on your device, we rely on your consent. For this “cookie consent” (which applies not only to “cookies” but also to Mobile IDs), we rely on mobile app developers and oblige them contractually to pass on only legally obtained data. We do so to fulfill our obligations under the ePrivacy Directive. We may choose to obtain consent in other cases as well, in which case we will adhere to applicable laws relating to such consent and its withdrawal;
The processing is in our legitimate interest.
In some cases, we rely on legitimate interest as a legal basis for processing Personal Data, in order to provide our and/or other data controllers’ services. Such processing goes beyond the original collection of Mobile IDs. A legitimate interest we rely on, for instance, is the tailoring of promotional communications within mobile apps and services, which is beneficial to End Users and is an integral part of the ecosystem by which freely available content is funded through advertising revenue. This also may include providing analysis of and reporting about ad campaigns. We also rely on legitimate interest when we use Personal Data to maintain the security of our services, such as to detect fraud or to ensure that bugs are detected and fixed;
Contractual relationships.
Sometimes, we process certain data as necessary under a contractual relationship we have (such as our customer records and contact information);
Legal obligations.
Finally, some processing of data may be necessary for us to comply with our legal or regulatory obligations.
b.	Transfers of Personal Data
As Smaato is a global company and works with other global companies and technologies, we may need to transfer your Personal Data outside of the country from which it was originally provided. For instance, we may transfer your data to third parties that we work with who may be located in jurisdictions outside of the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, and which may have data protection laws that are less strict in comparison to those in Europe. When we transfer Personal Data outside of the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, we take steps to ensure appropriate safeguards are in place to protect your Personal Data. Your Personal Data will only be transferred to third countries outside the EEA, Switzerland or the UK within the legally permissible framework. We transfer Personal Data to third countries outside the EU/EEA (a) as stipulated by law or based on your consent, (b) based on the adequacy decisions of the European Commission (a public and updated list of these countries can be found here) and (c) by contractual regulations such as the EU Standard Data Protection Clauses (a public and updated list of these clauses can be found here). These safeguards shall ensure an adequate level of protection of your Personal Data and you can access further details regarding these safeguards upon request. Smaato, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Smaato has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Smaato has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.

Further, Smaato is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC).

In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Smaato commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU and UK individuals and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
. or at the contact information in Section 14 below, titled “Contacting Us,” and we will work with you to resolve your issue. If you are a resident of the EU, UK, or Switzerland, you may also contact your appropriate European Data Protection Authority, the UK Information Commissioner’s Office, or the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, respectively, with questions or complaints about our privacy practices. In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we also commit to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to the International Centre for Dispute Resolution, the international division of the American Arbitration Association (“ICDR-AAA”), an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, you may, under certain circumstances, invoke binding arbitration; please notify us at
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
and/or please visit
https://www.icdr.org/dpf
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of IDCR-AAA are provided at no cost to you.
c.	Personal Data Retention
As a general matter, we retain your Personal Data for only as long as necessary to provide our Smaato Ad Services, or for other important purposes such as complying with legal obligations, resolving disputes, and enforcing our agreements. We generally render Mobile IDs inactive within 13 months, provided that we may retain them if we have a legal or significant operational need to do so, such as for auditing, corporate record-keeping, compliance accounting, or bug-fixes. If you are a Client of ours and thus have an account with us, we will typically retain your business-to-business Personal Data for a period of 3 years after you have requested that your account be closed, or such account has been inactive.
d.	Your Rights as a Data Subject
The GDPR provides you with certain rights in respect to Personal Data that data controllers hold about you, including certain rights to access Personal Data, to request correction of the Personal Data, to request to restrict or delete Personal Data, and to object to our processing of your Personal Data (including profiling for online ad targeting).
Right to Access:
If you wish to exercise your right to access Personal Data we process as a data controller, you may do so by requesting access through the e-mail address
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
. When we receive your request, we will provide you with current, step-by-step instructions to follow in order to obtain access. We will then assess requests to exercise data access rights on a case-by-case basis; in doing so, we consider the difficulty of verifying whether a mobile identifier and data we have linked to it truly and solely belongs to the data subject making the request, as well as the potential adverse effects on disclosure of personal data to the wrong individual. Because such improper disclosure would likely adversely affect the privacy rights and freedoms of the data subject, we may limit the Personal Data we make available. Please note that we will only grant requests submitted via email for Personal Data for which we are a data controller, as explained further below. Where we act as a data processor for one of our Clients, we will refer your request to that Client. Please identify the Client your request refers to (if possible), to simplify this process.
Right to Correct:
If you wish to exercise your right to correct Personal Data, you may do so by contacting us at the contact information below.
Right to Object to Processing or to Withdraw Consent:
By using the device-based “opt-out” signals described in Section 4(b) above, you may withdraw consent for processing on which we rely on consent. If you do so, we will cease processing your Personal Data for purposes of our services within 30 days or less. We either collect these opt-out signals ourselves or receive them from the mobile apps we work with.
Right to Erasure.
You also have the right to obtain the erasure of Personal Data concerning you that we hold as a data controller. The above opt-out process satisfies this right. When an End User opts-out through device settings, and we receive this signal from our Clients, the Personal Data we use to provide our services will be deleted within 30 days (if you have an Android device) or permanently rendered disconnected to your device (if you have an iOS device). We will also manually delete your Personal Data, subject our identity verification process mentioned above, if you prefer that we do so; please contact us at
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
for further instructions on exercising this right manually. Please note, however, that we may retain copies of certain Personal Data on inactive or backup files, for our own internal and necessary purposes, such as auditing, accounting and billing, legal, or bug detection. We will retain your Personal Data for the period necessary to fulfill any important purposes that we have in retaining it, principally regarding legal, auditing, accounting, and billing obligations.
Right to Lodge Complaints.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. However, we hope that you will first consult with us, so that we may work with you to resolve any complaint or concern you might have.
e.	Smaato as a Data Controller and a Data Processor
EU data protection law makes a distinction between organizations that process Personal Data for their own purposes (known as “data controllers”) and organizations that process Personal Data on behalf of other organizations (known as “data processors”). If you have a question or complaint about how your Personal Data is handled, we encourage you to direct your inquiry to the relevant data controller, since data controllers hold primary responsibility for your Personal Data. Smaato may act as either a data controller or a data processor in handling your Personal Data, depending on the precise circumstances. For instance, for Personal Data that we use internally and independently to operate the Smaato Ad Services, and for Personal Data that we collect about our Clients, we are a data controller. If Smaato is acting as a data Controller, it remains primarily liable where this data is passed to third parties. But when we handle Personal Data strictly on behalf of our Clients or Partners in order to provide our services to them, we are a data processor. Thus, for instance, if you have questions about data that is used primarily by a mobile app on which our technology is embedded – or companies that serve ads that use our technology – you should contact those companies regarding questions about the Personal Data they handle and control.
f.	Contact Details and Controller
This data protection information applies to data processing by the data controller Smaato, Inc. for users based in the European Economic Area, Switzerland or the UK, unless otherwise stated in a service-specific data protection notice.
Smaato, Inc.
350 Fifth Avenue
Suite 7700
New York, NY 10118
Or our German office at:
Barcastraße 5, 1st Floor
22087 Hamburg, Germany
E-mail:
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
Our Data Protection Officer:
Fieldfisher Tech Rechtsanwaltsgesellschaft mbH
Amerigo-Vespucci-Platz 1
20457 Hamburg
Supervisory Authority
The Hamburg Commissioner for Data Protection and Freedom of Information
Ludwig-Erhard-Str 22, 7th floor
20459 Hamburg
Tel.: +49 (040) 42854-4040
E-mail:
mailbox@datenschutz.hamburg.de
*protected email*
12. Our Memberships and Affiliations
To help and foster the protection of consumer privacy, Smaato is an active member or participant of industry associations that govern the policies on consumer privacy in the context of internet-based advertising, including: the Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) America and Europe, the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA), and the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Smaato participates in, and complies with the policies and technical specifications of, the IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework (IAB TCF). Smaato’s IAB Europe-assigned identification number is Vendor ID #82. Please see Section 4 above, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options,” for more information about your privacy choices.
13. Changes to This Privacy Policy
We may occasionally update this Policy to reflect changes to our privacy practices. The amended Policy will be displayed on the Smaato Websites. Please check our Policy regularly to ensure you have read the latest version and to stay informed of our privacy practices. Your continued access to and use of the Smaato Websites and Smaato Ad Services constitute your acknowledgment of this Policy and any updates.
14. Contacting Us
If you have any general questions regarding this Policy, you may contact us by email at
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
or mailing the following address:
Smaato, Inc.
350 Fifth Avenue
Suite 7700
New York, NY 10118
Search
To give you the best possible experience on our website, we use cookies and comparable technologies. Mandatory cookies are needed for the functionality of the site; other cookies are used for performance and marketing purposes.

Among the providers that set other cookies on our site is Google Ireland Ltd. ("Google"). Google is based in the USA and processes the personal data collected there. By clicking on "Allow all cookies (including from US providers)", you also expressly consent to the processing of your data in the USA in accordance with Art. 49 Para. 1 S.1 lit. a) of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR). Under the item "Cookie Settings" you can, among other things, specifically set whether you allow the transfer of data to companies in the USA.

For more information about cookies and the processing of personal data, please see our
Cookie Policy
Reject All
Accept All
Cookies Settings
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 9
https://www.wunderkind.co/privacy/:
Privacy Policy
Wunderkind Corporation
Effective Date of Current Policy: June 28, 2024
Wunderkind Corporation (“Wunderkind”) is a behavioral automation software and analytics company. We help website publishers (our “Clients”) drive higher engagement from their website visitors (“Users”) via our behavioral automation platform, identity platform, ad serving platform, and performance advertising platform (collectively, the “Platforms”). This Privacy Policy describes the information that we collect through our websites, including
www.wunderkind.co
(the “Websites”), our Platforms, our products, our services (“Services”), including the dashboard for our Clients to utilize or manage the Platforms and our Services (the “Services Dashboard”), and other information we receive from Clients. This Privacy Policy also describes how we use that information.  If you have any questions about our Privacy Policy, please contact us at
privacyrequests@wunderkind.co
.
Wunderkind is a member in good standing of the
Internet Advertising Bureau
and Network Advertising Initiative (“NAI”) and adheres to the
Digital Advertising Alliance self-regulatory code
.
The Types of Information that We Collect and How We Use it
The Websites and our general business operations
Our Websites are directed to our Clients, partners and vendors which are generally businesses. We collect two types of information from visitors to our Websites: personally identifiable information and pseudonymous information. Personally Identifiable Information (“PII”) is information that may be used to identify an individual and includes email address, telephone number or postal address. Pseudonymous information doesn’t enable us to identify anyone but may help us recognize a particular browser or device over time. Both PII and pseudonymous information are considered personal data and/or personal information in many places. We believe that maintaining the distinction between what we consider directly identifiable and what we consider to be pseudonymous can be helpful in describing our privacy practices, but recognize that some privacy laws don’t distinguish between the two types of data.
We don’t knowingly collect sensitive or special category data such as ethnicity, religion, sexual interest, health data or data from minors as defined under applicable law other than in an employment context which is covered under a different policy. We ask our Clients not to send this type of information to us. Some places consider precise location to be sensitive. We don’t collect or otherwise process precise geolocation data (e.g., lat/long) but we may obtain more general GEO data such as postal code or city (e.g., when we infer such information from an IP address).
We also generally don’t collect PII via the Websites unless it is provided to us. For example, if you purchase our products or Services, we may request certain personally identifiable information from you on our order form.  This includes contact information such as your name, email address, and address, as well as financial information such as a credit card number and its expiration date.  We use this information for billing purposes and to fill orders. If we have trouble processing an order, we also will use this information to contact you. We do not sell this information and generally will only use it for the purpose it was provided.
We also collect pseudonymous information via the Websites such as the name of your internet service provider, the IP address of the computer or device you are using, the type of browser and operating system that you use, the date and time you access our Websites, the website referrer address and other log file information.  Like most websites, our Websites use “pixel tags”, “web beacons”, “cookies” and/or similar tracking technologies that allow us to track the actions of visitors to our Websites as described
here
. We use this information to help us improve our Websites and the products, Services, applications, content and features that we provide. We also enable third parties to collect pseudonymous data via the Websites. This process may be deemed a sale of information in certain jurisdictions, and we will provide a notice and provide the ability to opt-out of such sales in those jurisdictions. We reserve the right to aggregate information collected from visitors to the Websites for any purpose, including publishing aggregate statistics about our Clients’ and/or Websites’ visitors, counting and better understanding our site visitors and protecting our Websites from security issues or fraud.
The Ad Serving Platform
The Wunderkind ad serving Platform is designed to process pseudonymous information from a particular Client’s websites, mobile applications and the Client’s data partners and does not intentionally collect PII. The type of pseudonymous information collected via the ad serving Platform includes IP address, browser type, operating system, Internet Service Provider, referrer address, the time/date an ad is served and the site or mobile app that the ad is served in addition to other log file information. This information is used to offer products and Services designed to help our Clients better understand how their websites are being utilized, draw insights on how to better engage Users on their sites, to deliver more relevant advertising messages based upon the User visits to their sites, and to provide Clients with ad delivery reports. Wunderkind operates the Ad Serving Platform as a “service provider” in that we only process such information as directed in writing by each Client.
The Behavioral Automation Platform
The Behavioral Automation Platform is a marketing technology offering that enables our Clients to target ads and emails powered by data that each Client collects from direct interactions with its customers. Wunderkind processes email addresses and other PII such as telephone number via our behavioral automation Platform. We typically obtain this information from our Clients that collect it via online forms on Client owned websites, mobile applications, and other digital properties (collectively, “Digital Properties”). We use this data only as directed by each Client. Our systems may access this information automatically as each data point is entered by a user into a particular web form in accordance with applicable law. We combine this PII with pseudonymous information also collected via Client Digital Properties such as a Client’s User ID, mobile o/s advertising ID, hashed user emails and/or other pseudonymous IDs to help our Clients with conversion tracking, site optimization and conversion. We may also collect an email address and a Client’s User ID when directed by a Client (e.g., when a user clicks on a link sent by one of our Clients via the Client’s email service provider). Wunderkind and our Clients may also use this information to send targeted email and SMS marketing messages to our Clients’ customers and prospective customers. We only deploy messages as directed the applicable Client but may use machine learning via data collected across Client Digital Properties to optimize ad and message timing and to use data to target ads and marketing messages to users inferred interests..
You can opt out of receiving any further marketing or promotional text (e.g, SMS/MMS) messages from Wunderkind at any time by replying “STOP” to any SMS message you receive from Wunderkind.  For help, reply “HELP” to any SMS message you receive from Wunderkind.  In addition to any fee of which you are notified, your mobile provider’s standard message and data rates may apply to the SMS message correspondence with Wunderkind according to your individual rate plan provided by your wireless carrier.  Please consult your mobile service carrier’s pricing plan to determine the charges for browsing data and sending and receiving SMS messages.  Under no circumstances will Wunderkind or Wunderkind’s affiliates be responsible for any SMS messaging or wireless charges incurred by you or by a person that has access to your wireless device or telephone number. If your carrier does not permit SMS messages, you may not receive the SMS messages.
The Identity Platform
The Identity Platform is designed to enable our Clients to activate their data in and across any marketing channel. Our Clients provide us with their customer emails lists and other PII, and we hash that PII for each customer into a pseudonymous ID. Our Clients may also provide us with demographic, purchase and site visit data for their customers, and that data is only used as directed by each Client.  Where our systems see that same user visit Client Digital Properties via different browsers and devices, we process the hashed email addresses, cookie IDs, mobile advertising o/s IDs and other pseudonymous identifiers in order to help us understand whether two devices are likely to be used by the same User or household. For example, where a User opens an email and we are able to place a cookie on that User’s browser, we may be able to determine that this was the same User that had recently visited and logged into our Client’s website. Once we’ve established that linkage, we may use the information across Clients to enable Clients to more effectively recognize Users via these pseudonymous identifiers, and to enable Clients to leverage the data collected from their Digital Properties as well as their customer demographic data.  This technology enables us to identify browsers and devices over time and across different websites via the Identify Platform while ensuring that each Client’s customer demographic and targeting data remain under the control of each individual Client. Wunderkind may use machine learning via data collected across Client Digital Properties to optimize ad and message timing and to use data to target ads and marketing messages to users inferred interests. We also may enable Clients to leverage those pseudonymous identifiers to purchase advertising on the Wunderkind Performance Advertising Platform as well as digital media platforms owned and operated by third parties.
The Performance Advertising Platform
Wunderkind also operates a Performance Advertising Platform that enables our Clients to both create and utilize interest segments (e.g., frequent shopping, interest in fishing) from data collected across multiple non-affiliated websites or mobile apps in order to deliver more relevant ads to your browser or device. These segments are provided to us by Clients based on their customer interactions with each Client (e.g., visits to Client sites). The segments may also include data provided by third-party data partners. The segments are attached to one or more pseudonymous identifiers described below for the purpose of delivering, customizing and reporting on advertising messages purchased via digital media platforms.
The Audiences Platform
The Audiences Platform is a personalization platform that acts as a central repository for Client marketing data and enables our Clients to activate that data to send marketing messages. Such marketing messages are determined by each client based on automated triggers (e.g., when a user abandons a digital shopping cart) as well as via recurring sends (e.g., monthly emails to a Client’s best customers). Wunderkind collects email addresses and other PII such as telephone number via the Audiences Platform and use this data as directed by each Client. Our systems may access this information automatically as each data point is entered by a user into a particular web form in accordance with applicable law. We combine this PII with pseudonymous information also collected via Client Digital Properties such as a Client’s User ID, mobile o/s advertising ID, hashed user emails and/or other pseudonymous IDs to help our Clients with conversion tracking, site optimization and conversion. Wunderkind may use machine learning via data collected across Client Digital Properties to optimize ad and message timing and to use data to target ads and marketing messages to users inferred interests. Wunderkind and our Clients may also use this information to send customized and retargeted email, text (e.g., SMS/MMS) marketing messages to our Clients’ customers and prospective customers and we may use aggregate information to improve all of our Platforms, products or Services.
Our Services Dashboard
Employees of our Clients (“Client Personnel”) may provide contact information, such as their name and email addresses, in the Services Dashboard. We may use such contact information to message those Client Personnel to inform them about new releases, new functionality or services, training or other events being offered by Wunderkind that may be of interest to users of our Services, to provide important information about the Services (such as dates and times for scheduled maintenance), and for other purposes consistent with our ability to provide our Services and keep our Clients informed about our Services.
Additionally, when Client Personnel access or use the Services Dashboard, we will track and collect usage data, such as the date and time they visited the Services Dashboard, what information and data have been accessed via the Services Dashboard and other interactions they may have with the Services Dashboard. Wunderkind may use such data to determine the performance of the Services Dashboard, analyze how users of the Services Dashboard are utilizing our Services, identify potentially fraudulent or malicious activity, and for other purposes consistent with our ability to provide our Services and maintain or improve the Services Dashboard.
Profile Segments by the Wunderkind Platforms
Some of The Wunderkind Platforms processes data to draw inferences about Users based upon website visits and mobile app usage. Some of our Platforms also help our Clients collect email addresses and telephone numbers. We use the collected information to help our Clients engage their site visitors and bolster their advertising programs. Some examples of behaviors which generate profiles include: whether or not a visitor has visited a particular website, purchased something from that website, interacted with certain ads or other features placed on the website and/or submitted their email address to the website. As noted above, we may use machine learning via data collected across Client Digital Properties to optimize message timing and to use data to target ads to users inferred interests. To that end, our systems may create profile segments generated via artificial intelligence (AI). When we use AI in this way, we take steps to: (a) evaluate the privacy risks (if any) so that they may be mitigated, (b) roll-up any profiles created into broad commercial topics which don’t identify any individual Client, and (c) stop using the AI for users that have requested that we stop. We don’t create profiles which are considered sensitive or high risk under applicable law, and we don’t sell data collected via our Platforms except as otherwise indicated. The profiles created by our Platforms enable our Clients to offer a more engaging experience when you visit their websites and help our Clients serve targeting advertising messages on other websites.
The Tracking Technologies used by our Platforms and our Services
Our Platforms and our Services may utilize tracking technologies such as pixel tags, HTML5 cookies,
HTTP cookies
,
web beacons
, statistical identifiers, and mobile o/s advertising identifiers such as Apple’s IDFA, the Android Advertising ID and other pseudonymous information. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
allaboutcookies.org
. Statistical identifiers are created when our systems read pseudonymous information about your computer or device, including the user agent, IP address, and the browser and operating system of your computer and device. We call this statistical identifier a “BxID”. Statistical identifiers enable our systems to determine within a reasonable level of certainty that they are encountering the same computer or device, including in environments where third-party cookies are not supported. If you would like to reset the value of this identifier, you may do so
here
. More information on this reset functionality under “choice mechanisms”  below.
How We May Transfer the Information We Gather to Third Parties
Generally, we will not disclose the PII that we collect through your use of our Websites or the Services Dashboard to unaffiliated third parties without consent.  We reserve the right, however, to provide such information to our affiliates, employees, contractors, agents, service providers and designees to the extent necessary to enable them to perform certain services for us, including order fulfillment and Website-related services such as web hosting, to improve Website-related services and features, to perform maintenance services, to distribute advertisements and other marketing materials on our behalf and to host our data. Other third-party service providers used by Wunderkind include: a) cloud computer, data storage and file storage providers, b) email marketing providers, c) website and b2b sales analytics providers, d) customer relationship management, contact database vendors, data hygiene vendors, survey vendors and project management software providers, e) customer billing systems partners, f) login authentication providers to ensure that the logins to our systems are working efficiently, g) social media platforms for advertising and marketing purposes, h) outsourced computer programmers helping ensure our systems are operating properly, i) auditing, debugging and security vendors. These agents work on our behalf and use data only as directed by us under written agreements which outline how they may use such data and require that such third party agents provide at least the same level of privacy protection as we do.
Wunderkind may transfer data collected through Wunderkind’s Website, and our marketing activities to entities such as: (i) website analytics vendors, who collect cookie and website engagement information to help understand website performance, (ii) advertising vendors, who collect cookie and website engagement information to target relevant advertising, and (iii) email marketing and lead database vendors, who collect email address and other personal information to improve email marketing efforts. We also may transfer some of the data collected via the Services Dashboard to analytics vendors. Some of the transfers to these entities would constitute a sale or sharing of personal information under applicable law.
Our Platforms are designed to interact with a number of other affiliated technology platforms as described
here
. While we don’t operate a data marketplace, some of the transfers of data from the Platforms may be considered a sale of personal information under certain jurisdictions in the U.S. such as the state of California. For example, where we use the Identity Platform to create pseudonymous IDs to identify browsers and devices, we enable the use of those pseudonymous IDs across multiple Clients. Where we are acting as an agent (i.e., a service provider / data processor) for our Clients, we will transfer information as directed by such Clients. This collection and use is generally subject to our respective Clients’ privacy policies, not ours. We also reserve the right to disclose any information that we collect to any third party if we believe that we are required to do so for any or all of the following reasons: (i) to comply with the law; (ii) to comply with legal processes or governmental requests including sharing data of EU and Swiss individuals in response to lawful requests from public authorities to meet national security and law enforcement requirements; (iii) to prevent, investigate, detect, or prosecute criminal offenses or attacks on the technical integrity of our Websites or our network; and/or (iv) to protect the rights, property, safety and security of Wunderkind and its employees, our Websites’ visitors, and/or the public. Finally, we may transfer information, including any PII, to a successor entity in connection with a corporate merger, consolidation, sale of assets, bankruptcy, or other corporate change and will provide notice of such change on our Websites.
We also may aggregate the data processed by our Website and Platforms in order to derive insights across our Clients. For example, we may publish a report that reflects aggregated statistics regarding seasonal trends in shopping patterns or outlining differences between different retail verticals. By aggregating this data, we have removed any identifiable or pseudonymous personal data.
Choice Mechanisms
Wunderkind supports high standards for digital privacy. We enable Users to opt-out from our Identity Platform (including cross-device linking), our Performance Advertising Platform and from our creation of profile segments as described below. Where our transfer of data to a third-party would be deemed a sale under applicable law, we offer a notice and the opportunity to opt-out from such sales.
Web based Opt-Out Choice Mechanisms.
You can opt-out of our Identity Platform and our Interest Based Ads Platform on your browser as follows:
You can visit Wunderkind’s opt-out page at
https://www.wunderkind.co/privacy/opt-out-of-data-processing/
.
You can visit the Network Advertising Alliance self-regulatory opt-out page at
https://optout.networkadvertising.org/?c=1#!/
to opt-out and to see whether Wunderkind is using non-cookie based technology  on the browser you are currently using. You should select the “opt out” button there for Wunderkind.
You can visit the Digital Advertising Alliance self-regulatory program opt-out page at
https://optout.aboutads.info/?c=2&lang=EN
. You should select the “opt out” button there for Wunderkind. When our systems detect that you’ve opted out via this method from a browser or device located in the EEA or UK, we will treat your opt-out request as a request for Wunderkind to stop collecting or processing data associated with this browser in accordance with EU/UK data protection law.
Some of the advertisements we deliver via the Platforms and Services will contain the advertising option Icon, a symbol that we license from the Digital Advertising Alliance. If you click onto the advertising option icon, you will be taken to a
page like this page
where you will see behavioral advertising and other types of targeted advertising, including a mechanism that enables you to opt-out from Wunderkind’s use of data for targeted advertising.
Each of the above opt-out mechanisms will also opt you out from Wunderkind’s sale as “sale” is defined under applicable law.
When you opt out via the web-based choice mechanisms described above, we will attempt to place an opt-out cookie that instructs us not to use information about your browser for IBA on our Identity Platform and our Performance Advertising Platform.
If your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit our opt-out page, we cannot set our no-track / opt-out cookie. Also, this choice mechanism is only applicable to the browser you are using, so if you subsequently erase your cookies, use a different computer or change web browsers, you will need to opt-out again.
Statistical device ID reset
. Wunderkind may also create a non-cookie based system created pseudonymous identifier (a “BxID”) which is used enable are systems to more effectively recognize a browser over time. Information collected as outlined in “The Types of Information that We Collect” may be associated to this identifier over time. If you would like to reset the value of this identifier, you may do so
here
. Note that any new data collected after resetting your identifier may resemble data previously collected if you engage in similar activities on websites.
Mobile App Opt-out Choice Mechanism.
Where we process pseudonymous mobile ad IDs, we honor the mobile device settings for Android and Apple iOS devices. To exercise this opt-out, please visit the privacy settings of your Android or iOS device and select “limit ad tracking” (Apple iOS) or “opt-out of interest based ads” (Android). The NAI maintains a helpful list of opt-out mechanisms for mobile operating system platforms which you may find
here
. For devices where we are able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected about your mobile app usage on our Identity Platform and our performance advertising  Platform. This choice mechanism is only applicable to the apps you are using on your current mobile device.
Precise Location Choices.
While we don’t generally collect or otherwise process precise location data such as lat/long, we offer the following information as a courtesy. If you’d like to adjust your choices regarding the use of precise location data by third parties, you may do so via your device settings. For your convenience, we provide links to instructions for both
Apple iOS
and
Android
devices. Also, most mobile applications that collect precise location information offer mechanisms to control the collection and use of precise location information. Please note that these choice mechanisms won’t impact previously collected precise location information.
Some of our Clients may utilize third-party advertisers on their websites. These third-party advertisers generally collect pseudonymous information across multiple non-affiliated websites and mobile apps to create interest segments for ad targeting and content customization purposes. This practice is sometimes referred to as interest based advertising (“IBA”) or online behavioral advertising (“OBA”) and is distinct from the Behavioral Automation Platform and Identity Platform offered by Wunderkind.  To learn more about third-party advertising companies and your choices regarding how that information is used, please visit
https://thenai.org/opt-out/
,
https://optout.aboutads.info/?c=2&lang=EN
or
https://youronlinechoices.com/
.
While our systems may be able to recognize a Do Not Track (DNT) setting in a browser or similar opt-out preference signals, we currently take no response to such signals unless required to do so by law.
Wunderkind ensures that text (e.g., SMS/MMS), email, and similar direct marketing messages sent using our behavioral automation Platform contain a choice mechanism as required by applicable law.
Children’s Privacy
Wunderkind adheres to the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act. Our Websites are not directed at children. If we are made aware that we have received personally identifiable information from someone under 18, we will use reasonable efforts to remove that information from our records.
We are Committed to Making Sure Your Information is Protected
Our physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards meet or exceed current industry standards regarding the protection of the information in our systems.  We also require contractors and outside companies who work with us to adhere to strict privacy standards through their contracts with us.  Unfortunately, no security system, or system of transmitting data over the Internet, can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.  Consequently, while we use commercially reasonable efforts to protect information in our systems, we cannot guarantee the absolute security of our servers, the means by which information is transmitted between your computer and our servers, or any information provided to us or to any third party through or in connection with the Websites or Platforms.  Any information that you provide to us is done so entirely at your own risk.
Data Minimization and Retention
Wunderkind has internal procedures which are designed to ensure that we only process the minimum data as requested by Clients. We retain the IBA data that we collect for up to 13 months from the date of collection. Cookies used for IBA expire 13 months after they are last updated. EU data subjects may have additional rights or information as described below.
Data Subject Access Rights
Upon request, Wunderkind will provide you with information about whether we hold any of your PII. If you’d like to update, correct, delete, or deactivate any PII that you have provided to the company on this Website, please send your request to
privacyrequests@wunderkind.co
, and we will process your request. We will respond to your request to access within a reasonable timeframe. EU and California data subjects may have additional access rights as described below.
We Reserve the Right to Update and Revise this Privacy Policy at Any Time.
From time to time, we review this Privacy Policy to ensure that it complies with applicable law.  Consequently, we reserve the right to update and revise this Privacy Policy at any time.  You will know if this Privacy Policy has been revised since your last visit to the website by referring to the “Effective Date of Current Policy” date at the top of this page.  Your use of our Websites constitutes your notice and acceptance of the terms of the Privacy Policy as amended or revised by us from time to time, and you should therefore review this Privacy Policy regularly to ensure that you are aware of its terms.
In the Event We Engage in a Business Combination, We Reserve the Right to Transfer Any Information in Our Systems.
If we sell all or any part of our business or sell or transfer all or a material part of our assets or are otherwise involved in a merger or other transfer or disposition of any part our business, we reserve the right to access, transfer or disclose any and all information that we collect from our Websites’ visitors, or that we otherwise collect in connection with the Websites or Platform, to the party or parties involved in the transaction as part of that transaction.
U.S. DATA SUBJECTS IN APPLICABLE STATES
Certain U.S. States each provide additional privacy protections for data
subjects located within their jurisdictions, including: a) the right to see what
data we have about you, your computer or device (i.e., the right to know), b)
the right to delete the data we have about you, your computer or device
(i.e., the right to delete), c) the right to correct data we have about you, your
computer or device,
d) the right to opt-out of the sale
or sharing
of data
about you, your computer or device to certain third parties (i.e., the right to
opt-out from sales
or sharing
of your information),
e) the right to opt-out of
profiling decisions and/or targeted advertising about you, your computer or
device,
and
f
e
) the right to port such data to a different company. We do not
discriminate against you if you exercise any of the above rights.
Data
subjects located in Colorado or Virginia also may have the right to appeal
on
privacy grounds our response to certain of your requests, and may be able to
further complain to the attorney general located in your state.
Moreover,
with respect to data subjects in these places, PII (sometimes referred to as
personal information) includes pseudonymous data such as an IP address, a
mobile advertising ID or a cookie ID.
While we attempt to honor these rights
for data subjects located in all U.S. states, please note that we may not be
able to honor a right if doing so would otherwise violate applicable law.
Further details about exercising these rights can be found on our data
request page.
Data subjects may access those rights with respect to
Wunderkind by calling our toll-free California privacy hotline at (888) 594-
0111 or sending us an email to
privacyrequests@wunderkind.co
.
Below is the details about privacy requests received by Wunderkind in the applicable year:
2023
Received
Complied
Denied
Requests to know
164
164
0
Requests to Delete
53,961
53,961
0
Requests to Opt-out
7201
7201
0
The median number of days within which Wunderkind substantively responded to requests to know, requests to delete and requests to opt-out: 10 days, 10 days, and 10 days. However, requests to opt-out which are made via an opt-out link are honored in real time.
We collect the categories of personal information about California consumers identified in the chart below. The below is designed more as a summary. More information regarding the personal information we collect can be found throughout this privacy policy.
Categories of Personal Information
Examples
Collected in Prior 12 Months
A. Personal and online identifiers.
A real name, alias, unique personal identifier, online identifier Internet Protocol address, email address, account name, or other similar identifiers.
Yes
B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)).
A name, signature, telephone number, education, employment, or employment history. Some personal information included in this category may overlap with other categories.
Yes. Employment information covered in a separate policy.
C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law.
Age (40 years or older), race, color, ancestry, national origin, sex (including gender, gender identity, or gender expression), veteran or military status, or genetic information.
No, although our Clients may direct us to indicate that a particular user is male or female.
D. Commercial or transactions information.
Records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
No
E. Biometric information.
Genetic, physiological, behavioral, and biological characteristics, or activity patterns used to extract a template or other identifier or identifying information, such as, fingerprints, faceprints, and voiceprints, iris or retina scans, keystroke, gait, or other physical patterns, and sleep, health, or exercise data.
No
F. Internet or other similar network activity.
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer’s interaction with a website, application, or advertisement.
Yes
G. Geolocation data.
Physical location.
Yes
H. Sensory data.
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information.
No
I. Professional or employment-related information.
Current or past job history.
Yes. Employment information covered in a separate policy.
J. Non-public education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R. Part 99)).
Education records directly related to a student maintained by an educational institution or party acting on its behalf, such as grades, transcripts, class lists, student schedules, student identification codes, student financial information, or student disciplinary records.
No
Categories of Sources
We collect personal information from, without limitation, consumers directly, our Clients, via our Platforms and Services, service providers, and public sources. More information regarding the sources from which we collect personal information can be found above in the section titled “What Information We Collect.”
Special Data Protections for EU, UK and Brazil Data Subjects
.
The General Data Privacy Regulation (“GDPR”) and similar country specific data protection laws afford additional rights to data subjects located in applicable jurisdictions such as the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom and Brazil:
requesting information about the processing of your data, as well as the receipt of a copy of your personal data;
correcting your data;
deleting or blocking your data;
restricting the processing;
objecting to the processing of your data;
revoking your consent to the processing of your data in the future, and
complaining to the competent supervisory authority about inadmissible data processing.
These rights can be exercised by visiting our
data request page
. Moreover, with respect to data subjects in these places, PII (sometimes referred to as personal data) includes pseudonymous data such as an IP address, a mobile advertising ID or a cookie ID.  Where Wunderkind is a processor of data (e.g., via the Behavioral Automation or Ad Serving Platforms), the legal basis for processing such data and the retention period is determined by our Clients. Where Wunderkind is a controller of data (e.g., via the Performance Advertising or Identity Platforms to the extent we choose to operate those platforms in the EU), the legal basis will be both legitimate interest (e.g., where we have evaluated that our interests are not overridden by Users’ fundamental rights) and consent depending on the type of information subject to processing and the information we receive from upstream partners. Where Wunderkind receives a request to cease processing of data from a data subject located in the EU or Switzerland, Wunderkind will stop all data processing with respect to the opted-out browser or device unless such processing is required by law. Wunderkind’s Data Protection Officer is Alan Chapell and Wunderkind’s EU representative is Verasafe and both may be contacted at dpo@wunderkind.co or by mailing to the address found below. Wunderkind’s UK contact details are also provided below.
Cross-border data transfers between the EU, Switzerland, UK and the U.S.
Wunderkind is based in the United States, and recipients of the data disclosures described in this Privacy Policy are located in the United States and elsewhere in the world, including where privacy laws may not provide as much protection as those of your country of residence.  Wunderkind complies with legal requirements for cross-border data protection, including through the use of European Commission-approved Standard Contractual Clauses and similar contract language required under applicable data protection laws.
Certain U.S. States each provide additional privacy protections for data
subjects located within their jurisdictions, including: a) the right to see what
data we have about you, your computer or device (i.e., the right to know), b)
the right to delete the data we have about you, your computer or device
(i.e., the right to delete), c) the right to correct data we have about you, your
computer or device,
d) the right to opt-out of the sale
or sharing
of data
about you, your computer or device to certain third parties (i.e., the right to
opt-out from sales
or sharing
of your information),
e) the right to opt-out of
profiling decisions and/or targeted advertising about you, your computer or
device,
and
f
e
) the right to port such data to a different company. We do not
discriminate against you if you exercise any of the above rights.
Data
subjects located in Colorado or Virginia also may have the right to appeal
on
privacy grounds our response to certain of your requests, and may be able to
further complain to the attorney general located in your state.
Moreover,
with respect to data subjects in these places, PII (sometimes referred to as
personal information) includes pseudonymous data such as an IP address, a
mobile advertising ID or a cookie ID.
While we attempt to honor these rights
for data subjects located in all U.S. states, please note that we may not be
able to honor a right if doing so would otherwise violate applicable law.
Further details about exercising these rights can be found on our data
request page.
Data subjects may access those rights with respect to
Wunderkind by calling our toll-free California privacy hotline at (888) 594-
0111 or sending us an email to
privacyrequests@wunderkind.co
.
In cases of onward transfer to third parties of data of EU, UK or Swiss
residents received pursuant to the
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF)
,
the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Wunderkind
is responsible for the processing of personal information it receives under the
above listed DPF programs and subsequently transfers to a third party acting
as an agent on its behalf. Wunderkind shall remain liable under the above
listed DPF programs if its agent processes such personal information in a
manner inconsistent with the DPF program principles, unless Wunderkind
demonstrates that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the
damage.
Wunderkind has certified that it adheres to the DPF program principles of
Notice, Choice, Accountability for Onward Transfer, Security, Data Integrity
and Purpose Limitation, Access, and Recourse, Enforcement and Liability. If
there is any conflict between the policies of this privacy policy and the DPF
program principles, the DPF program principles shall govern. To learn more
about the DPF programs, and to view our certification page, please
visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the UK
Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Wunderkind commits
to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your
personal data. European Union, UK or Swiss individuals with inquiries or
complaints regarding this privacy policy should first contact Wunderkind at
privacyrequests@wunderkind.co.
We will make every effort to resolve your
concerns. Alternatively, you may contact us at the address below:
Wunderkind Corporation
Attn: Privacy Officer
1 World Trade Center, FL 74
New York, NY 10007
If a privacy complaint or dispute relating to PII received by Wunderkind in
reliance of the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the UK Extension to
the EU-U.S. DPF, or the Swiss-U.S. DPF (or any of its predecessors) that
cannot be resolved through our internal processes, we have agreed to
participate in the
VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution
Procedure
. Subject to the terms of the VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework
Dispute Resolution Procedure, VeraSafe will provide appropriate recourse
free of charge to you. To file a complaint with VeraSafe and participate in the
VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure, please
submit the required information here:
https://www.verasafe.com/public-resources/dispute-resolution/submit-dispute/
Should your complaint remain fully or partially unresolved after a review by
Wunderkind, BBB Data Privacy Framework Program and the relevant DPA,
you may be able to, under certain conditions, seek binding arbitration before
the Data Privacy Framework Panel. For more information, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/european-individuals
. Wunderkind
is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade
Commission (FTC).
Our Websites may Contain Links to Other Websites.
Please be aware that we are not and cannot be responsible for the privacy
practices of any websites that you access through our Websites and that this
Privacy Policy applies solely to the information which we collect.
We
encourage you to ensure that you read the privacy statements of all the
destination websites which you visit.
Changes to This Privacy Policy
This Policy may be amended from time to time, consistent with applicable
laws. When we do, we will also revise the “Last Updated” section above. We
encourage you to periodically review this Privacy Policy to stay informed
about how we are protecting the information we collect.
Contact Wunderkind Regarding Our Privacy Practices.
If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Policy, please
contact us at privacyrequests@wunderkind.co.
We will make every effort to
resolve your concerns. Alternatively, you may contact us at the address
below:
TCF Compliance Statement.
We participate in the Transparency and Consent Framework (TCF) v2.2, developed by IAB Europe, and adhere to its policies. Our Vendor ID is 256. The TCF is designed to help ensure transparency, choice, and control over how data is used for online behavioral advertising purposes. For more information about the TCF, please visit
https://iabeurope.eu/transparency-consent-framework/.
Wunderkind Corporation
Attn: Privacy Officer
1 World Trade Center, FL 74
New York, NY 10007
Wunderkind UK:
16 Dufour’s Place
London
W1F 7SP
UK GDPR Representative:
Wulfric Light-Wilkinson
General Manager, EMEA
Email: privacyrequests@wunderkind.co
Ask WunderBot
Hide
We value your privacy, we use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners, which may be deemed a sale of data. See our
privacy policy
and
Do Not Sell or Share My Data link.
By clicking "Accept", you consent to our use of cookies.
I Accept
I Decline
Sub-policy 10
https://www.openx.com/privacy-center/privacy-policy/:
Learn more about our path to Net-Zero at
openx.com/sustainability
Home
»
Privacy Center
»
OpenX Website Privacy Policy
OpenX Website Privacy Policy
Last updated: February 11, 2025
What does this Policy cover?
What personal data do we collect?
Why do we collect, use, and store this personal data?
How and to whom do we share your personal data?
How do we use cookies?
What choices and rights do you have with respect to the data we process?
How long do we retain your personal data?
What if we update this privacy policy?
How can you contact us?
1. What does this Policy cover?
This Policy describes how OpenX (
“OpenX“, “we“, “us” or “our“
) processes your personal data. It applies only to visitors to the OpenX website. If you would like to know how we process personal data in the context of the OpenX Ad Exchange, please view our
Ad Exchange Privacy Policy
for more information.
This Policy describes the choices or rights you may have with respect to our processing of your data, including a right you may have to object to some of the processing that OpenX carries out. More information about your choices and rights, and how to exercise them, is set out in the “Your choices and rights” section.
The data processing described in this Policy may be limited as required by applicable law, including the General Data Protection Regulation (
“GDPR”
) the California Consumer Privacy Act (
“CCPA”
), and other federal or state laws, to the extent those laws apply to you.
We encourage you to read this whole Privacy Policy, because it provides important information about how we may process your data, and the choices or rights you may have with respect to our processing of your data.
This policy does not apply to the privacy practices of other websites that may be linked from our website. OpenX is not responsible for the privacy practices of any other websites. We encourage you to consult the privacy policies of those websites to learn more about their privacy practices.
2. What personal data do we collect?
We collect certain information through our website when you choose to provide it (for example, when you create an account with us or contact us using a website form). This information may include:
Information to identify you, such as your name, surname, contact details (email address and phone number), company name, job title, and reason why you contact us;
Information necessary to establish and access your OpenX Community account, such as your username and password;
Your marketing preferences, including any consents you have given us; and
The content of communications you send us.
We also collect certain information automatically including:
Unique online identifiers (e.g., IP address, cookies, mobile advertising identifiers such as Apple IDFA and Android Advertising ID);
Browser information (e.g., browser type, version, or language);
Device information (e.g., screen dimensions, device brand, and model);
Internet service information (e.g., Internet Service Provider used by you);
Derived (non-precise) location data (as derived from IP address).
Additionally, we may obtain certain information about you from our partners as part of our Ad Exchange activities. For more information about how we may obtain and use such information, please see our
Ad Exchange Privacy Policy
.
3. Why do we collect, use, and store this personal data?
We collect, use and store your personal data under the legal bases set out below.
To fulfil a contract, or take steps linked to a contract, that we have with you. This includes:
Communicating with you;
Billing and processing transactions; and
Providing customer service.
As required to conduct our business and pursue our legitimate business and legal interests. This includes:
To provide the OpenX products and services you have requested, and respond to any comments or complaints you may send us;
To monitor use of our website and engage in analysis, auditing, research, and reporting to improve and protect our services;
To personalize our services for you and ensure that content on the OpenX website is presented in the best manner for your device;
To confirm your identity when making payments in order to prevent fraud or detect and prevent any other malicious, fraudulent, invalid, or illegal activity, if applicable;
To investigate any complaints received from you, or from others, about our website, products, or services;
To ensure data are securely transmitted and processed;
To ensure correct and efficient operation of systems and processes, including monitoring and enhancing the performance of systems and processes;
To manage legal claims or compliance, regulatory and investigative processes as necessary (including disclosure of such information in connection with legal processes or litigation);
To enforce our terms and conditions and other legal rights; and
To invite you to take part in market research.
Where you give us consent or we are otherwise permitted to process your data after we give you notice of our processing. For example:
We may send you direct marketing (e.g., regular newsletters or emails that highlight relevant services we offer), which may be sent directly from us or via third party service providers;
We may place cookies on your device. To learn more about the categories of cookies that we use please review our
Cookie Policy
.
On other occasions where we ask you for consent or provide you with notice of processing, we will use the data for the purpose which we explain at that time.
Wherever we rely on your consent, you will always be able to withdraw that consent, although we may have other legal grounds for processing your data for other purposes, such as those set out above. Additionally, please note that withdrawal of consent will not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
In some cases, we are able to send you direct marketing without your consent, where we rely on our legitimate interests. You have the right to opt-out of direct marketing at any time. You can do this by following the instructions in the communication where this is an electronic message, or by contacting us using the details set out below.
Because we are compelled to do so by law:
In response to a subpoena or other requests by government or law enforcement authorities conducting an investigation.
4. How and to whom do we share your personal data?
We will disclose personal data to third parties only as described in this Privacy Policy, including:
With your express permission;
With other entities in the OpenX group for business purposes, such as making sure that questions or comments submitted via our “Contact Us” form are addressed appropriately;
To our advisers (or the advisers of potential purchasers or new owners) in the event that we, or some or all of our affiliated entities or assets, are merged, sold, transferred (including in bankruptcy), or otherwise subject to a material corporate change;
Where we believe it is necessary to protect OpenX or our users, enforce our terms or the legal rights of OpenX or others, or comply with a request from governmental authorities, legal processes, or other legal obligations; and
Where we contract with third parties to provide certain services under our instruction, including service providers managing distribution of our marketing content, data analytics, web hosting, web development, and our website operation or cloud computing services (
“Vendors”
). We ask Vendors to confirm that their privacy and security practices are consistent with ours, provide them with information only to the extent necessary to perform the services we request, and we prohibit them from using such information for any other purposes. A list of these Vendors is available
here
.
OpenX may offer online resources that facilitate discussion amongst our customers and other third parties. Whenever you voluntarily post information to any public forum we operate, please be aware that such information (along with your username) is accessible to other users of the forum, including members of the public if the forum is open to the public.
International Transfers
OpenX complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. OpenX has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. OpenX has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit the
Data Privacy Framework website
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over OpenX’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF).
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge)
here
.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the DPF website
here
, you may be entitled to invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted. In cases of onward transfer to third parties (e.g., instances where OpenX transfers personal data to a third party partner, service provider or an agent which processes such data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles), OpenX is generally liable for the acts of the third party that are in violation of the DPF Principles.
In parallel to adhering to the Data Privacy Framework, in the event that personal data collected from a UK or EEA data subject is transferred outside of the UK or the EEA to an organization in a country which is not subject to an adequacy decision by the EU Commission or considered adequate as determined by applicable data protection laws, we take additional steps to ensure your personal data is adequately protected (e.g., by way of EU Commission-approved Standard Contractual Clauses or by relying on other data transfer mechanisms approved under applicable data protection laws). We are also committed to conducting data transfer impact assessments and adopting any supplementary measures required to mitigate any risks to you identified in such an assessment. A copy of the relevant mechanism can be obtained for your review on request by contacting us using the details set out below.
We regularly monitor updates to the Data Privacy Framework and other relevant international data protection standards to ensure continued compliance and promptly implement any required adjustments to our data transfer practices.
5. How do we use cookies?
On our website, we use cookies to collect information about your online activity. Cookies are small pieces of information sent by a web server to a web browser which allows the server to uniquely identify your browser or device on each page. To learn more about the categories of cookies that we use please review our
Cookie Policy
.
6. What choices and rights do you have with respect to the data we process?
For information on your choices and rights with respect to the data we process, please refer to
Section 7 of our Ad Exchange Privacy Policy
. You can exercise your rights
here
.
7. How long do we retain your personal data?
Where we process account data collected via our website, we generally retain it for as long as you are an active customer of OpenX. Where we process personal data in connection with performing a contract with you or your organization, we keep the data for as long as the contract remains in force and for a certain period after its expiration. This period may vary between jurisdictions depending on applicable law and other factors. We encourage you to contact us
here
to obtain more specific information on how long we may retain your personal data.
Where we collect certain information about you or your device automatically, we retain this information for various periods, depending on the lifespan of the specific cookie that facilitated collection. Please contact us
here
to know more about the lifespan of cookies that we use on our website.
Where we process personal data for marketing purposes or with your consent, we process the data until you ask us to stop and for a short period after this (to allow us to implement your request). We also keep a record of the fact that you have asked us not to send you direct marketing or to process your data so that we can respect your request in future.
8. What if we update this privacy policy?
We reserve the right to update this Privacy Policy at any time. If we do so, we will post the updated policy here and update the effective date. We may also notify you in other ways from time to time about changes to our processing of your personal information.
9. How can you contact us?
If you have questions about this Privacy Policy or wish to contact us for any reason in relation to our personal data processing, please contact us
here
.
You can also reach us at:
OpenX Technologies Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
177 E. Colorado Blvd., #3039, Pasadena, CA 91105
United States
You may also contact our data protection officer at
dpo@openx.com
or by calling us at (855) 231-3834.
Sub-policy 11
https://www.sovrn.com/privacy-policy/privacy-policy/:
Resources
Support
Contact
Knowledge Base
Status
Sign In
Sign Up
Back
Resources
Support
Contact
Knowledge Base
Status
Trust Center
Overview
Legal
Master Services Agreement
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as Data Importer)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as the Exporter)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum Archive
Website Terms of Use
Referral Terms
Privacy
About Our Cookies
Your Privacy Choices
Law Enforcement Request Policy
Subprocessors
Third-party providers
Privacy Policy
CCPA Metrics
Audience Segments
Service Policies
Advertising Supply Policy
Advertising Demand Policy
Take Down Policy
Commerce Publisher Code of Conduct
Sovrn Legal
About Our Cookies
Your Privacy Choices
Law Enforcement Request Policy
Subprocessors
Third-party providers
Privacy Policy
CCPA Metrics
Audience Segments
Overview
Legal
Master Services Agreement
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as Data Importer)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as the Exporter)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum Archive
Website Terms of Use
Referral Terms
Privacy
About Our Cookies
Your Privacy Choices
Law Enforcement Request Policy
Subprocessors
Third-party providers
Privacy Policy
– Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices
– Information We Collect
– How We Collect Information
– How We Use Information
– Our Information Sharing Practices
– How To Opt Out
– Children’s Privacy
– Retention of Personal Information
– Security
– Country and US State Specific Disclosures
– Changes in this Privacy Policy
– Contact Us
– Revision Log
CCPA Metrics
Audience Segments
Service Policies
Advertising Supply Policy
Advertising Demand Policy
Take Down Policy
Commerce Publisher Code of Conduct
Privacy Policy
Last Updated November 18, 2022
Effective Date: December 19, 2023
Sovrn provides data and monetization tools to our customers that allow for revenue generation through digital advertising, affiliate network marketing and commercial data products. We believe in transparency and respecting consumer choice as a foundation of trust, so we have crafted this Privacy Policy to help you understand how we handle Personal Information, and your privacy choices.
Our products are used on websites and other internet-connected services (such as smart TV’s and mobile devices). A more in-depth description of our Services can be found at our
Publisher Products
site.
This
“Privacy Policy”
describes how Sovrn collects, uses, and shares personal information in connection with (i) Sovrn Services; and (ii) our public-facing business websites found at
www.sovrn.com
and other websites that we own and operate that link to this Privacy Policy (collectively, the
“Site”
).
If unsure about any of the information provided, please reach out to privacy@sovrn.com.
Definition of Terms
Throughout this Privacy Policy, we use some phrases that are unique to our business or the technology underlying our Services or may just be new to you. The following are definitions of some of the key terms that you’ll need to know to make it easier to understand this Privacy Policy:
“Advertiser”
means an entity providing ads to be placed on Publisher websites.
“Interest-Based Advertising”
is an umbrella term used throughout this Privacy Policy to indicate cross-device targeting, targeted advertising, cross-contextual behavioral advertising, and similar activities related to the use of profiles to understand the browsing and/or purchasing behaviors of consumers.  For more information, please see the
BBB National Programs
site.
“Non-Personal Information”
means information that is not associated with or linked to Personal Information including aggregate or de-identified information.
“Personal Information”
means any information that can be used to directly or indirectly identify a natural person, such as contact information (i.e., name, address, e-mail address, and/or phone number), and/or information that uniquely and persistently identifies a browser or device, such as an IP address, mobile advertising identifier, unique online  identifiers, email address that has been hashed to generate an alphanumeric identifier, or combination of information about a browser or device (such as IP address and browser type/settings).
“Publishers”
are websites or publications that use Sovrn Services, or natural persons who interact with Sovrn on behalf of such websites or publications.  Publishers are also Sovrn customers.
“Readers”
are individuals who visit our Publishers’ websites or the Site.
“Sovrn”
or
“we,” “us,”
or
“our”
means Sovrn, Inc. with our affiliates (including those not under the Sovrn brand).
Description of Sovrn Services
The Sovrn Services that collect information from Readers are
Exchange and Ad Management for
Interest-based Advertising
;
Commerce for affiliate network marketing, shopping galleries and price comparisons; and
Signal for viewer engagement metrics.
Sovrn is a data broker, allowing us to provide commercial data products (
“Data”
) to our customers, which are also part of the Services. As a data broker we may share your Personal Information with other parties for our commercial interests. Please refer to “
Country and US State Specific Disclosures
” for more information related to specific privacy rights related to disclosures through our data brokerage.
In order to provide the Services, we collect Personal Information from our Publishers as described in our Publisher contractual agreements, and this Privacy Policy.
Please note that the Services may contain links to websites or content operated and maintained by third parties over which we have no control. We encourage review of the privacy policies of such third-party websites and content before disclosing any information to them.
In addition to the Services, Sovrn collects Personal Information through interactions with the Site. By visiting or submitting Personal Information through the Site, you acknowledge the processing of your Personal Information in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices
Sovrn supports industry self-regulatory principles and endorses industry recognized practices and self-regulatory standards.
Sovrn follows and adheres to the industry Self-Regulatory Principles of the
Digital Advertising Alliance
(“DAA”).
Sovrn also adheres to the
Interactive Advertising Bureau
(“IAB”) Code of Conduct, and actively participates in the
IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework
(TCF 2.0). We comply with IAB’s Specifications and Policies under vendor identification number 13.
For more information about industry self-regulation of Interest-Based Advertising, please visit:
www.networkadvertising.org
and
www.aboutads.info
.
Information We Collect
The information we collect allows us to see browsing habits at an individual device level, but we do not attempt to identify the exact individual who is browsing. Here we outline the types of information used in Interest-Based Advertising, as well as what to expect when visiting our Site.
Sovrn Services and Site collects both Personal Information and Non-Personal Information. Sovrn does not collect personally identifiable information (
“PII”
) about Readers that could directly identify them to Sovrn, such as names, surnames, plain-text email addresses, physical addresses, or phone numbers, unless provided to us through the Site when requesting materials or information from us. For clarity, none of the information collected through the Site is used in our commercial Data products.
The following provides more detail into the types of Personal Information we may collect (and in some instances purchase from partners) and use in conjunction with the Sovrn Services and Site:
Identifier
Description
Used by
Cookie ID
A randomly generated identifier (including those created by Sovrn) that is stored on a browser and allows us to understand Reader browsing behavior, without knowing the exact identity of the individual. Also known as a third-party cookie.
All Services and Site
Connected television identifier (CTV ID)
Examples of connected televisions (CTV) include Xbox, PlayStation, Roku, Amazon Fire TV, Apple TV, and devices provided by manufacturers such as Samsung and Vizio. A CTV ID is a unique identifier that is generated by the CTV and is used for various purposes, including Interest-Based Advertising.
Exchange
Device information
Device information can include your browser agent, browser type, operating system, device type, use of ad blocking tools, and information about the possible relationships among different browsers and devices.
All Services and Site
Hashed email
Hashing is a way of making a piece of data, like an email address, into a hexadecimal string so that it is no longer readable. Each email address has its own unique hexadecimal string that remains consistent no matter where the email address is used.
Ad Management and Signal (collect); Data (procure)
IP address
An Internet Protocol address (IP address) is a numerical label assigned by an Internet Service Provider (ISP) to each device connected to a computer network that allows the device to communicate on the Internet. Most IP addresses are dynamic, meaning they change every time the device is restarted.  IP addresses allow us to infer your general location in order to help us understand your data rights.
All Services and Site
Mobile advertising ID
Mobile advertising IDs are provided by the mobile device’s operating system, and can be reset by users. Typical advertising IDs are AAID/GAID (Android) and IDFA (Apple). Mobile advertising IDs allow developers and marketers to track activity associated with a specific device for targeted advertising purposes.
Exchange (collect) and Data (procure)
Personally Identifiable Information (“PII”)
Personal Information that directly identifies an individual such as name, surname and email address. PII may be required for some inquiries through the Site. Sovrn will only collect PII you voluntarily provide.
Site
Unique online identifier
An identifier created by our Publishers to understand an individual’s browsing behavior on their own site, as well as across different websites. These identifiers are shared with Sovrn to help us understand the preferences of individuals so that we can provide our targeted advertising services.
All Services and Site
Voice Recordings
When our customers interact with Sovrn through virtual meetings or by telephone, we may record the call to assist with taking notes and for internal training purposes
Sovrn Sales and Support Teams
How We Collect Information
Sovrn uses various technologies to collect both Personal- and Non-Personal Information, such as cookies, web beacons, tracking pixels, or scripts. We also collect information voluntarily provided through our Site. The term ‘cookies’ is used as an umbrella term for these technologies; for convenience, these technologies are collectively referred to in this Privacy Policy as “cookies.”
Both session cookies (which expire once the web browser is closed) and persistent cookies (which stay on a device until deleted or expire) are used to collect viewing and search behaviors by both Sovrn Services and the Site. For more information about how cookies are used or what information we collect, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Through our Site
We collect Personal Information submitted to us voluntarily, such as name and contact information. For example, when signing up to receive our newsletter or to participate in a webinar we collect your email address. When contacting us via email, we will collect the email contents.
Through Sovrn Services
The information we gather about browsing preferences and purchasing behaviors using cookies helps us provide Sovrn Services to our Publishers, which in turn provides meaningful Interest-based Advertising to Readers.
Readers
.
We set cookies (where allowed) at the first visit to any of the Publisher sites that deploy Sovrn Services. If our cookie is already set on a browser, we recognize a returning Reader and log data using the existing cookie. Readers have the option to use tools provided by browsers to decline to receive cookies or to clear cookies, which will result in us treating the Reader as a new visitor when encountering Sovrn Services. However, in order to stop Interest-based Advertising by Sovrn, individuals must explicitly opt-out as described in the “
How to Opt-Out
” section.
Some of our business partners (for example, Google Analytics) may set or use their own cookies on our Publisher websites or through Sovrn Services where Sovrn has no access to or control over these cookies. Specific to Google Analytics, opt-out by visiting
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout/
Publishers
.
Publishers provide Personal Information about themselves when registering to use Sovrn Services. Alternatively, Publishers may register for Sovrn Services using an existing Google account, in which case Sovrn will receive Personal Information from Google as defined by Google’s privacy policy. Personal Information collected at registration may include: a valid email address, username and password, first and last name, telephone number, website(s) URLs, software, mobile applications, log-in IP address(es), physical address, ZIP code, and country of residence for the Publisher contact.
When using the Sovrn Platform to manage your account, we will also set cookies that allow us to remember your preferences, as well as to collect analytics about how our customers are interacting with the service.
We collect Publisher payment information from those who purchase Sovrn Services. Sovrn provides a third-party service to manage revenue payments to Publishers. This service also provides transactional information to Sovrn for financial reporting purposes.
We may also collect and categorize information about the content on Publisher pages integrated with Sovrn Services and link this information to Personal Information collected through the delivery of Sovrn Services.
Publishers may choose not to provide us with certain Personal Information, but this may limit the features of the Sovrn Services available for use.
Through Internet-Connected Technology
As Publishers use the Sovrn Services or Readers access or use digital properties within the Sovrn Publisher network (including websites or applications on internet-connected technology, such as computers, mobile devices, or internet-connected televisions), we may also collect web viewing and search activities across non-affiliated websites (including websites accessed through your television), directly through content viewed on an internet-connected television, and mobile applications (
“apps”
) over time (also known as cross-device tracking). This information may be linked to Personal Information that identifies a browser or device, typically through cookies or tracking pixels/web beacons.
Sovrn may store cookies on your device in order to:
For Publishers, to allow you to use and access secure areas of Sovrn Services. Without these cookies, it may not be possible to load or offer key functionalities, such as logging in to your account, displaying dynamic elements or uploading information.
For both Publishers and Readers, for statistical purposes and to analyze and improve the use and performance of Sovrn Services and the Site, and to do the same for our Publishers’ websites. We also use cookies for a better online experience, as cookies allow us to load or offer key functionalities on our Site, such as displaying dynamic elements or uploading information.
For Readers, to support Sovrn Services, such as for our analytics and data services and to provide Readers with Interest-based Advertising, including through Google’s Exchange Bidding service, and the ability to opt out of such advertising, all as further described in this Privacy Policy. We also use cookies for social media and multimedia functionalities, where videos and other media often rely on cookies to function correctly. In addition, social media platforms such as Facebook and X can use cookies to see if you are logged in and enable you to “like” content or send it to your friends. When you use these features, such third-party companies can collect information from you. Depending on your settings, these external parties may also use such information for advertising purposes. If you would like to know more about this, please refer to the respective privacy policies of these third parties.
In some instances, our business partners link the information we gather through cookies to device identifiers associated with the same Reader (also known as cross-device mapping). They will then share the cross-device mapping or other user data with us, for the purpose of Interest-based Advertising.
We may also use web beacons or “pixels” to collect Personal Information, which are electronic images that may be used on website(s) (including Publisher websites and the Site) or in emails sent in Publisher campaigns or from Sovrn directly. We use tracking pixels to, for example, collect hashed emails, sync unique online identifiers, deliver cookies, count visits, understand usage and effectiveness of offers, and tell whether an email has been opened and acted upon.
In addition, we may use session replay technologies for certain automatic data collection from Publishers on the Sovrn Platform. Session replay technology is third-party software used to record a replay of users’ interactions on the Sovrn Platform (such as to troubleshoot how a Publisher interacts with our dashboard). The replay may include users’ clicks, mouse movements, scrolls, mobile app touches, typing, and other activity taken during the session. We use these replays for research and development purposes, such as to help us troubleshoot problems with the Sovrn Services, understand how Publishers interact with and use the Sovrn Services, and identify areas for improvement.
Information from Third-Party Sources
We may receive Personal- and Non-Personal Information about you from other sources and combine it with the information that we collect through Sovrn Services or the Site. Sources may include information conveyed to us by telephone, information that we receive from third-party data providers, or information provided to us by third parties through the Sovrn Publisher network.
When Publishers contact Sovrn by telephone or virtual meeting, we use a third-party service to record the call (with your consent) to assist in documentation and for training purposes.  For clarity, we will only record those actively in the call; if there are others in the vicinity, it is our expectation that they are not recorded unintentionally, unless this Privacy Policy has been provided and their approval to the recording has been obtained.
How We Use Information
We use Personal- and Non-Personal Information to support our commercial interests (Interest-based Advertising, affiliate network marketing, and Data), internal business operations (such as improving the Services, fraud prevention and security), and business intelligence.
Commercial Interests
Commercial interests are activities that allow Sovrn and/or our customers and business partners (such partners include data services and data resellers) to earn revenue and include, for example:
Serving Interest-based Advertising to Readers on behalf of our Publishers and supporting third parties’ Interest-Based Advertising activities. Options for opting-out of such advertising may be found in the “
How to Opt-Out
” section of this Privacy Policy.
Providing Sovrn Services, or any other materials requested through the Site (such as electronic newsletters or promotional emails) to Publishers. Options for opting-out of Sovrn marketing may be found in the “
How to Opt-Out
” section of this Privacy Policy.
Creating audience segments* by categorizing Personal Information we have collected by common interests, intent or other characteristics (for clarity, PII is not used for this purpose).  Audience segments are used to provide additional insights, enrichment of our Publisher’s first party data, and to attribute reader interests to browsers and devices to better inform advertising campaigns.
Specific to Sovrn Commerce, we will use Personal Information to optimize links, determine the best merchant destination for clicks, and set the appropriate language and region for click destinations.
We may use Publisher contact information to invite you to take part in market research.
* We do not use Personal Information to derive audience segments that could be defined as ‘sensitive’ or ‘special categories’ under various data privacy laws and regulations.  Please visit Sovrn’s
Audience Segments
page for more information.
Internal Business Operations
Internal business operations are activities that allow us to meet obligations to Publishers, Readers, and third-party partners (including regulatory bodies). Internal business operations do not directly benefit any one person or entity, and include, for example:
Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance with various data privacy laws and regulations, as well as other standards.
Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance with various data privacy laws and regulations, as well as other standards.
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality of our products, content, services and websites.
Improve and protect our products, content, services and websites, to the extent the use of the Personal Information is reasonably necessary and proportionate for these purposes.
Performing services, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying Publisher information, processing payments, or providing analytic services.
Monitoring any Publisher account to prevent, investigate and/or report fraud, terrorism, misrepresentation, security incidents or crime, in accordance with applicable law.
Compliance with applicable laws and to protect Sovrn’s legitimate business interests and legal rights, including, but not limited to, use in connection with legal claims, compliance, regulatory, investigative purposes (including disclosure of such information in connection with law enforcement requests, legal process or litigation), protecting our and others’ rights, privacy, safety, or property, and enforcing our agreements.
Responding to comments or complaints or sending service-related communications.
Business Intelligence
Business intelligence allows us to analyze and report on the performance of Sovrn Services and the Site, as that performance relates to Publisher or Sovrn campaigns, and includes:
Monitoring the use of Sovrn Services to support Publisher analytics and reporting.
Undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration.
Performing Analytical Analysis. We work with third parties that collect data about Reader use of the Site and other websites or online services over time for non-advertising purposes. For example, we use Google Analytics and other third-party services to improve the performance of Sovrn Services and for analytics and marketing purposes. For more information about how Google Analytics collects and uses data,  visit
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Opt-out of Google Analytics by visiting
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout/
.
A Note on Non-Personal Information
We may collect Non-Personal Information through Sovrn Services or we may create Non-Personal Information from Personal Information by removing identifying information (such as email address or device identifiers).
We may use Non-Personal Information for a variety of purposes to operate and improve the Sovrn Services, such as functional testing, analyzing usage patterns, market research, data analysis (including in support of Interest-Based Advertising), and developing new products.
We may also use Non-Personal Information on Readers’ activities collected from Publisher websites (such as page views, use of ad blocking technology, and search queries) to provide aggregate information to Publishers so that they can improve their content and optimize advertising revenue.
We may use and disclose Non-Personal Information for any purpose in our discretion, to the extent permitted under applicable law. If we are required to treat Non-Personal Information as Personal Information under applicable law, then we may use or disclose it for all the purposes for which we use and disclose Personal Information.
Our Information Sharing Practices
Sovrn shares the Personal Information collected through our Services, procured through our data partners, or our Site with the following third parties and as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy:
Affiliates
: Sovrn may share some or all Reader Personal Information with our Affiliates (i.e. companies which are under common control, such as subsidiaries or joint ventures), in which case we will require our Affiliates to honor this Privacy Policy in all material respects.  Please reference the
Sovrn Careers
page to view our affiliate locations.
Business Transitions
: In the event Sovrn goes through a business transition such as a merger, acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of its assets including in bankruptcy, Personal Information may be among the assets transferred.
Law Enforcement, Government Authorities, and Private Parties
: We may disclose Personal Information if we believe in good faith that such disclosure is necessary to (a) comply with relevant laws or to respond to subpoenas or warrants served on us; (b) to protect and defend the rights or property of Sovrn, Publishers, or third parties; or (c) for the other compliance, fraud prevention, and safety purposes described in this Privacy Policy.  Please see our
Law Enforcement Request Policy
for the requirements applicable to law enforcement requests.
Publishers
: We may disclose Personal Information that identifies a device or browser to Publishers and their service providers to provide the Sovrn Services, such as measuring the effectiveness of advertising, advertising attribution, and preventing advertising fraud, or to indicate Reader preferences for Interest-Based Advertising.
Other Third-Party Customers
: We may disclose Personal Information that identifies a device or browser to our third-party customers that include, for example, other advertising services and data enrichment services, who will use and disclose the information for their own purposes. We may also share Non-Personal Information such as aggregated reports derived in part from the information we have collected. The information we share may also be combined with third-party data to provide an even broader service to our customers. Please see
How to Opt-Out
for more information on choices related to this practice.
Service Providers
: We may provide Personal Information to third-party service providers (sub-/processors) who work on behalf of or with us to provide the Sovrn Services including to help us communicate with you. Examples of such services include our ability to send email, perform data analysis, provide marketing assistance, process payments (including credit card payments, through a third-party service), and provide customer service. For a list of our Service Providers, please visit
https://www.sovrn.com/legal/subprocessors/
Advertising Partners:
We may share your Personal Information with third parties that we partner with to engage in Interest-Based Advertising, including through the use of cookies and similar technologies. These third party advertising companies may collect information about your activity over time through the Services and across other online services to serve you advertisements. For a list of our Advertising Partners, please visit
https://www.sovrn.com/privacy-policy/third-parties/
.
Professional Advisors
: We may share Personal Information with persons, companies, or professional firms providing Sovrn with advice and consulting in accounting, administrative, legal, tax, financial, debt collection, and other matters.
How To Opt Out
Sovrn supports various opt-out mechanisms, where each option provides different results related to cross-device tracking and targeted advertising. While using these mechanisms may prevent Interest-based Advertising or the sale of your Personal Information, there are no mechanisms for preventing advertising altogether.
Opting Out of Sovrn’s Interest-based Advertising
Just as there are different mechanisms for providing Interest-based Advertising (such as through a web browser, apps on your mobile device and connected televisions), there are multiple ways you can limit the use of your personal information for targeted advertising purposes and the sale or sharing of your personal information.
To simplify the management of Interest-based Advertising preferences, Sovrn participates in the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA)
AdChoices program
that allows a user to manage their Interest-based Advertising preferences on their browser(s) or device(s) across all participating DAA members.
For more information on how to opt-out of the sale or sharing of personal information, please see the section, “
Your California Privacy Rights
” located in the “
Country and US State Specific Disclosures
” section, below or our webform found in the
Privacy Center
.
Cookies and Unique Online Identifiers Used by Web Browsers
Your opt-out choice will apply to the browser or device where you make the choice. This means that Sovrn will not deliver Interest-based Advertising to this browser or device and we will not otherwise use or transfer data collected on this browser or device for Interest-based Advertising.
Readers who wish to opt out of Sovrn’s collection, use, or transfer of such data from a browser for Interest-based Advertising purposes can visit
https://www.aboutads.info/
to learn more about Interest-based Advertising.  There, you may also access the
DAA WebChoices
tool for managing preferences on web browsers, and to exercise opt-out choice with respect to Sovrn and other companies participating in the DAA’s self-regulatory program.
Identifiers used by connected TVs and mobile devices / apps
Readers who wish to opt-out of Sovrn’s collection, use, or transfer of such data from apps on a mobile device for Interest-based Advertising purposes can download the
DAA’s AppChoices
application to manage preferences on mobile platforms like Android or Apple iOS devices.  More information on your options for opting out of targeted advertising provided through your connected television streaming devices can be found on the
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI)
site.
When using DAA’s opt-out tools, choice will be effective only on the browser or device where choice has been exercised. If using a different device or browser, the opt-out choice(s) will need to be renewed for the new device or browser. Our opt-out tool for browsers is cookie-based, so that an opt-out choice can only be honored if a browser is set to accept third-party cookies. If the opt-out cookie is deleted, then the opt-out choice(s) must be renewed.
Opting out of Interest-based Advertising prevents the collection of Personal Information but does not prevent data collection of Non-Personal Information.  We may continue to collect, use and transfer such Non-Personal Information for other purposes such as contextual advertising based on a current visit to a website, fraud prevention, or improving site performance.
Opting out also will not stop advertising from appearing in a browser. After opting-out, Readers may receive advertising from Sovrn Services when visiting websites of a Publisher who uses our Services, but that advertising will not be interest-based. After opting out of Sovrn’s Interest-based Advertising, Readers may also continue to receive Interest-based Advertising through other companies.
Opting Out of Sovrn’s Affiliate Network Marketing
Readers who wish to opt-out of Sovrn Commerce collection, use, or transfer of Personal Information from the websites you visit, the links you click, or the merchants you make purchases from, visit our
Privacy Center
and choose ‘Disable Tracking.’
Opting out of Sovrn Commerce cookies means that Sovrn Commerce will stop placing cookies on your device when you browse Sovrn Commerce enabled websites and/or links.
To honor your opt-out choice, we need to place a cookie on your device so that we know not to track your activity. Clearing your browser’s cache or cookies will remove this cookie, and you will be required to opt-out of tracking again. Similarly, if you access sites that use Sovrn Commerce from a different browser or device than the browser or device on which you opted-out of tracking, you will be required to opt-out again.
Opting Out of Sovrn Marketing
Unsubscribe instructions will accompany each promotional email we send. Alternatively, contact us directly to change promotional email preferences at marketing@sovrn[.]com.
Regardless of your promotional communication preferences, we will send Publishers messages related to our business relationship or transactions.
For any questions regarding a Sovrn Publisher account, please contact support@sovrn[.]com.
Advertising Choices on the Site
Some of the Advertising Partners that collect data on the Site to help us advertise the Sovrn Services and our business may also participate in the DAA and/or may be members of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI). You can obtain more information about these companies’ information collection practices, and opt-out of receiving interest-based advertising from participating NAI and DAA members, at the
NAI’s website
or the
DAA’s website
. You can also limit collection of your information for Interest-Based Advertising by blocking third party cookies in your browser settings or using privacy plug-ins or ad blocking software that help you block third party cookies.
Many of the opt-out preferences described in this section must be set on each device and/or browser for which you want them to apply. Please note that some of the Advertising Partners we work with may not participate in the opt-out mechanisms described above, so even after opting-out, you may still receive Interest-Based Advertising from other companies. If you opt-out of Interest-Based Advertising, you will still see advertisements online but they may be less relevant to you.
Children’s Privacy
Sovrn does not knowingly collect Personal Information from or direct Sovrn Services to children under the age of 16.
If you are not 16 years old, please do not use the Site. Do not submit your name, email address, or other personal information using our web forms.
As operators of their own websites and content, our Publishers are solely responsible for compliance with law related to the collection and use of information from children under the age of 16. If, during routine review, Sovrn believes children under the age of 16 have submitted their personal information into our web forms or our customer’s websites, we will, in our sole discretion, delete the information believed to belong to those under 16 years old.
Retention of Personal Information
We will retain Personal Information for as long as necessary to fulfill the purpose of collection, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements, to establish and defend legal claims, for fraud prevention purposes, or as long as required to meet our legal obligations. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Information, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Information, the purposes for which we process your Personal Information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
Security
Sovrn has put in place commercially reasonable physical, electronic, and managerial procedures to safeguard and secure the Personal Information we collect; however, no method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage, is 100% secure. As a result, we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your Personal Information. For more information, please visit
Sovrn’s Security
page.
Country and US State Specific Disclosures
Various data privacy laws require specific disclosures regarding the collection and use of your Personal Information. These disclosures are meant to supplement, and are consistent with, the practices described in this Privacy Policy.
Notice to Residents of the EEA, Switzerland and UK: Data Subject Rights
This section applies only to individuals located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), Switzerland or the United Kingdom (“Applicable Countries”) and supplements the practices described in this Privacy Policy. It describes certain rights and protections under applicable law regarding the processing of Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “Personal Information” has the meaning given to “personal data” governed by the Applicable Countries’ data protection legislation.
Role of Sovrn as a Controller or Processor
If located in one of the Applicable Countries, Sovrn may act as a “controller” as defined under applicable law when processing Personal Information. Sovrn may also act as a “processor” as defined under applicable law to the extent that we process Personal Information on behalf of and at the instruction of another party, for example a Sovrn customer.
Legal Basis for Processing
Sovrn’s legal basis for processing Personal Information depends upon the specific context in which it is collected or used. In some cases, we rely on data subject consent (as defined under applicable law) to process Personal Information for Interest-Based Advertising, which we require Publishers using Sovrn Services to obtain on our behalf. In other cases, we may rely on our legitimate interests to collect and use Personal Information, except where our interests are overridden by data-protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. For example, we will also process Personal Information collected from Interest-Based Advertising in order to improve the Sovrn Services for our Publishers where permitted by law. Our legitimate interests are described in greater detail in the “
How We Use Information
” section of this Privacy Policy. These legitimate interests include the operation of our business and the provision of Sovrn Services to our Publishers as required by our agreements with them.
Additionally, we may have a legal obligation to process Personal Information (such as for fraud prevention).
Exercising Data Subject Rights
Individuals may be entitled to exercise certain data subject rights available under applicable laws. These rights may include the right to request access to Personal Information we hold. Individuals may also have the right to object to, or request that we restrict, processing of Personal Information, such as profiling we perform for the purposes of direct marketing and interest-based advertising. Individuals may also have the right to ask that your Personal Information be corrected, erased, or transferred to another party. Where we have asked for consent to process data, consent may be withdrawn.
Anyone afforded any of these rights may exercise them by visiting our
Privacy Center
, or by contacting privacy@sovrn[.]com.
These rights may be limited in some situations–for example, where we can demonstrate that we have a legal requirement to process data. In some instances, this may mean that we are able to retain data even if consent is withdrawn. In other instances, we may provide the requested information with some portions redacted in order to adhere to obligations of confidentiality to others.
Where we require Personal Information to comply with legal or contractual obligations, provision of Personal Information is mandatory; in all other cases, provision of requested Personal Information is optional.
Data Transfers
Sovrn is a global company headquartered in Boulder, Colorado (USA), with data centers located in the United States and Europe. By visiting Publisher’s sites who are using Sovrn Services, Personal Information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by us, our affiliates, and by those third parties with whom we may share your information, some of which are located outside of the Applicable Countries.
These countries (including the United States) may have data protection or other laws that differ from those in the Applicable Countries. We ensure that where Sovrn or third-party service providers receive Personal Information outside of the Applicable Countries, appropriate safeguards are in place under the Applicable Countries’ data protection legislation.
Sovrn may be required to disclose Personal Information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. Such requests are subject to Sovrn’s
Law Enforcement Request Policy
.
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
Sovrn is registered as a vendor with, and supports and encourages our clients to use, the
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
(the “IAB Industry Framework”) to provide data subjects with dynamic transparency into and choice about the various vendors our clients use to serve ads, including Sovrn Services. When visiting a website, the IAB Industry Framework is designed to allow a Publisher the means to choose which registered vendors they wish to allow to access a device and process Personal Information, and provide dynamic transparency and choice about each of these vendors (either an opportunity for an individual to consent to the vendor, or opt out of data processing by the vendor, depending on that vendor’s legal basis and processing activities).
Questions or Complaints
Individuals located in one of the Applicable Countries who have questions or concerns about how we process Personal Information may contact our Data Protection Officer at dpo@sovrn.com. If we are not able to resolve the issue, individuals have the right to lodge a complaint with their local data privacy authority. For contact details of local Data Protection Authorities, please visit the
European Data Protection Board member list
or the
UK data protection regulator
.
IT Governance Europe Limited acts as our EU representative. If you wish to exercise your rights under the EU General Data Protection Regulation (EU GDPR) or have any queries in relation to your rights or general privacy matters, please email
eurep@itgovernance.eu
. Please ensure to include our company name (“Sovrn”) in any correspondence.
Notice to California Residents: Your Privacy Choices
This section applies only to California residents and supplements the practices described in this Privacy Policy.  It describes how we collect, use, sell, share, and retain Personal Information of California residents, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “Personal Information” has the meaning given in the California privacy laws but does not include information exempted from the scope of those laws.
Personal Information We Collect and Purposes of Collection and Use
Personal Information we collect (or have collected in the 12 months preceding the “Effective Date” of this Privacy Policy) about California residents are listed below by reference to the categories specified under California privacy law. Examples in the list refer to the types of Personal Information described above in this Privacy Policy.
Identifiers
, such as cookie ID, unique online identifiers, device information, hashed email, IP address, connected television ID, and mobile advertising ID.
Customer Records
, such as Publisher PII and payment information.
Commercial information
, such as records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered.
Internet or Network Activity
, such as browsing history, search history, and interactions with a website, email, application, or advertisement.
Inferences
drawn from the Personal Information identified above to create a profile reflecting preferences, characteristics or behavior.
We may collect these categories of Personal Information directly from you and from your device as you visit our Site or Publisher sites in our network subscribing to Sovrn Services, or from other third parties as further described in this Privacy Policy under the section titled
“How We Collect Information.”
The purposes, including the specific business and commercial purposes, for which we collect and use these categories of Personal Information are described in this Privacy Policy under the section titled
“How We Use Personal Information.”
To the extent that we may collect any sensitive Personal Information (as defined under California privacy law), such as to provide account management for our Publishers, we only use or disclose it for purposes permitted under California law (i.e., to perform the Sovrn Services, process customer transactions, detect security incidents and prevent fraud, or to verify and maintain the quality of the Services). We do not collect or use sensitive personal information for the purpose of inferring characteristics about California residents.
We retain each of the categories of Personal Information listed above as described in this Privacy Policy under the section titled
“Retention of Personal Data.”
Personal Information “Sold,” “Shared” or Disclosed for Business Purposes
“Sale” is defined under California privacy law as disclosing a California resident’s Personal Information to a third party for monetary or other valuable consideration.  Where such disclosure is for cross-context behavioral advertising, whether or not for monetary or other valuable consideration, it qualifies as “sharing” under California privacy law.
The following table describes the categories of Personal Information “sold” or “shared” for our commercial purposes to each of the categories of third parties listed, and includes our practices in the 12 months preceding the “Effective Date” of this Privacy Policy.
Each category of Personal Information listed in the following table may also have been disclosed for our business purposes (such as for internal use and business intelligence), and have in the preceding 12 months been disclosed, to each of the categories of third parties listed.
The categories of third parties listed, along with our business and commercial purposes for which we “sold,” “shared” or disclosed Personal Information, are described in this Privacy Policy under
“Our Information Sharing Practices”
within the section titled,
“How We Use Information.”
Category of Personal Information
To whom the category of Personal Information is “sold” or “shared”
Identifiers
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
Customer Records
N/A
Commercial Information
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
Internet or Network Activity
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
Inferences
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
For clarity, Personal Information collected through Sovrn Services, from third parties,  or Internet Connected Technology, (and where Sovrn has a license to further disclose Personal Information to third parties) is included in our commercial Data and “sold” or “shared.” Publisher Personal Information provided for account management is not “sold” or “shared” as defined under California privacy law.
California consumers may request to
opt-out of the sale or sharing
of their Personal Information at any time. Please see “Your California Privacy Rights” below for more information.
Sovrn does not knowingly “sell” or “share” the Personal Information of California residents under 16 years of age.
Your California Privacy Rights
As a California resident, in addition to the rights described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, you have the privacy rights listed below.  However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may not be able to respond to your request, such as when a legal exemption applies or if we are not able to verify your identity.
Know/Access
. You can request the following information about how we have collected and used your Personal Information:
– The categories of Personal Information that we have collected.
– The categories of sources from which we collected Personal Information.
– The business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” Personal Information.
– The categories of third parties with whom we disclose Personal Information.
– A copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you.
Delete
. You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Correct
. You can ask us to correct inaccurate Personal Information that we maintain about you.
Opt-out of sales/sharing
. If we “sell” or “share” your Personal Information, you can opt-out.
Nondiscrimination
. You are entitled to exercise the rights described above without receiving discriminatory treatment.
You may request to exercise the California privacy rights described above as follows:
Right to know/access, delete, or correct
. You can request to exercise your access, deletion, or correction rights by:
– Visiting our Privacy Center and completing the
data rights request webform
;
– Emailing privacy@sovrn[.]com – Please put the statement “CCPA Consumer Request” in the subject line; or
– Calling +1 (888) 280-8085.
Right to opt-out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information
. You can request to opt-out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information by clicking here:
Your Privacy Choices
and completing the webform or broadcasting the Global Privacy Control (GPC) signal through your browser settings.
– Our Services will honor the GPC signal you broadcast so that the Personal Information that you provide to the Publishers using our Services will be opted-out from “sales” or “sharing.”
– Note that due to technological limitations, if you visit our Services or the Site from a different computer or device, or clear cookies on your browser that store your preferences, you will need to return to the
Your Privacy Choices
page to re-submit your preferences.
– If you direct us not to sell/share your Personal Information, we will consider it a request pursuant to California’s “Shine the Light” law to stop sharing your Personal Information covered by that law with third parties for their direct marketing purposes.
Please visit our
CCPA Metrics page
for details around the type of data rights requests received during the previous calendar year.
Verification Process and Required Information
We reserve the right to confirm your California residence to process your requests and will need to confirm your identity to process your requests to exercise your right to know/access, delete, and correct. This is a security measure to, for example, help ensure we do not disclose information to a person who is not entitled to receive it. The identity verification process may vary depending on how you submit your request. We will only ask for information needed to verify your identity, such as a different email address, or cookie ID.
Authorized Agent
Consistent with California law, you may designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf. If you do so, we may require proof of your identification, the authorized agent’s proof of identification, and any other information that we may request in order to verify the request, including evidence of valid permission for the authorized agent to act on your behalf. We cannot process your request if you do not provide us with sufficient detail to allow us to understand and respond to it. Authorized agents may submit a request through our
Privacy Center
, where instructions are provided for completing the request.
Fees
You will not have to pay a fee to access your personal information (or to exercise any of the other rights).  However, we may charge a reasonable fee or decline to comply with your request if your request is clearly unfounded, repetitive, or excessive.
Changes in this Privacy Policy
We may modify or amend this Privacy Policy from time to time at our discretion. When we make material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will amend the revision date at the top of this page and such modified or amended Privacy Policy shall be effective as to the Personal Information governed by this Privacy Policy as of that revision date. We encourage periodic review of this Privacy Policy to view any updates, as well as the revision log found at the end of this page.
Contact Us
Please contact us at privacy@sovrn[.]com with questions or concerns regarding our Privacy Policy or how we process your Personal Information.
Sovrn will respond in good faith to all privacy inquiries but may not be able to provide complete information if the request requires Sovrn to release confidential information of third parties, or otherwise imposes an undue burden or expense.
Sovrn U.S. Headquarters
1600 Pearl St
Second Floor
Boulder, CO 80302
United States
Sovrn U.K. Headquarters
53, 64 Chancery Ln,
London WC2A 1QU
United Kingdom
Sovrn Switzerland, S.A.
Via Cantonale 19, CH-
6900 Lugano
Switzerland
Revision Log
Section
Revision summary
Version
Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices & How to Opt Out
Removed information related to the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) YourOnlineChoices program
Dec. 2023
Information We Collect
Updated Privacy Policy to disclose the collection of voice recordings to support Publisher Sales and Support teams
Sep. 2023
Notice to Residents of the EEA, Switzerland and UK: Data Subject Rights; Contacts
Updated semantics for readability; updated Sovrn UK, Limited address
Aug. 2023
Information We Collect; How We Collect Information & How We Use Information
Updated Privacy Policy to disclose additional identifiers processed due to new offered services
Aug. 2023
Information We Collect; How We Collect Information & How We Use Information
Updated Privacy Policy to disclose additional identifiers processed due to new offered services
Apr. 2023
Throughout
Updated Privacy Policy for required disclosures under new US state privacy laws in effect Jan 1 2023, and for general readability
Jan. 2023
Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices & How to Opt Out
Added information related to our integration with the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) YourOnlineChoices program
Aug. 2022
Throughout
Revised email addresses throughout to reduce spam
Aug. 2022
Exercising California Consumer Rights
Replaced toll-free number with new toll-free number
Aug. 2022
Entire Policy
Consolidated Website and Service Privacy Policies, reordered sections, and updated internal links.
Apr. 2021
Information We Collect
Added ‘Universal ID’ to the list of Personal Information types
Apr. 2021
Personal Data Rights (throughout)
Separation of UK from EU personal data rights as a result of the enactment of the UK GDPR
Feb. 2021
Personal Data Rights: Questions or Complaints
Addition of EU representative as a result of the UK’s exit from the EU
Feb. 2021
Revision Log
New section added for clarity of changes over time
Feb. 2021
We use cookies on our website to give you the most relevant experience by remembering your preferences and repeat visits. By clicking “Accept”, you consent to the use of ALL the cookies, but may change your preferences by clicking “Cookie settings". For more information, please visit our
Privacy Policy
.
Cookie settings
Manage cookie consent
Close
Privacy Overview
This website uses cookies to improve your experience while you navigate through the website. Out of these cookies, the cookies that are categorized as necessary are stored on your browser as they are essential for the working of basic functionalities...
Necessary cookies are absolutely essential for the website to function properly. These cookies ensure basic functionalities and security features of the website, anonymously.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__hssrc
session
This cookie is set by Hubspot whenever it changes the session cookie. The __hssrc cookie set to 1 indicates that the user has restarted the browser, and if the cookie does not exist, it is assumed to be a new session.
cookielawinfo-checkbox-advertisement
1 year
Set by the GDPR Cookie Consent plugin, this cookie is used to record the user consent for the cookies in the "Advertisement" category .
cookielawinfo-checkbox-analytics
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Analytics".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-functional
11 months
The cookie is set by GDPR cookie consent to record the user consent for the cookies in the category "Functional".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-necessary
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookies is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Necessary".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-others
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Other.
cookielawinfo-checkbox-performance
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Performance".
csrftoken
1 year
This cookie is associated with Django web development platform for python. Used to help protect the website against Cross-Site Request Forgery attacks
viewed_cookie_policy
11 months
The cookie is set by the GDPR Cookie Consent plugin and is used to store whether or not user has consented to the use of cookies. It does not store any personal data.
Functional cookies help to perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collect feedbacks, and other third-party features.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__cf_bm
30 minutes
This cookie, set by Cloudflare, is used to support Cloudflare Bot Management.
__hssc
30 minutes
HubSpot sets this cookie to keep track of sessions and to determine if HubSpot should increment the session number and timestamps in the __hstc cookie.
_auth
1 year
This cookie is set by Pinterest that collects statistical details to track the use of its services.
_pinterest_referrer
past
This cookie is set by Pinterest to track the use of its services.
_pinterest_sess
1 year
This cookie is set by Pinterest that collects statistical details to track the use of its services.
_routing_id
session
This cookie is set by Pinterest that collects statistical details to track the use of its services.
bcookie
2 years
LinkedIn sets this cookie from LinkedIn share buttons and ad tags to recognize browser ID.
lang
session
This cookie is used to store the language preferences of a user to serve up content in that stored language the next time user visit the website.
language
session
This cookie is used to store the language preference of the user.
lidc
1 day
LinkedIn sets the lidc cookie to facilitate data center selection.
sp_landing
1 day
The sp_landing is set by Spotify to implement audio content from Spotify on the website and also registers information on user interaction related to the audio content.
sp_t
1 year
The sp_t cookie is set by Spotify to implement audio content from Spotify on the website and also registers information on user interaction related to the audio content.
Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors.
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__hstc
1 year 24 days
This is the main cookie set by Hubspot, for tracking visitors. It contains the domain, initial timestamp (first visit), last timestamp (last visit), current timestamp (this visit), and session number (increments for each subsequent session).
_ga
2 years
The _ga cookie, installed by Google Analytics, calculates visitor, session and campaign data and also keeps track of site usage for the site's analytics report. The cookie stores information anonymously and assigns a randomly generated number to recognize unique visitors.
_gat_gtag_UA_52355958_2
1 minute
This cookie is set by Google and is used to distinguish users.
_gcl_au
3 months
Provided by Google Tag Manager to experiment advertisement efficiency of websites using their services.
_gid
1 day
Installed by Google Analytics, _gid cookie stores information on how visitors use a website, while also creating an analytics report of the website's performance. Some of the data that are collected include the number of visitors, their source, and the pages they visit anonymously.
hubspotutk
1 year 24 days
This cookie is used by HubSpot to keep track of the visitors to the website. This cookie is passed to Hubspot on form submission and used when deduplicating contacts.
vuid
2 years
Vimeo installs this cookie to collect tracking information by setting a unique ID to embed videos to the website.
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with relevant ads and marketing campaigns. These cookies track visitors across websites and collect information to provide customized ads.
Cookie
Duration
Description
_mkto_datetime
1 month
This cookie is set by Marketo.
bscookie
2 years
This cookie is a browser ID cookie set by Linked share Buttons and ad tags.
test_cookie
15 minutes
The test_cookie is set by doubleclick.net and is used to determine if the user's browser supports cookies.
Other uncategorized cookies are those that are being analyzed and have not been classified into a category as yet.
Other uncategorized cookies are those that are being analyzed and have not been classified into a category as yet.
Sub-policy 12
https://www.liveintent.com/services-privacy-policy/:
LiveIntent
1+1=4: LiveIntent has agreed to be acquired by Zeta: Read the Press Release
button/arrow
Popular topics
People-Based Marketing
Meet-a-LiveIntenter
Email Revenue
Identity Graph
Subscriber Acquisition
First-Party Data
Direct-to-Consumer
Cookie Apocalypse
LiveIntent Privacy Policy
WEBSITE PRIVACY POLICY (data collection and use at this website)
LIVEINTENT SERVICES PRIVACY POLICY (collection and use of fully identifiable personal data across LiveIntent’s range of services)
Last updated December 6, 2024.
1. WEBSITE PRIVACY POLICY
Scope
This LiveIntent Website Privacy Policy (the “Privacy Policy”) applies solely to information collected by LiveIntent, Inc. (collectively, “LiveIntent,” “we,” “our,” or “us”) on this LiveIntent website (the “Site”). This Privacy Policy provides information on how and why LiveIntent collects and uses the information we obtain through this Site.
For information on LiveIntent’s range of services, how we use data across our different services—including for cross-context behavioral advertising—and your options with respect to that data and our uses, please refer to the LiveIntent General Services Privacy Policy located below.
Links to Third Party Sites
This Privacy Policy does not apply to the practices of third-party sites including, but not limited to, client and affiliate websites, applications and websites on which we may place advertisements, and any third-party websites you may link to from our Site. LiveIntent does not endorse or make any representations about these third-party sites or applications, or any information, software, products or materials found there. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of these sites and applications to understand their data collection and use practices.
Information Collection, Use and Sharing
Information Collection
We collect three types of information from and about visitors to this Site: (1) information collected directly from you when you provide it to us, (2) information we collect from third-party sources, and (3) tracking data that is collected automatically when you navigate the Site. All types of data are considered “personal information” or “personal data” (these terms mean the same thing and can be used interchangeably) by applicable privacy laws.
“Personal information” means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household. In these policies, we use “personal information” and “data” interchangeably.
The specific categories of personal information we collect from the sources described above (from you directly, from third party sources, and tracking data) includes:
Identifiers,
such as your name, email address, and phone number, as well as other demographic data like your age, gender, and language preference. We may collect this data directly from you, such as when you register for events, create accounts on the Site, or communicate directly with us.  We also automatically collect identifiers such as your IP address, or mobile advertising IDs when you visit the site.  We may collect your telephone number and/or email address from third-party sources.
Professional and employment-related information
such as your employer and job title, if you provide it when applying for a job with us or in other direct communications to us.
Imprecise geolocation information,
such as your ZIP code, city, state, or country. This information may be either provided by you or collected and processed automatically.
Internet and electronic network activity information,
such as your IP address, unique digital identifiers (such as mobile advertising IDs), and information related to the devices you use to access the Site such as the device type, operating system, and version. This information may also include the Uniform Resource Locator (“URL”) of the site you visited before coming to this Site, the URL of the site you visit after leaving our Site, the type of browser you are using, and the ways you interact with our Site, emails, advertisements, and apps. This information is collected and processed automatically by us and our Site’s service partners.
Inferences;
we may use the personal information we collect to generate certain inferences about which general topics may be of interest to you.
The “Cookies” section of this Privacy Policy describes the ways we automatically collect information from you and the electronic tools, like cookies or pixel tags, that we use to do so.
Information Use
LiveIntent uses the data we collect at this Site to fulfill your requests, respond to your inquiries, communicate with you, provide LiveIntent news or updates, and to understand the audience for our Site. We may also use your information to make our Site easier for you to use and to inform you of service and product updates, whitepapers, new products, market research opportunities and other related information from LiveIntent, or to send you promotional messages regarding various LiveIntent products and services. We also use the information we collect when we believe in good faith that the use of that information is necessary to protect our rights, the integrity of our services, or your safety or the safety of others; to detect, prevent, or respond to fraud, intellectual property infringement, violations of terms of use, or violations of law; and to fulfill the purposes described to you at the point of collection and pursuant to your consent.
LiveIntent uses tracking data to analyze trends, administer the Site, track users’ activities on the Site, help us understand the parts of our Site visited most often, and gather aggregated demographic information for use in improving the Site. We and our service providers also use the data we collect to generate and analyze statistics about the performance of our advertising campaigns, to improve performance over time, to provide and improve our offerings, and to develop new offerings.
LiveIntent may also obtain personal information from you if you apply for a job with us. This data would include your name, email address, mailing address, employment history and any other information contained in any application materials that you submit. We may use this information to review your application for employment.
Information Sharing and Disclosure
LiveIntent may share your information with our affiliates and service providers for the purposes described in this policy; with our business partners with whom we provide co-branded materials or events that you elect to receive or participate in, such as webinars, white papers, events, or case studies, for their marketing purposes; and to affiliates, service providers, advisors, and other third parties to the extent reasonably necessary to proceed with the negotiation or completion of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or sale of all or a portion of our assets.
We may disclose your information as required by law, court order or other valid legal processes. We also reserve the right to disclose your information if we believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights or the safety of any person, investigate fraud, or respond to a valid government request.
Bases for Processing
Certain jurisdictions, including the European Union, have laws that require us to have a “legal basis” to process your personal information. Where required by applicable law, we rely on one of the following legal bases to justify our processing of your personal information:
to fulfil our contractual obligations to you, for example to provide access to Sites that you request and to ensure that invoices are delivered or paid correctly. Failure to provide personal information necessary to perform a contract may prevent or delay the fulfilment of our contractual obligations;
to comply with our legal obligations, for example to respond to legally binding requests from regulators, law enforcement authorities, or other government authorities;
to meet our legitimate interests, for example to understand how you use the Sites and to enable us to derive knowledge that enables us to develop new Offerings. When we process personal information to meet our legitimate interests, we put in place safeguards to protect your privacy and to determine that our legitimate interests are not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms; and
to exercise our legal rights where it is necessary to do so, for example to detect, prevent and respond to fraud claims, intellectual property infringement claims, or other violations of law.
We may obtain your consent to collect and use certain types of personal information when we are required to do so by law. If we ask for your consent to process your personal information, you may withdraw your consent, where permitted by law, using the contact details at the end of this Privacy Policy.
Choices
Opt-Out of LiveIntent Corporate Communications
You may opt-out from receiving LiveIntent Corporate Communications by clicking on the unsubscribe mechanism included in each email message we send.
Even if you choose to opt-out of our communications, LiveIntent will retain and use your information to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, enforce our agreements and to maintain a record of your opt-out. You may also still receive transactional emails, such as registration confirmation, product updates and responses to direct requests you have made.
Cookies
Cookies are small text files that store data using your web browser to enable websites and marketing companies to recognize you and to associate your browsing activity with other data. We, and our third-party service providers who assist with managing our Site, use cookies, web beacons and similar technologies to track use of our Site in order to improve its performance, ensure we are providing content that is of interest to our Site visitors, and make our Site more user-friendly. We also use cookies for cross-context behavioral advertising.  What this means in practice is that we use cookies to help determine which ads you see online, by logging your visits to many advertiser / brand websites, and then showing you ads for similar products and services.
You may manage your cookie preferences
here
.
Types of Cookies Used on Our Site
Strictly Necessary Cookies
: These cookies are necessary for the Site to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the Site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
: These cookies collect data about how visitors use our Site for web analytics purposes, for instance which pages visitors go to most often and error messages received. These cookies are only used to improve how our Site works and your experience on our Site; they do not track your browsing activity on other websites. By using our Site, you agree that we can place these types of cookies on your device.
Functionality Cookies
: These cookies allow our Site to remember choices you make (such as your username and password, language preference or the region you are in) and provide enhanced, more personalized features. These cookies may also be used to remember changes you have made to text size, fonts and other personalization. They may also be used to provide services you have requested, such as keeping you logged in to your account as you browse the internet. These cookies do not track your browsing activity on other websites. By using our Site or by signing up for an account with us, you agree that we can place these types of cookies on your device.
Targeting Cookies
: These cookies may be set through our Site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Managing Cookies in Your Browser
You may be able to adjust your browser settings to manage your cookie preferences, such as setting your browser to notify you when you receive a cookie and give you the choice to decide whether or not to accept it. If you reject cookies, you may still use our Site, but the functionality of some areas may be limited.
Below are links to information about managing your cookie preferences in common browsers:
Google Chrome Cookies
Mozilla Firefox Cookies
Internet Explorer Cookies
Safari Cookies
Google Analytics
Social Media and Content Sharing Features
Our Site may include social media sharing features, such as LinkedIn and X (formerly Twitter) buttons, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. These features may collect your IP address and which page you are visiting on our Site. Social media features are governed by that social media company’s privacy policy.
Meta Privacy
(Facebook and Instagram)
X Privacy
Linkedin Privacy
Data Retention
We retain the information we collect for only as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes for which we collected it, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal information, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the information, the purposes for which we obtained the information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, as well as applicable legal requirements.
Data Security
LiveIntent uses commercially reasonable safeguards to protect personal information against loss, misuse or alteration and to maintain the integrity and security of all information collected through the Site. These include technical, physical, and administrative security controls.
Your Rights Regarding Personal Data
Privacy laws around the world give individuals different versions of the rights described below. LiveIntent allows any person to exercise the following rights no matter where they live. LiveIntent will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights. Prior to fulfilling a request for a copy of your personal information, LiveIntent is required to reasonably verify your identity, which we generally do by sending a verification link to the email address associated with your personal information. Under applicable laws, you can use an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf, but that agent must be able to complete our verification process in order to demonstrate that they have been authorized to make the request.
To exercise your rights
with respect to your personal information in LiveIntent’s databases, please visit our privacy center
here
. If you make a request, we will normally respond within 30 days if you live in Europe or Canada, or 45 days if you live elsewhere. However, if we are experiencing a high volume of requests or if your request is more complex, we may take up to 90 days to respond.
Data Access / Portability
– you can request a copy of your personal information (data that relates to you) that we hold in a human-readable form. Note that some of the personal information that we process is not ordinarily maintained in a human-readable form, and that privacy laws generally do not require companies to convert personal information to become human-readable for the purpose of responding to an access request.
Correction
—you can ask us to correct personal information that we hold and is related to you if it is inaccurate. In many cases we do not have the technical ability to change the personal information in our database, and so will delete the incorrect data instead.
Data Deletion
—you can ask us to delete your personal information. As allowed by applicable laws, there may be some cases where we will decline requests for deletion, but these are rare cases. We may also delete the personal information contained in a profile and retain anonymized data that cannot be linked back to you or used to identify you. In the very unlikely case that we refuse your request, you can appeal that decision by contacting privacy@liveintent.com for a review of your case.
Objection / Restricting Processing
–in some US states and countries you have a legal right to object to processing of your personal information, or to ask that such processing be restricted. To keep things simple, if you wish to exercise these rights, please request to have your data deleted—our systems cannot process partial opt-outs.
Opt-Out of our use of Sensitive Data
–you can ask LiveIntent not to use Sensitive Data that relates to you. In order to keep things simple, we will treat these requests as Data Deletion requests (see above).
Opt-Out of Receiving Email from LiveIntent
–you can ask to be added to our global email suppression list so that we won’t send any more commercial emails to the email address you opt out.
Opt-Out of Sales or Sharing of Data
-you can request that we do not make your personal information available to our clients for their own use. If you select this option, we may still use your personal information for internal analysis, or to send advertisements to you.
You also have the right in many countries to contact a privacy or data protection authority if you believe we are not complying with privacy laws, and we have not been able to resolve the situation to your satisfaction. Many countries have a dedicated privacy / data protection authority; in the United States you can make a complaint to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission or your state Attorney General.
International Data Transfers
This Site is hosted in the United States. This means that when you submit personal information to the Site or we collect tracking data at the Site, it will be processed in the United States and may also be accessed by LiveIntent personnel and technical support teams in Germany, Denmark, Canada, India, and the Philippines. Your data may also be shared with our affiliates or with our service providers.
Do Not Track / Global Privacy Control (“GPC”)
LiveIntent does not currently process browser-based “Do Not Track” signals, largely because they are not currently supported by the most popular browsers that are used by the vast majority of users, however, if and when these DNT mechanisms come into widespread use, LiveIntent will support them to the extent required by applicable laws.  LiveIntent’s website does recognize the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) feature.  Please note, however, that this only applies to personal information that would be collected on LiveIntent’s website.
Children’s Privacy
This Site and the services we provide are intended for general audiences, and is not intended for use by persons under the age of 18. If we learn that we have inadvertently collected personal information from a child under the age of 18, we will delete it. If you believe that we have collected personal information from a child under 18, please contact us at privacy@liveintent.com.
Updates To This Privacy Policy
We reserve the right to modify this privacy statement at any time. Note the date of the most recent update at the top of this page.
Contact Us
To ask questions about LiveIntent’s Privacy Policy or to request more information on LiveIntent’s privacy practices, email us at privacy@liveintent.com. You can also contact us via mail at:
LiveIntent
1 World Trade Center, Suite 45A
New York, NY 10007
2. GENERAL SERVICES PRIVACY POLICY
OVERVIEW OF LIVEINTENT’S USE OF DATA
This section of the privacy policy describes how LiveIntent collects and uses personal information in connection with the two types of services we offer to our clients: Identity Services and Marketing and Advertising Services (together our “Services”). LiveIntent also works with affiliated companies that are separately branded and that have their own privacy policies. LiveIntent and our affiliates make every effort to comply with all applicable laws.
LiveIntent collects and uses data about individual consumers for the limited purpose of helping our clients identify and reach their intended audiences. We use a lot of data to create these audiences, which in turn allows our clients to serve more relevant advertising for consumers and better target their marketing campaigns.
Our data comes from (a) data that our clients have provided to us, (b) data from our cookies or similar tracking technologies, which may be on your browser and which are recognized when you visit websites—either controlled by us or by third parties—where our tracking technologies are in use, and (c) data purchased or licensed from third parties who are in the business of selling consumer data, which may also include companies that are under common ownership with LiveIntent.
This Services Privacy Policy applies to the Services that LiveIntent provides, which are divided into two main categories:
LiveIntent Acting as a Service Provider
: where LiveIntent handles personal data that was collected by another company (our client) under the terms of its privacy policy solely to perform a service for that company. This privacy policy does not apply to these Services.
LiveIntent Acting as a Data Collector
: where LiveIntent collects, uses, and shares personal information from and about individuals for our own purposes. This privacy policy applies only to these Services and describes our practices regarding collection, use, and sharing of personal information through our online and digital services, and instructions for opting out of our use of your personal information for online behavioral advertising.
When we act as a service provider, we follow the client’s privacy policy because the data we process in that role belongs to our client. We handle that data only at the client’s direction and acting exclusively on their behalf. When LiveIntent collects data directly from consumers or obtains data collected by third parties for our own business purposes, we are responsible for how such data is used and shared, and for giving effect to individuals’ privacy legal rights.
All Services may include some amount of “lookalike modeling,” where we use personal information about known purchasers of a product or respondents to an ad to identify individual attributes that indicate a propensity to buy that product or respond to that ad. This allows us to create a profile of the attributes of a person most likely to respond to an ad, which is used to inform who a future ad will go to.
Many of our Services include a component of online behavioral advertising (also called cross-context behavioral advertising) which means that LiveIntent has matched consumer data belonging to our clients with data from other sources in order to better tailor advertising to individual consumers.
We do not
provide Services that include ads with illegal or adult content, nor do we advertise on adult sites or collect data about what adult sites people visit. In fact, your browsing history is only collected from certain websites, so it is never a complete history of all your online activity.
We do not knowingly collect, solicit, or sell personal information from children under 18.
In the event that we learn that we have collected personal information from a child under the age of 18, we will delete it. Our Services are directed to businesses – advertisers and their agencies – and are not directed to children under 18. If you believe that we might have any personal information from a child younger than 18, please contact us as set forth below.
We do not knowingly facilitate any advertising that is exploitative, discriminatory, hateful, deceptive, or abusive
.
We do not allow our data to be used to make impactful decisions about individuals
, such as eligibility for credit, insurance, housing, employment, or education. Our data is used exclusively to match people to ads that may interest them.
The types of data
we use
are the same across all our Services and come from:
(1)
Data you have provided
directly either to LiveIntent, our client (an advertiser or publisher), or another company you authorized to share your data for marketing purposes. This data is usually personal information, and generally includes an email address, but may also include other information, such as your name, street address, and/or the answers to survey questions.
(2)
Data collected indirectly from you
using cookies or other online or mobile technologies that allow us to identify the categories of websites that you visit. Included is personal information about when and where you gave your permission to receive commercial email, your IP address, and visits you made to certain websites or apps. We log these visits to help infer your interests in order to build groups of consumer into audiences that our clients can use to target their marketing campaigns. This data typically does not include direct identifiers (like name and address), but it can still be linked back to you via unique identifiers like a cookie ID, mobile ad ID, or an encrypted version of your email address. We generally only log your visits to categories of websites—we do not track every page you view across the Internet. We collect data related to your activity on our Site, such as time spent on the Site, the website that you came from, and the website to which you exit.
(3)
Data we have obtained from third-party data brokers or data partners
. This may include personal information obtained from public records (like your street address, age, and gender), data about physical locations you have visited in the past (we do not collect real-time precise geolocation data), as well as data relating to purchases, interests, or likely interests that can be derived from a wide variety of sources.
We collect and process data from the following sources
:
You, when you give data directly to one of our websites, affiliated companies, clients, or data-sharing partners;
Publishers who entrust data they have collected from or about you that we use to perform marketing and advertising services for them;
Data that we or others collect using cookies or other online trackers. This data may be associated or linked with other data that identifies you (e.g. email);
Data brokers who supply data obtained from public records, or who resell data obtained from private sources. Data from private sources (like magazine publishers, credit card companies, or retailers) typically has  identifying data removed (like your name and email address) and is linked instead via unique identifiers like a proprietary ID, encrypted email address, a cookie ID, or other indirect identifiers, but in many cases, we are able to link this data to your identifying information.
Data partners who supply data similar to the kinds we obtain from data brokers. The difference between a data broker and a data partner is that we buy or license data from data brokers, but we may exchange data with data partners.
We may send data to the following recipients:
Service providers who perform services for us like web hosting, data security services, auditing, or sending email on our behalf;
Our advertiser and publisher clients who we may share data with or sell data to;
Advertising technology companies and intermediaries;
Data aggregators that provide information, including identifiers and inferences, about individuals;
Companies that we may trade data with for purposes of Online Behavioral Advertising (also called cross-context behavioral advertising; see below); and
Companies with whom we may share data in order to facilitate online behavioral advertising, such as companies who perform cookie matching services, real-time bidding exchanges, supply-side and demand-side platforms, and companies who perform analytics and reporting.
As required to respond to a legal request for information or to protect the rights, interests, or safety of any person.
To a successor or assignee in connection with a corporate change in control such as a merger or acquisition or other transaction.
You will find more details in the sections below describing each of our Services.
SERVICES WHERE LIVEINTENT ACTS ONLY AS A SERVICE PROVIDER
Where we perform Services exclusively as a service provider or data processor, the data that we handle belongs to our client. In most cases this data will be put in LiveIntent’s care by the client in order to use our marketing or identity software and tools. Clients may also ask us to collect data on their behalf through various means, including direct collection from individuals, via cookies or other online tracking mechanisms, or via third-party sources like data brokers. When we collect and process data as a Service, all of the data we collect belongs to our client and is governed by the client’s privacy policy.
Who are LiveIntent’s Clients?
Our clients are companies you interact with every day. Consumer products brands, retailers, financial institutions, travel, dining, and hospitality providers, education providers, healthcare, political advertisers, and others. Sometimes we work with them directly, sometimes we work with advertising agencies who represent many clients of their own. In either case our mission, and the purpose for which we collect, use, and share personal data, is to help these companies use their marketing resources more efficiently by matching offers to the people who are most likely to be interested in them.
SERVICES WHERE LIVEINTENT COLLECTS AND USES DATA ON ITS OWN BEHALF
In addition to acting as a service provider, LiveIntent also collects or obtains and uses personal information on its own behalf. LiveIntent maintains databases where we store data that we have obtained from the different sources described above. Some of these databases also include connections to other third-party sources of data (data brokers and data sharing partners) so that we can get data at or near real time in order to inform specific ad placements. This approach means that we are using the freshest, most up-to-date data we can obtain, and it also reduces the amount of data we need to gather into one place in order to provide our Services. Our proprietary software, machine learning, and AI tie all these sources of data together which enables us to make very complex decisions about which people best fit into various audiences so our clients can serve the most relevant ads.  This is often called online behavioral advertising or cross-context behavioral advertising.
Personal Information We Process
The types of personal information that we collect, from the sources described above, to provide our Services include:
Identifiers,
such as your email address. We may also automatically collect information related to devices used to access our business partners’ emails and websites, such as the your device type, operating system, version, IP address, and technical identifiers such as mobile advertising ID (Apple IDFA or Google AAID, for example). Depending on the service, we may de-identify this information using a mathematical process (commonly known as hashing) to convert the information into a code.
Imprecise Geolocation Information,
such as your IP address (which may indicate your location), ZIP code, city, state, or country. We may also automatically collect information from which we could identify your ZIP code, city, state, or country.
Internet and Electronic Network Activity Information,
such as whether an email sent by one of our business partners has been opened, or whether a link has been clicked in one of those emails. We also collect information about activity on our business partners’ websites, such as the time users spend on the website, from which websites users came, and what other websites users visit.
Commercial Information,
such as whether you purchased a product or service after viewing a related advertisement.  We may collect this information automatically, or this may be provided to us by third-party sources.
Inferences.
We may use the information we collect to generate certain inferences, such as what advertisements may be of interest to you. We may also collect these inferences from third-party sources.
Sensitive Data.
Some privacy laws define certain categories of data as “Sensitive Data.” Depending on the specific law, this category can include government-issued identification numbers, such as US social security numbers or a driver’s license number; genetic data; race/ethnicity; religion; sexual orientation; labor union or political party membership, data about health conditions, or other data that can either be used to commit financial crimes or to expose sensitive details about an individual. For instance, LiveIntent collects and uses data to build audiences around interests in specific health conditions, religion, LGBTQ+, or multicultural or ethnic matters that may constitute Sensitive Data. These types of audiences are built from people who have visited web pages with related content where LiveIntent tracking technologies are in use, or who subscribe to our clients’ newsletters on specific interests.  Some privacy laws require prior consent to collect Sensitive Data, and LiveIntent does not collect this type of data from residents who live in those places. Anyone may opt out of our use of their Sensitive Data at any time by visiting our
Privacy Choices
page.
We also combine, de-identify, or aggregate any of the information we collect through our Services for any of the purposes described below. We also receive de-identified information from our business partners.
Purposes for Processing Personal Information
We and our business partners use the personal information we collect to deliver personalized messages that match your interests, including interest-based advertising to efficiently distribute email publications; to customize user experiences when they use our advertising partners’ services; to generate and analyze statistics about the performance of marketing campaigns and improve their performance over time; and when necessary to (a) protect the integrity of the Services, or your safety or the safety of others, or (b) to detect, prevent, or respond to fraud, intellectual property infringement, violation of terms of use related to the Service, or violations of law.
Where a business partner has allowed us to use personal information for our own purposes, we use it to provide the Services, such as to facilitate the delivery of and reporting on personalized messages and targeted advertising; to troubleshoot and secure the Services and our systems; to enhance existing offerings, such as identifying browsers and devices accessing various digital platforms and develop new ones; and to deliver and improve the Services and the Identity Service.
We may also use the data that we hold on a temporary, limited basis to evaluate potential data sharing partners, meaning that we might share your data as part of a sample of our data for a limited time to be used in a test environment with another company to evaluate the effectiveness of each company’s services. When we do one of these evaluations, it is subject to appropriate contractual terms that include that the company we are evaluating may not do anything else with the data and must delete any data that we share with them at the end of the evaluation period.
Bases for Processing
Certain jurisdictions, including the European Union, have laws that require us to have a “legal basis” to process your personal information. Where required by applicable law, we rely on one of the following legal bases to justify our processing of your personal information:
to fulfill our contractual obligations, for example the contracts we have with our clients, and only to the extent permitted by those contracts;
to comply with our legal obligations, for example to respond to legally binding requests from regulators, law enforcement authorities, or other government authorities;
to meet our legitimate interests, for example to understand how you use the Sites and to enable us to derive knowledge that enables us to develop new Offerings. When we process personal information to meet our legitimate interests, we put in place safeguards to protect your privacy and to determine that our legitimate interests are not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms; and
to exercise our legal rights where it is necessary to do so, for example to detect, prevent and respond to fraud claims, intellectual property infringement claims, or other violations of law.
We may obtain your consent to collect and use certain types of personal information when we are required to do so by law. If we ask for your consent to process your personal information, you may withdraw, where permitted by law, your consent by contacting us using the details at the end of this Privacy Policy.
Opting-out of Online Behavioral Advertising and Data Collection
Go to https://privacy.liveintent.com to opt out of interest-based advertising from LiveIntent.
To learn more about Online Behavioral Advertising (also called interest-based advertising or cross-context behavioral advertising), analytics services and your choices, including how to opt-out of some interest based advertising, visit:
https://www.youronlinechoices.com
,
https://youronlinechoices.eu/
,
the DAA Consumer Opt-Out Page
,
NAI Consumer Opt-Out Page
and
Google’s information page
.
If you opt-out of interest-based advertising with LiveIntent, then we will opt you out for all the identifiers or devices that we have associated with you at the time of the opt-out request. We use a predictive process to associate identifiers and devices and do not know definitively all devices or browsers that you may use, so that process is not guaranteed to be error free. If you want to be completely thorough, we recommend that you use this opt-out process for each device and browser you use.
Browser-Based “Do Not Track” Mechanisms and the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”)
LiveIntent does not currently process browser-based “Do Not Track” signals, largely because they are not currently supported by the most popular browsers that are used by the vast majority of users, however, if and when these DNT mechanisms come into widespread use, LiveIntent will support them to the extent required by applicable laws.  LiveIntent’s website does recognize the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) feature.  Please note, however, that this only applies to  information that would be collected on LiveIntent’s website.
YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
Privacy laws around the world give individuals different versions of the rights described below. LiveIntent allows any person to exercise the following rights no matter where they live. LiveIntent will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights. Prior to fulfilling a request for a copy of your personal information, LiveIntent is required to reasonably verify your identity, which we generally do by sending a verification link to the email address associated with your personal information. Under applicable laws, you can use an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf, but that agent must be able to complete our verification process in order to demonstrate that they have been authorized to make the request.
To exercise your rights
with respect to your personal information in LiveIntent’s databases, please visit our privacy center
here
. If you make a request, we will normally respond within 30 days if you live in Europe or Canada, or 45 days if you live elsewhere. However, if we are experiencing a high volume of requests or if your request is more complex, we may take up to 90 days to respond.
Data Access / Portability
– you can request a copy of  that we hold in a human-readable form. Note that some of the personal information that we process is not ordinarily maintained in a human-readable form, and that privacy laws generally do not require companies to convert personal information to become human-readable for the purpose of responding to an access request.
Correction
—you can ask us to correct personal information that we hold about you if it is inaccurate. In many cases we do not have the technical ability to change the personal information in our database, and so will delete the incorrect data instead.
Data Deletion
—you can ask us to delete your personal information. As allowed by applicable laws, there may be some cases where we will decline requests for deletion, but these are rare cases. We may also delete the personal information contained in a profile and retain anonymized data that cannot be linked back to you or used to identify you. In the very unlikely case that we refuse your request, you can appeal that decision by contacting privacy@liveintent.com for a review of your case.
Objection / Restricting Processing
–in some US states and countries you have a legal right to object to processing of your personal information, or to ask that such processing be restricted. To keep things simple, if you wish to exercise these rights, please request to have your data deleted—our systems cannot process partial opt-outs.
Opt-Out of our use of Sensitive Data
–you can ask LiveIntent not to use Sensitive Data that relates to you. In order to keep things simple, we will treat these requests as Data Deletion requests (see above).
Opt-Out of Receiving Email from LiveIntent
–you can ask to be added to our global email suppression list so that we won’t send any more commercial emails to the email address you opt out.
Opt-Out of Sales or Sharing of Data
-you can request that we do not make your personal information available to our clients for their own use. If you select this option, we may still use your personal information for internal analysis, or to send advertisements to you.
You also have the right in many countries to contact a privacy or data protection authority if you believe we are not complying with privacy laws, and we have not been able to resolve the situation to your satisfaction. Many countries have a dedicated privacy / data protection authority; in the United States you can make a complaint to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission or your state Attorney General.
Statistics on Exercise of Privacy Rights during 2024
We are required by law to publish statistics on how many people exercised their privacy rights in the previous year. Because our mechanism for honoring privacy rights with respect to cookie-linked data operates in real time as an automated conversation between your browser and our server, we are not able to provide statistics on the number of people who use it. The following statistics are for 2024.
Number of requests for access to (copy of) personal information: 304
Number of these requests that were not actioned because the requestor did not complete the verification process: 0
Number of requests for personal information deletion: 91,146
Number of these requests that were not actioned because the requestor did not complete the verification process: 0
Number of requests for opt-out (Do Not Sell): 156,749
Number of these requests that were not actioned because the requestor did not complete the verification process: 0
WHERE WE PROCESS DATA
LiveIntent is headquartered in the United States, and the majority of our Services are performed in the United States and Canada with technical support provided by LiveIntent staff in United States, Europe, India and/or the Philippines. When you provide data to LiveIntent, you consent to its processing in any of our other locations around the world.
HOW LONG WE KEEP DATA
We keep data only for the period of time needed in order to achieve our stated purposes—i.e. to match people with the audiences that correspond with their interests. Different data is therefore needed for different lengths of time. If you have given us data and permission to market through one of our websites or a partner website, we may continue to use some version of your data for marketing purposes until you revoke your consent / opt out. Certain data, like your contact information, we will keep as long as it is current. Data linked to a device like a smartphone will be maintained for as long as we detect that device on websites or using mobile apps on a regular basis. But data relating to your interests needs to be current to be useful to us, so we are constantly refreshing such data and rely only on the past six months’ data to inform our marketing choices. Data that is years old is generally not useful to us because it is a poor indicator of your current interests.
LiveIntent only keeps personal information in a form that can identify your computer or device for 180 days.
DATA SECURITY and PRIVACY BY DESIGN
LiveIntent uses commercially reasonable, industry standard practices to protect data and personal information. These include technical, physical, and organizational controls designed to prevent loss or unauthorized access to data. Our security measures are audited every year by an independent third party, and we are constantly evolving our approach to security to keep pace with emerging threats.
LiveIntent also follows the practice of “Privacy by Design,” meaning that we consider the privacy implications of our products and Services and ensure that they are built to standards that align to privacy requirements and enable privacy rights around the world.
HOW TO CONTACT LIVEINTENT’S PRIVACY PERSONNEL
You can reach LiveIntent by emailing 1 World Trade Center, Suite 45A, New York, NY, 10007
CHANGES TO THIS POLICY STATEMENT
We reserve the right to amend this policy statement from time to time. The effective date of the current version will be posted on the top of the page.
Sub-policy 13
https://www.inmobi.com/privacy-policy:
We use necessary and (optional) analytics cookies on our websites to analyze traffic and personalize content. You can read our
cookie policy
to understand how we use cookies. You may press 'decline' if you do not want us to use optional cookies. We will set a cookie on your device to remember and honor your preference.
Accept
Decline
We use third-party cookies to measure website performance, analytics, personalize content and ads for you. Read our
cookie policy
for more details.
Decline
Customize
Accept All
General
Content Guidelines Advertisers
Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
COPPA
Security
Trust and Safety
Opt-Out
Publisher Policy
InMobi CMP Terms of Service
Content Guidelines Publishers
InMobi Sanctions Compliance
GDPR
Privacy Policy for EEA
Data Subject / Consumer Request Policy
Privacy Policy
English
English
Spanish
Portuguese
Bahasa
Japanese
Chinese
LAST UPDATED: FEBRUARY 2024
EFFECTIVE: FEBRUARY 2024
1. INTRODUCTION
InMobi runs a marketing platform solution which provides advertising and monetization services/products (whether owned or through its partners) to marketers and supply partners including through digital media, sites, surveys, owned or operated application(s)/widgets, exchange(s) for demand/supply, marketing automation solutions and other services, such as, fraud detection, reporting, audiences, attribution, analytics, modelling, segments, measurement (“Marketing Platform”).
2. SCOPE OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY
2.1 APPLICABILITY
This Privacy Policy explains how InMobi collects, uses and shares information from individuals that interact with its services, offering or platforms comprising its Marketing Platform (“Marketing Platform Services”) and its website, respectively. (“InMobi” means InMobi Pte. Ltd. and its subsidiaries). InMobi is the controller for the personal information we process, unless otherwise stated. InMobi Pte. Ltd. is an NAI (Network Advertising Initiative) member, and we adhere to the NAI Code of Conduct.
2.2 NON-APPLICABILITY
InMobi may offer independent mobile applications, web content services, lock-screen platforms, social entertainment platform(s), widgets, and/or other software features to consumers through smart devices which may be preloaded on the devices, downloadable, hosted on web or made available through other digital media (“Consumer Offering”). This Privacy Policy does not apply to the collection by or processing practices of each of the foregoing services, respectively. If you are a consumer of any such Consumer Offering, the applicable privacy policy should be available to you through such services. Please refer to the respective privacy policies of each Consumer Offering for a description of its data collection and data use practices.
To the extent that foregoing Consumer Offering promotes any interest-based advertising using the Marketing Platform Services, the terms of this policy would apply to the data processing practices for such Marketing Platform Services.
Marketing Platform Services and Consumer Offering are collectively referred to as “Services”.
3. INMOBI MARKETING PLATFORM SERVICES
InMobi engages with third party site/app publishers and app developers to serve ads on their digital properties on behalf of its demand side advertising partners through various channels of advertising solutions including exchanges, network, off-network etc. InMobi may also serve ads on Consumer Offerings. InMobi also engages in campaign planning, measurement (e.g. whether an advertisement was viewed, its timestamp etc.) and attribution of advertisements, whether by itself or through third party measurement partners.
InMobi provides Marketing Platform Services, including optimization of advertising campaigns, data analytics/enrichment, segment creation, user acquisition, re-engagement, remarketing or retargeting through various digital advertising channels. InMobi receives data into its Marketing Platform from various sources, including end user information collected by our systems, applications/offerings, partners, data/cookie vendors or customers (“Sources”), which may include third party apps, sites and services that you use. Please refer to the privacy policies of the apps, sites, and services you use to understand how those apps, sites and services collect, use, and share data from your interactions with them. InMobi is not responsible for how those third-party apps, sites and services collect and use data.
4. WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT?
When you view an advertisement distributed through InMobi on a site, app or other digital media, we may collect information on your device and your interaction with the advertisement. This information enables us to serve advertisements to you, improve our Services including to recognize your device when you use other sites and applications that have partnered with us. InMobi may also collect information about you when you elect to interact with our surveys or opinion-based applications. Information we may collect includes:
(a) Device identifiers. Device identifiers are alphanumeric strings that are unique to your device. These include:
iOS devices’ Identifier for Advertising (IDFA) and iOS Identifier for Vendors (IDFV)
Google Advertising ID (GAID), or Android ID for Android devices
Identifier for Advertising on OTT and CTV platforms
International mobile equipment identity (IMEI), in certain jurisdiction as permitted by applicable law
Cookie IDs
(b) Location information, including:
Geo-location or precise location of your device if you have given the app or site permission to collect your location information
Location information we infer based on data collected through a WiFi identifier that your device is connected to, in accordance with applicable law and provided location access is permitted
Location information we infer from your device’s IP address, provided that we will not infer location from an IP address to a more precise than city-level of accuracy unless you have given the app or site permission to collect your location information
(c) Network information, including:
Mobile carrier
Network provider or ISP
Network type (e.g., WiFi or cellular)
IP address
IDs of WiFi access points to which your device is connected
Date and time of connection
(d) Information about apps or sites and our Software Development Kit (SDK), including:
App or site name or version
App identifier
SDK version
API key identifier
Other information about/on your device, including:
Device type (e.g., make and model)
Device startup time and update time
Device name
Screen size
Memory and hard drive capacity
Operating system and version (e.g., iOS 14, Android, Windows, Blackberry)
Mobile browser used (e.g., Chrome, Safari, Firefox)
Language settings (including country code) and time zone
App usage
Device sensor signals (Accelerometer, Gyroscope, Proximity sensor, Orientation/Rotation Vector, Audio Controls Integration)
Advertisement information. We collect information about the ad presented on your device, including:
The content type of the ad (the advertiser and category, e.g. games, finance, entertainment, news)
The ad type (e.g. whether the ad is a text, image, video or other format based)
Where the ad is being served (e.g. the site, digital media or app on which the ad appears)
Whether you viewed, clicked or otherwise interacted with the ad
Survey information. We may ask users to voluntarily participate in online surveys. These surveys help brands improve their products and services offered to you. If you fill out a survey, we may collect your device information described above and information you provide, including your:
Age
Name
Email address
Phone number
Gender
Occupation and income range
Family size and other demographic information
Preference for brands, modes of travel, and other consumer choices.
Other marketing information:
In the context of our Marketing Platform Services, our customers, partners or vendors may also disclose to us certain personal or non-personal information they have separately collected about you during your interaction with their apps, sites or services so that we can effectively provide our Services. This may in the context of websites, including mobile websites, include cookies, other technologies, or other aggregated characteristics or other identifiers related to your device to understand your interaction with such site and to serve certain types of ads relevant to your interests.
These parties serve you cookies in accordance with their own specific privacy/cookie policies and subject to their own applicable legal requirements. We do not use the information they provide to us for any purpose other than as permitted by such third parties or for providing or improving our Services.
Notably, one of our media partners is Google. Please see the link below which describes Google's collection/use of data:
How Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps
We do not collect any sensitive data such as racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, genetic data, biometric data, data concerning health. We may show targeted advertisements to fitness enthusiasts.
5. HOW DO WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
We use the information that we collect about your device to:
Display advertisements on your device, which may include interest-based advertising customized to your interests, preferences, locations
For remarketing or retargeting i.e. to display relevant ads if you have previously visited/accessed/downloaded a site or mobile application that we partner with
For bidding to serve advertisements and to determine which ads are most effective
Analyze and provide our demand partners or advertisers reports on the effectiveness of advertisements and campaigns, including across different types of devices based on our determination of devices that are related to the same person. We, or third parties whom we engage to provide this service, may use cross-device data to provide interest-based advertising services and to deliver tailored ads to users across multiple mobile devices including over the top applications and smart televisions
Avoid showing you the same ads too many times
Build custom audience segments to enable our customers and partners better target their advertisements and offers
Improve our Services and assist our customers and partners in improving their products and services
Detect, deter and prevent fraud, fraudulent traffic or to protect the security of our systems
We may process your survey responses and share the response data with the brands who are our customers/marketers
6. WHO DO WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION WITH?
InMobi may share the information we collect or receive about you as described in this Policy as follows:
Publishers and Supply Partners. We may share your information with publishers (the app or site publishers) to help them understand how users interact with their apps and sites and advertisements on their apps and sites
Demand Partners and Advertisers. We may share your information with demand partners, brands and advertisers who use our Marketing Platform, to allow them to understand the performance of their campaigns; and to help them better target their campaigns, products or offerings
Marketing Partners. We may share your information with data partners who help us with better understanding your preferences by providing data enrichment, analytics and identification services and measurement companies who help us with attribution and tracking of advertisements distributed through us (“Marketing Partners”)
Service Providers. We may share personal information we collect about you with our third-party service providers. The categories of service providers to whom we entrust personal information include: IT and related services; fraud detection, information and services; payment processors; customer service providers; and vendors to support the provision of the Services
Group. We may share personal information with the Group so that the Services of InMobi and/or the Group may be improved and otherwise to serve you and/or our customers better with all our offerings including effective content management “Group” as used in this policy, means, with respect to InMobi, its affiliates and group entities listed
here
.
Disclosures to Protect Us or Others. We may access, preserve, and disclose any information we store associated with you to external parties if we, in good faith, believe doing so is required or appropriate to: comply with law enforcement or national security requests and legal process, such as a court order or subpoena; protect your, our or others’ rights, property, or safety; enforce our policies or contracts; collect amounts owed to us; or assist with an investigation or prosecution of suspected or actual illegal activity
Disclosures in the Event of Merger, Sale, or Other Asset Transfers. If we are involved in a merger, acquisition, financing due diligence, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, purchase or sale of assets, or transition of service to another provider, then your information may be sold or transferred as part of such a transaction, as permitted by law and/or contract<,/li>
International Data Transfers. Where applicable, we will protect information through other legally valid methods, including international data transfer agreements. You agree that all information processed by us may be transferred, processed, and stored anywhere in the world, including but not limited to, the United States or other countries, which may have data protection laws that are different from the laws where you live. We have taken appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information will remain protected and require our third-party service providers and partners to have appropriate safeguards as well. Further details can be provided upon request.
7. HOW DO WE KEEP PERSONAL INFORMATION SECURE?
InMobi uses reasonable technical and organizational measures to protect the information it collects about you in compliance with its legal and privacy requirements and contractual obligations. We also seek appropriate contractual protection from our partners regarding their collection, use or treatment of user data. Unfortunately, no system is 100% secure, and we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you provide to us. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, we do not accept liability for unauthorized disclosure.
By using our Services or providing personal information to us, you agree that we may communicate with you electronically regarding security, privacy, and administrative issues relating to your use of our Services. If we learn of a security system’s breach, we may attempt to notify you electronically by posting a notice on our Services, by mail or by sending an email to you.
8. HOW LONG DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION?
InMobi retains information collected in the context of our Marketing Platform for a period of up to thirteen (13) months, unless otherwise required by law or applicable contract.
InMobi may retain the information it obtains about you as per the instructions of its customers or partners who provide such information or as required to fulfil our contractual obligations. In case any information is provided by you in participation of a survey or opinion-based application by InMobi, we will only retain your personal data for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes we collected it for.
After the applicable retention period, InMobi will only retain and may only use your data: (i) in an aggregated or anonymized format; (ii) to comply with its legal obligations; and (iii) to resolve disputes and enforce agreements. Please note that the use cases stated in this provision will apply as an exception to your data subject or consumer rights related requests.
9. OPTING OUT OF INTEREST BASED ADS
Opting out of interest-based advertising:
If you prefer not to receive interest-based advertising from InMobi, you can opt out at any time by going to the InMobi
Opt Out
page and submitting your device ID or any other listed identifier. If you opt-out of interest-based advertising, you will still receive "generic" ads from InMobi. To opt-out of our cross-device ad targeting, you must opt-out on every device browser and device using the appropriate opt-out methods.
Opting out of surveys:
Each survey that you participate in will provide opt-out instructions, including an option to skip questions, which if elected will ensure that we do not include your device for that survey. Please note that if you opt-out of a survey you may still receive other survey requests. If we reach out to you through marketing communication modes such as emails, you will have the option to unsubscribe from such marketing communications through links provided in such emails.
Opting out of Connected TV:
If you opt-out of interest-based ads on your connected TV device, your advertising ID will not be used to build profiles or target you with interest-based ads and it is likely that you will get irrelevant ads which are not tailored to your interest. To disable interest-based ads, please use the Opt-Out on your Connected TV device as shown below.
On your device, visit Operating System (OS) Privacy Settings. Select Limit Ad Tracking (for iOS/tvOS devices), Opt-out of Interest-Based Ads (for Android devices), Limit Ad Tracking (for Roku devices), or similar setting offered by your OS. Please go through your device manufacturer’s privacy policy for more information.
You may also opt out of interest-based advertising via NAI. Please visit
Mobile Choices | NAI: Network Advertising Initiative
for opting out of interest-based ad on mobile devices and
Internet Connected TV Choices | NAI: Network Advertising Initiative
on TV.
10. PRIVACY RIGHTS
InMobi provides consumers with data subject or consumer rights as and when and to the extent required under such applicable laws.
General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR):
If you are an EEA data subject, kindly refer our EEA Privacy Policy
https://advertising.inmobi.com/privacy-policy-for-eea/
to see your data subject rights under GDPR
California:
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended (“CCPA”) provides California residents with the right to know what categories of personal information InMobi has collected about them and whether InMobi disclosed that personal information for a business purpose (e.g., to a service provider) in the preceding 12 months. The categories of sources from which we collect personal information and our business and commercial purposes for using personal information are set forth in “4. WHAT INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT?” and “5. HOW DO WE USE YOUR INFORMATION?” above, respectively. The categories of third parties with whom we may share your information are listed in “6. WHO DO WE SHARE YOUR INFORMATION WITH?” above.
California residents have the right to opt out of the “sale” of their personal information. Under the CCPA, “sale” is defined broadly and includes the transfer of personal information by a business to a third party for valuable consideration (even if there is no exchange of money). InMobi may be deemed to be “selling” personal information. The categories of personal information we have “sold” and the categories of third parties we have “sold” personal information to in the preceding twelve months are listed in “6. WHO DO WE SHARE YOUR INFORMATION WITH?” above.
Residents of the State of California (in the United States) have the following additional privacy rights:
You have a right to exercise certain consumer rights such as request to know/ disclose/ access/ delete your data, collected in the last 12 months, by writing to us at
privacy@inmobi.com
.
You have the right to opt out of selling of your data by clicking on the following link:
Do not sell my data
.
Non-Discrimination.
California residents have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment by us for the exercise of their rights conferred by the CCPA.
Authorized Agent.
Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child. To designate an authorized agent, please contact us as set forth in “17. CONTACT US” below and provide written authorization signed by you and your designated agent.
Verification.
To protect your privacy, we will take steps the following steps to verify your identity before fulfilling your request. When you make a request, we will ask you to provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative, which may include information about your device.
Additional Privacy Rights for Residents of Colorado, Connecticut, Virginia and Utah
InMobi does not “sell” your personal information. We process your personal information for the purposes of “targeted advertising” ('interest based advertising' for the purposes of this Privacy Policy) as that term is defined under the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act, Colorado Privacy Act, Connecticut Data Privacy Act and Utah Consumer Privacy Act.
Residents of Colorado, Connecticut, and Virginia can opt out of interest based advertising by going to the InMobi
Opt Out
page.
InMobi does not engage in profiling of consumers in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, as those terms are defined under the Colorado Privacy Act.
The privacy laws of your country may grant you the following additional privacy rights relating to their personal information: right to access, request correction, request deletion/anonymization/blocking, restrict/object to processing, withdraw your consent, request data portability, be informed about third parties with whom your data has been shared, and request review of decisions taken exclusively based on automated processing. To exercise these rights, please write to us at
privacy@inmobi.com
.
11. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS
InMobi may share your information with clients, customers, partners, the Group and other third parties described above who are based in countries outside of your country of residence (for example, if you are an EEA resident, we may share your information with our non-EEA clients or the Group), subject to any contractual or legal requirements. You agree that all information processed by us may be transferred, processed, and stored anywhere in the world.
While some countries may not have data protection laws that are equivalent to those of the country in which you reside, we will take reasonable measures to protect your information in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
12. LEAD GENERATION CAMPAIGNS
InMobi may offer form-based advertising solutions to marketers that include the collection of voluntary information from you as part of an advertisement that contains a questionnaire. Such information may consist of personal data, non-personal information or data, or both. All the information that you voluntarily provide in response to such form or questionnaire is typically forwarded directly to the relevant marketer’s servers or their landing page and in such cases will be governed by such marketer's privacy policies in place at the time of transfer.
In the event any personal data is directly processed by InMobi, you acknowledge that InMobi may be required to store such information for the period during which it continues to manage the applicable lead-generation campaign for its marketer on whose behalf the information is collected. This information may be temporarily stored by InMobi solely for running such form-based campaigns and will be used only for the purpose of optimization of such campaigns, subject to applicable legal/privacy and contractual requirements. InMobi has implemented internal safeguards to protect the temporary storage of this information and uses reasonable technical and organizational measures to protect the same. InMobi has mechanisms to delete or anonymize any personal data after the said campaign is concluded or within a period thirty (30) days from the same. Pursuant to the conclusion of the applicable campaign, InMobi may retain and use your Information only to the extent necessary for it to create reports for its client, comply with its legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce agreements and no other purpose. Any non-personal information or data submitted by you may be used for improving our Services.
If you have any questions about InMobi lead generation campaigns, please contact us at:
privacy@inmobi.com
. InMobi will refer any enquiries or complaints to the relevant marketer responsible for the processing of data provided as part of lead generation campaigns.
13. COOKIES
We use cookies and beacons to help us collect some of the information we have described above. This may be done when you interact with us or our third-party partners who enable InMobi to collect data related to your interaction with their apps or sites for the purpose of serving relevant Ads to you and/or improve our services. We may also use cookies on our and our advertiser’s websites to provide website functionality and advertising to you respectively, and to save you having to provide the information you have already given us on subsequent visits to our site.
For more detailed information about the technologies we use and your ability to control those cookies, please visit our
cookie policy
. We recommend that you review the privacy policies of the third-party apps, services or sites that you directly interact with to learn how those third parties use cookies.
14. PRIVACY OF CHILDREN
InMobi complies with the age-gating requirements under applicable privacy laws such as Children's Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA) and California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended (CCPA) in the U.S., Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (LGPD), General law of personal data protection in Brazil and GDPR in the EEA and does not knowingly collect personal data about users of sites or apps directed to children. Please also visit our
COPPA Policy
.
15. OTHER WEBSITES
Our website and the ads we service may contain links to other websites. You should be aware that we are not responsible for the privacy practices of such other websites as those may have different privacy policies and terms of use and are not associated with us. You agree that we cannot control these links and we shall not be responsible for any use of such websites.
16. CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
We may amend this Privacy Policy at any time. The amended Privacy Policy will be displayed on our site. If we make any material changes, we will notify you by means of a notice on this site prior to the change becoming effective. Please check our Privacy Policy regularly to ensure you have read the latest version.
17. CONTACT US
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at
privacy@inmobi.com
.
We have appointed a representative in the EU. You can contact them by post at Taylor Vinters Europe Limited, Clifton House, Fitzwilliam Street Lower, Dublin, D02 XT91, Ireland, or by email at
representative@taylorvinters.com
.
To check the previous version of the privacy policy, please
click here
.
First name
*
Last name
*
Email
*
Company name
*
Country
*
- Please Select -
Afghanistan
Aland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua & Barbuda
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Asia/Pacific Region
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Caribbean Netherlands
Cayman Islands
Central African Rep
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Curaçao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Democratic Republic of the Congo
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Europe
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern and Antarctic Lands
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Macedonia (FYROM)
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Myanmar (Burma)
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
North Korea
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Occupied Palestinian Territory
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Palistinian Territory
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Costa Rica
Romania
Russia
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Réunion
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent & the Grenadines
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Scotland
Senegal
Serbia and Montenegro
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands
South Korea
South Sudan
Spain
Sri Lanka
St Kitts & Nevis
St Lucia
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
U.S. Virgin Islands
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City
Venezuela
Vietnam
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe
Åland Islands
I am
*
Please Select
Ad Tech Provider
Agency
App Marketer
Brand Marketer
Game Marketer
Other
Publisher
Retailer
I am interested in
*
Please Select
Learning more about InMobi
Advertising my brand with InMobi
Advertising my app with InMobi
Monetizing my app with InMobi
Running programmatic campaigns with InMobi on behalf of my clients
Learning more about InMobi's mediation solutions
Something else
Job title
*
Anything else you'd like to tell us?
Lead Source
By checking here, you agree to receive marketing emails about our products and services. You can unsubscribe via a link in the email.
*
The information you provide will be used in accordance with the terms of our
privacy policy
.